/lfs1/sudharao/PubMedCentral-Corpus/articles.O-Z/Pain_Med/Pain_Med_2010_Jul_11(7)_1017-1023.nxml
('Myb', 'MYB', 'increases')
The protein contains a 53-amino acid domain highly homologous to the MYB-related DNA binding domain identified in several DNA binding proteins of the SHAQK(Y/F)F sub-family (MybSt1, LeMYB1, LHY and CCA1).
MYB transcription factor contains a conserved DNA-binding domain (DBD), which is homologous to the DBD of animal c-Myb 
The full length coding regions of OsMYB55 cDNA was amplified by PCR using the following primer pair: Myb55-P28F-BamHI: (
C) Typical image of pulsed BrdU incorporation in control and B-MYB deficient ESCs, showing decreased BrdU incorporation in B-Myb knockdown (KD) cells.
Based upon the highly pigmented phenotype of the Myb-27 tobacco line, the AtMYB90
                protein is able to interact with those native tobacco transcription factors and
                promoters required to activate transcription of anthocyanin biosynthetic genes.
(A) Western blot analysis of c-Myb knock-down (shMYB) versus control (shGFP) in MCF7 cells.
The 160-kDa Myb-binding protein 1a (MYBBP1A, also referred to as p160) is a nucleolar protein whose function is mostly unknown.
The ubiquitously expressed MYBBP1A was originally identified as an interactor of the c-Myb oncoprotein with homology to the fifth essential DNA polymerase of 
noted domains are histidine kinase domain (HK), receiver domain (REC), GAF domain which is implicated in ethylene binding, CHASE domain for cytokinin binding, conserved histidine-containing phosphotransfer domain (HPt), Myb-like DNA binding domain (MYB), CCT motif found in clock proteins (CCT); brackets mark diverged domains and indicate changed amino acids,
Some nucleolar proteins such as nucleolin and MYBBP1A interact with c-Myb, which is expressed in hematopoietic cells where it regulates their proliferation and differentiation 
(A) TRANSFAC position weight matrices for Myb (V$MYB_Q6) and POUHD (V$POU1F1_Q6) enriched motifs identified by the classifier.
Myb23 is a member of the R2R3 MYB family that is involved in many different biological processes (Stracke et al. 
Knockdown of B-Myb in mES cells also decreases Oct4 RNA and protein abundance, while over-expression of B-MYB modestly up-regulates 
The down-regulated genes in the cluster IV involve in cellular transcription; Myb transcription factors MYB94 (At3g47600), MYB43 (At5g16600), MYB102 (At4g21440), MYB74(At4g05100), cpm10 (At1g48000), and Myb related transcription factor (At5g04760), homeodomain transcription factor (At2g46680), ABA responsive AtHB-7 (At2g46680), AP2 domain transcription factor (At3g61630, At5g13330), CCAAT-box binding transcription factor (At1g54830, At1g72830), bZIP transcription factor (At2g46270, At3g62420, At3g49760), and Zinc finger ethylene-response transcription factor(At4g00940, At4g29190, At5g04340) (

('CDX2', 'FOXD3', 'increases')
The iPS marker genes include OCT4, SOX2, NANOG, Oct4-Sox2, KLF4, FOXD3, ZIC3, ZFP42, GDF3, TDGF1, PBX1, and the differentiation marker include FOXA2, AFP, SOX17, GATA4, GATA6, T, GATA2, GATA3, hCGa, hCGb, CDX2.

('PI3K', 'SHP2', 'binds')
Tyrosine phosphorylation of Gab-1 by Src and other tyrosine kinases promotes recruitment of several signaling molecules including PI3K, PLCgamma, RasGAP and SHP2 

('STAT5A', 'IRF1', 'increases')
The IRF and STAT (IRF1, IRF2, IRF4, IRF7, IRF8, IRF9, STAT1, STAT2, STAT3, STAT4 and STAT5A) genes were seen to be differentially regulated following LPS stimulation and the peak of their expression was at 6 hours.

('ATF3', 'JUN', 'increases')
The cell line specificity of response to UVA1 revealed in microarray data was assessed using quantitative PCR performed in both cell types on several specific genes (GBP6, ATF3 and MMP3 specific for keratinocytes in microarray experiments; OAS1, OAS2, GBP1, GBP5, DDX58, JUN, IGF1, NAR4A1, DNAJB1, HSPA1A, HSPA6, HMOX1 and LIF specific for fibroblasts in microarray experiments).
The elevated post-operative expression of 22 small nucleolar RNAs and the decreased expression of the transcription factors JUNB, FOS, FOSB, ATF3 MYC, EGR1 as well as the orphan nuclear receptors NR4A1, NR4A2, NR4A3 suggest dramatic reorganizations at both the cellular and genetic levels.
Several transcription factors and regulators of transcription, including JUN, JUNB, EGR, MAPK9, IRF1, STAT4, and ATF3, were induced within 30 minutes of FHA exposure.
The relative mRNA levels of the different genes (hATF3; hJUN; hHSP70B; hp27; hGADD45G; hGADD153; hHSP105) in THPTS-PDT-treated retinoblastoma cells were determined in comparison to the levels of the controls (no THPTS-PDT).
Western blot results depicting relative knockdown of endogenous (a) c-JUN (b) JUND (c) ATF3 and (d) WT1 protein expression at 48 h in nuclear extracts from HCASMC transfected with negative control siRNA (Con si) or two distinct siRNAs against c-JUN, JUND, ATF3 or WT1, respectively.
ATF2, ATF3, BATF, BCL1, BCL3, BCLAF, BHLH, BRCA1, CFOS, CHD2, CTCF, EBF1, EGR1, ELF1, ETS1, FOXM1, GABP, GCN5, IRF3, IRF4, JUND, MAX, MEF2, MTA3, MXI1, NFATC1, NFE2, NFIC, NFYA, NFYB, NRF1, NRSF, p300, PAX5, PBX3, PML, Pol2, Pol3, POU2, PU.1, RAD21, RFX, RUNX3, RXLCH, RXRA, SIX5, SMC3, SP1, SPT, SRF, STAT1, STAT3, STAT5, TBP, TCF1, TCF3, TR4, USF1, USF2, WHIP, YY1, ZBTB3, ZEB1, ZNF143, ZNF274, ZZZ3
Upper right: an early upregulated cluster of TFs dominated by oncogenes (ATF3, KLF4, KLF2, JUN3, EGR1, NR4A2, and FOS are all oncogenes).
We have confirmed some of the genes previously implicated in the PDGF-PDGFR pathway, such as FOS, NR4A1, ZFP36, EGR2, NR4A2, EGR3, FOSB, ATF3, JUN, IER3, ADRB2, DUSP6, MCL1, RGS2, MYC, F3, BHLHB2, GEM, EGR1, LIF and CEBPB 
Many of the genes downregulated in nonlesional skin compared to normal skin are transcription factors such as JUN, JUNB, FOSB, ATF3, NR4A2, PER1, EGR1, MAFF (

('Raf', 'MEK', 'adds_modification')
PEBP1, an endogenous inhibitor of the Raf-MAPK kinase (MEK)-MAP kinase pathway, has emerged as a significant metastasis suppressor in a variety of human cancers, including colorectal cancer, and was recently shown to regulate the spindle checkpoint in cultured cells [
Binding of Grb2/SOS complex to IR activates Ras that, in turn, recruit Raf leading to MEK activation.
Many studies reveal that GPCRs and growth factor receptors share a number of signalling modules (e.g., Raf/MEK/ERK, PI 3-K/PDK/PKB) to transduce their effects.
Crosstalk between the PI3K and the Raf/MEK/ERK pathways has been reported on multiple levels, with some research stating that PI3K activity is essential for induction of Raf/MEK/ERK activity [
Work by several groups, including ours, has shown a modulation of the Akt/Ras/Raf/MEK/ERK signalling pathway by adenosine.
Of great interest are the different effects of adenosine on the Akt/Ras/Raf/MEK/ERK signalling pathway modulation in different cells.
To this end, pharmaceutical efforts have been directed to target different components of the Ras/Raf/MEK and PI3K/PKB pathways.
This review article covers recent salient achievements in the identification and development of Raf, MEK, and PI3K inhibitors.
Schematic representation of the main cytosolic components of the Ras/Raf/MEK signal transduction pathway
As previously mentioned, activated Raf phosphorylates and activates MEK and downstream efforts [
Representative examples of Raf and MEK kinase inhibitors
Rapid progress has occurred in the last few years in the development of kinase modulators that target different components of the Ras/Raf/MEK and PI3K/PKB pathways.
Equally important as the epidemiological data, a better understanding of the different components and their roles in the Ras/Raf/MEK and PI3K/PKB pathways has allowed the identification and development of clinical candidates that control the irregular activation of these pathways.
This event leads to the activation of Raf/Ras/MEK/ERK pathway.
Perturbation of Raf, MEK or ERK had similar effects on the functional markers with ERK being the most notable (
Furthermore, profilin-1 activates classical signaling pathways including the PI3K/Akt and Ras-Raf-MEK-Erk pathways.
Inhibiting MLC phosphorylation by blocking RhoA/Rho kinase, phospholipase C/protein kinase C, and HRas/Raf/MEK/ERK pathways with the use of genetic or chemical manipulation leads to the inhibition of influenza proliferation.
In contrast, the induction of MLC phosphorylation enhances influenza proliferation, as does activation of the HRas/Raf/MEK/ERK signaling pathway.
Influenza-induced activation of Raf/MEK/ERK, PKC, and PLC has been reported 
The accumulation of influenza hemagglutinin on the surface of infected cells results in the activation of the Raf\MEK\ERK signaling cascade 
Several anti-influenza compounds have been described, including those that inhibit intracellular calcium, PKC, and Raf/MEK/ERK, as well as calmodulin antagonists and donors of nitric oxide (NO) 
Previous studies demonstrated that activation of Raf/MEK/ERK is crucial for proliferation of the influenza virus 
This process requires viral activation of the cellular Raf/MEK/ERK signaling cascade.
We sought to determine if MLC phosphorylation mediates the role of HRas\Raf\MEK\ERK in influenza proliferation.
The reduction in influenza proliferation seen when MDCK cells were treated with the MEK/ERK inhibitor, U0126, or with the Raf kinase inhibitor, GW5074, was reversed when MDCK cells were also treated with the MLC phosphatase inhibitor, calyculin A (
The anti-influenza effects of Raf kinase and MEK/ERK inhibitors were reversed when HUVECs were treated with an MLC phosphatase inhibitor.
Recently, we reported that TH1 served as a negative regulator of A-Raf and PAK1, inhibiting MEK/ERK signaling pathway 
The activation of ERK1/2 in response to CTS in cancer cells suggests that the Ras-Raf-MEK-ERK pathway plays an important role in cell survival, possibly through the regulation of ion channels and cell volume after an increase in intracellular Ca
But aberrant activation of the Ras-Raf-MEK-ERK pathway in TNBC has already been noticed 
PHB plays an important role in the Ras-mediated activation of the Raf/MEK/ERK pathway 
This conclusion is in agreement with a previous work applying multi-parametric global sensitivity analysis to an integrated, system-specific MAPK network including both an upstream EGF signal pathway and the core cascade consisting of Ras and Raf (MAPKKK), MEK (MAPKK), and ERK (MAPK) 
(B) The expression of Ras, pRaf1, pMEK1, and pPDK1.
Apart from PTKs, the Raf/MEK/ERK pathway has been implicated in transformed B cell survival although the role of this pathway in the survival of EBV-transformed human B cells is unclear.
The signaling mechanisms behind NETosis are still largely unexplored although the Raf-MEK-ERK signaling pathway has already been implicated. 
The Ras/Raf/MEK/extracellular signal-regulated kinase (ERK) cascade couples signals from cell surface receptors to transcription factors, which regulate gene expression of proteins that control cell cycle progression 
For example, nerve growth factor (NGF) and epidermal growth factor (EGF) induce different activation kinetics of the Raf/MEK/ERK signaling pathway and result in differentiation and proliferation, respectively.
However, a direct and quantitative linkage between the temporal profile of Raf/MEK/ERK activation and the cellular outputs has not been established due to a lack of means to precisely perturb its signaling kinetics.
Here, we construct a light-gated protein-protein interaction system to regulate the activation pattern of the Raf/MEK/ERK signaling pathway.
Light-induced activation of the Raf/MEK/ERK cascade leads to significant neurite outgrowth in rat PC12 pheochromocytoma cell lines in the absence of growth factors.
A good example is the Raf/MEK/ERK signaling pathway, which plays a vital role in cell proliferation, differentiation, and apoptosis 
Despite the obvious importance of the temporal dimension of the Raf/MEK/ERK pathway, there are very limited means to probe this dimension with high accuracy.
In this paper, we construct a light-gated Raf/MEK/ERK activation and inactivation system based on the CRY2 and CIBN protein pair.
We demonstrate that a low intensity of blue light allows precise temporal control of the Raf/MEK/ERK activity over several days.
In the absence of growth factors, light-induced Raf/MEK/ERK activation stimulates significant neurite outgrowth in PC12 cells.
However, NGF induces more neurites per cell than light does, likely due to light-induced selective activation of Raf/MEK/ERK pathway in contrast to NGF-induced activation of multiple downstream pathways.
Membrane recruitment of Raf1 should subsequently activate MEK and ERK.
Next, we showed that light could be used to precisely control the activation kinetics of the Raf/MEK/ERK pathway.
As NGF activates several signaling pathways, we set out to examine whether light-induced Raf/MEK/ERK activation alone could steer PC12 cells toward differentiation in the absence of NGF.
To confirm that light-induced neurite outgrowth is due to light-induced Raf/MEK/ERK activation, we quantified the neurite length at various conditions by measuring the longest neurite for each cell 
Light allows precise and versatile control of Raf/MEK/ERK activation kinetics, which enables us to quantitatively measure how the activation kinetics determines neurite outgrowth in PC12 cells.
In this report, we demonstrated precise and reversible control of the Raf/MEK/ERK signaling activity utilizing light-mediated CRY2PHR-CIBN interaction.
Light-induced Raf/MEK/ERK activation was sufficient to induce neurite outgrowth in PC12 cells in the absence of growth factor stimulation.
However, it is intriguing that the activation of Raf/MEK/ERK pathway alone induced longer but fewer neurites compared with NGF.
The results suggest that the Raf/MEK/ERK signaling pathway is primarily responsible for neurite extension whereas other downstream pathways of NGF binding play roles in neurite initiation.
In this study, we used genetic mutants and pharmacological inhibitors to show that H-, N- and K-Ras engage the Raf-MEK-ERK pathway to cause phosphorylation of STAT3 on S727, which is necessary for the anchorage-independent growth of transformed fibroblasts as colonies in soft agar.
Moreover, we show that a STAT3 mutant that mimics S727 phosphorylation (S727D) is partially refractory to the block in transformation resulting from pharmacologic inhibition of the Raf-MEK-ERK MAPK pathway.
To confirm that the Raf-MEK-ERK pathway is engaged by activated Ras to transduce phosphorylation of STAT3 on S727, we titrated the dose of the MEK-ERK pathway inhibitor, PD0325901 [
The best characterized in the context of cancer are the Raf1-MEK-ERK, PI3K, and Ral pathways.
Dys-regulation and activation of Raf-MEK-ERK-survivin has been shown associated with anti-apoptotic capability of cancer cells 
It has been reported that the activation of Raf-MEK-ERK-survivin signaling pathway could protect endothelial cells against gamma-radiation-induced apoptosis 
Combination of Raf inhibitors with MEK or ERK inhibitors led to an additive promotion of MAPK pathway activation through the combined effects of negative feedback release and priming.
Upstream of the Ras/MAPK pathway, M-CSF binding to its membrane receptor, c-Fms, stimulates phosphorylation of Y807 in the activation loop, resulting in a conformational shift that enhances intrinsic kinase activity and docking of adaptor proteins such as Grb2 and Sos with subsequent activation of the Ras/Raf/MEK/ERK cascade.
Shoc2 has a synergistic effect on activation of the Ras-Raf-MEK-ERK pathway 
A panel of seven human breast cancer and melanoma cell lines harboring different mutations in the Ras-Raf pathway was implanted orthotopically in mice, and tumor growth, ERK1/2, MEK1/2 and AKT activation, and blood vessel density and permeability were analyzed.
Decreased pMEK staining in the responsive tumors confirmed that B-Raf was targeted by pazopanib.
B-Raf is a serine/threonine kinase responsible for the activation of the MEK-ERK signaling pathway downstream of the Ras GTPase.
Growth inhibition was associated with reduced ERK1/2 phosphorylation and MEK1 phosphorylation in the two cell lines harboring mutations in exon 11 of B-Raf.
To confirm that B-Raf was targeted in the pazopanib-sensitive primary tumors, the phosphorylation levels of the B-Raf downstream targets MEK1/2 and ERK1/2 was determined by immunohistochemistry (
The effect of pazopanib on the tumor growth of the WM3918 cell line was confirmed to not be associated with B-Raf targeting as a significant decrease of pMEK1/2 and pERK1/2 was not observed at any drug dose.
In cells harboring a wild type genotype in the Ras-Raf pathway, Raf inhibitors induced a paradoxical activation of the downstream MEK-ERK pathway, due to transactivation of C-Raf 
The Ras-Raf-MEK-ERK pathway induces VEGF expression directly or indirectly 
Our data suggest that several markers, including B-Raf status (pMEK/pERK), Ras mutation and HER2/receptor tyrosine kinase activation, should be investigated in tumors to determine if they constitute predictive markers of efficacy for pazopanib treatment.
In addition, Raf-MEK-ERK pathway was involved in the neuroprotective effect of AGS-IV against glutamate-induced neurotoxicity in PC12 cells.
In melanoma, both the Ras-Raf-MEK-ERK (MAPK) and the PI3K-AKT (AKT) signaling pathways are constitutively activated through multiple mechanisms, and thus exert several key functions in melanoma development and progression 
ERK is a MAPK kinase located downstream of Raf and MEK in the RAS signalling pathway.
It has been reported that Raf/MEK/ERK and PI3K/AKT signaling pathways represent the downstream targets of activated EGFR.
Activation of Ras leads to initiation of a signal via Raf/MEK/ERK which in turn phosphorylates/activates transcription factor ELK.
Activation of Ras signaling pathway stimulates a signal through Raf/MEK/ERK pathway inducing phosphorylation of ELK.
These signals trigger the activation of transmembrane receptors such as receptor tyrosine kinase (RTK) or G protein-coupled receptors which activate the Ras-Raf-MEK signaling cascade 
Using a similar experimental scheme, we next investigated whether RanBPM expression could inhibit MEK and ERK activation by active c-Raf.
In order to achieve more knowledge about underlying mechanisms we investigated activation of the Raf/MEK/ERK1/2 signaling pathway known to have an important role in receptor upregulation 
In an attempt to gain more knowledge about underlying mechanisms we examined the expression of p-ERK1/2 since an important role of the Raf/MEK/ERK1/2 pathway in receptor upregulation has been established earlier in human cerebral arteries 
Human PEBP1 has also been shown to inhibit the Raf/MEK/ERK pathway.
As previously mentioned, PEBP1 from bovine, human or rat is able to bind small ligands as well as proteins such as the Raf-1, MEK and ERK kinases 
On the other hand, the activation of PKA is known to counteract the Ras/Raf-1/MEK signaling pathway 
We have presented evidence indicating that hCG stimulates leptin expression in placenta through a signal transduction pathway including Epac, Rap1, and probably B-Raf, up-stream of the MEK-ERK cascade.
The Ras-Raf-MEK-Erk pathway is evolutionarily conserved and controls many aspects of cell activities 
Pharmacologic inhibition and transfection studies demonstrated that atypical PKCs but not conventional or novel PKCs contributed towards CSF-1 induced MEK-Erk activity in a c-Raf-1 and A-Raf-independent fashion.
We have previously shown that CSF-1 stimulates the MEK-Erk pathway by both an A-Raf dependent and A-Raf independent pathway 
Previously, we showed in 32D.R cells that CSF-1 activated MEK-Erk using both an A-Raf-dependent and an A-Raf independent pathway that did not involve c-Raf-1 
Such studies suggest that, in the Ras-Raf-MEK-ERK pathway, Ras clusters act as an analog-digital-analog converter, where analog, continuous EGF input is converted into digital, fully active clusters.
The significantly reduced phosphorylation of ERK1/2 was in line with its important role in cellular migration and that of Nox2 in the activation of Ras/Raf/MEK/ERK signalling cascade downstream from the tyrosine receptors.
Phosphorylation of the GTP-Ras-Raf1 complex is catalyzed by PAK and Src, leading to a series of subsequent phosphorylations of MEK, ERK and others.
Differences in PI3K/AKT, Ras/Raf/MEK/ERK and JAK/Stat3 signalling between fswt/fs188 and fs164/fs120 cells are shown.
MEK is phosphorylated and activated by Raf.
Research studies conducted over the last decade on melanoma molecular pathogenesis improved the elucidation of its key signaling pathways, such as those mediated by Ras/Raf/MEK/ERK (alias MAPK), PI3K/Akt/mTOR, Wnt/b-catenin/APC, MITF and glutamate cascade 
Several signaling pathways have been implicated in the regulation of cardiac hypertrophy; these include the Raf/MEK/MAPK, PI3K/Akt, and JAK/STAT pathways 
ERK is one of the key factors in the Ras/Raf/MEK/ERK signaling pathway.
The Ras/Raf/MEK/ERK kinase cascade is involved in the control of cell proliferation, cell survival and invasion in CRC cancer cells [
Gene profiling studies have shown that HIV-Tat down-regulates genes involved in the Ras-Raf-MEK1 signaling 
Upon activation, the signaling proceeds through Drk, Sos, and Ras activation, to a phosphorylation cascade involving Raf (MAPKKK) and Dsor1 (MEK).
Sustained elevated Ras-Raf-MEK signalling in human fibroblasts leads to a senescence response with the induction p16INK4A and p21 expression 
This pathway is activated by the upstream input signal Ras protein, and comprises a set of three protein kinases, namely Raf, MEK and ERK, with a highly conserved molecular architecture that acts sequentially 
For example, reaction (1) leads to the following differential equation for the dynamics of the Raf*-MEK complex, given by
(Blue-line: Raf; green-line: MEK, red-line: ERK.
(A, B, C) Simulated Raf, MEK and ERK activities at 10 min when the MAP kinase module was stimulated by different signal inputs and inhibited by phosphatase PP2A with different concentrations.
We used the proteomic data of the ARaf1 protein, the dual specificity mitogen-activated protein kinase kinase 2 (MEK) and the mitogen-activated protein kinase 1 (ERK) in 
Emerging studies have begun to explore the therapeutic values of various targeting strategies outside the canonical Ras effector pathway, Raf-MEK-ERK, and emphasize the significance of identifying additional pathways either directly involved in Ras signaling or functioning as key modifiers that are required for oncogenic Ras-driven tumorigenesis 
Previous work in our laboratory showed that kinase suppressor of Ras 1 (KSR1), a scaffold protein for Raf, MEK and ERK 
To that end, COLO 205 tumor line was treated with SL0101, a kaempferol glycoside with no activity against MEK, Raf, or PKC 
Several studies have shown that PAKs are involved in the ERK-signaling cascade by phosphorylating the ERK upstream molecules, c-Raf and MEK1 
To identify downstream pathways that might affect GO cytotoxicity, we functionally assessed PI3K/AKT/mTOR, JAK/STAT, and Ras/Raf/MEK signaling pathways using SCNP assays; for details regarding modulators and assessed targets, please see Supporting 
Raf kinase inhibitory protein (RKIP; also known as PEBP1, for phosphatidylethanolamine-binding protein1), as indicated by the name, was first identified as the endogenous inhibitor of the RAF/MEK/ERK pathway, inhibiting Raf-1 activation 
(B) Elevation of the phosphorylation levels of MEK and ERK by DA-Raf knockdown.
However, intrinsic DA-Raf is not sufficient to prevent the high levels of MEK and ERK activities that are induced by FGF2 stimulation or the expression of constitutively active H-Ras, B-Raf, or MEK, to bring about EMT.
In other words, the high levels of MEK and ERK activities are beyond the limit that intrinsic DA-Raf can suppress.
PI3K/Akt and Ras/Raf/MEK/ERK are the most well-known cell-survival promoting pathways engaged in mediating FAK/Src signaling by integrins 
Signaling of PDGFRA or other RTKs results in activation of Ras-Raf-MEK-ERK pathway in gliomas 
PDGFRA activation triggers the activation of Ras-Raf-MEK-ERK and PI3K-AKT pathways.
Both Ras-Raf-MEK-ERK and PI3K-AKT pathways are highly active in gliomas 
Previous reports have indicated the role of PDGFRA signaling in the activation of Ras-Raf-MEK-ERK pathway 
The initiating signal for autophagy formation is poorly understood, whereas it has been established that several molecules and signaling pathways are implicated in regulating autophagy, such as PI3K-AKT-mTOR (phosphatidylinositol 3-kinase/protein kinase B/mammalian target of rapamycin), MAPKs, Raf-1-MEK1/2-ERK1/2 and PTEN (phosphatase and tensin homologue) pathways 
Globally, after ligand binding IGF1R can signal directly from the membrane (IGF1R signaling internalization-independent), with a major degree of IRS1/PI3K/AKT signaling activation and a smaller enhancement of the Ras/Raf/MEK/ERK signaling pathway, or, when internalized either by clathrin and/or caveolin-dependent mechanisms, it can signal from vesicles.
Sorafenib (D06272) is a multi-kinase inhibitor by targeting Raf/MEK/ER pathway, and approved for the treatment of advanced renal cell carcinoma and advanced hepatocellular carcinoma 
Alternatively, a Mitogen-activated protein kinase pathway Ras/Raf/MEK/MAPK, 40S ribosomal protein S6 kinase and mitogen- and stress-activated protein kinase (RSK2/MSK) signaling might be activated following neurotrophin activation.
As activation of and crosstalk between the RAS/Raf/MEK/ERK and Jak/STAT signaling pathways play a role in the survival advantage of leukemic cells driven by mutant FLT3, we were interested in comparing the expression levels and activity of relevant signaling components in drug-sensitive and drug-resistant cells.
ERK1 and ERK2, the output of the cascade, are phosphorylated by MEK1 and MEK2, and MEK1/2 are activated upstream by Raf-1, and B-Raf 
These observations suggest that in MDA-MD-435 cancer cells, E-cadherin expression induces a downregulation of Ras/Raf/MEK/ERK downstream pathway through the significant decreased activity of the IR/IGF-IR signaling. 
The IGF-1R mediates two signaling pathways, namely the Raf-MEK-ERK pathway, inducing proliferation and the PI3K-Akt pathway, supporting differentiation 
The cytoplasmic tyrosine kinase Jak2 couples with a variety of cytokine receptors, such as the erythropoietin (Epo) receptor (EpoR) and the IL-3 receptor, and plays a crucial role in regulation of proliferation and apoptosis of hematopoietic cells by activating various signaling pathways including the STAT5, RAS/Raf-1/MEK/Erk, and phosphatidylinositol 3'-kinase (PI3K)/Akt pathways 
Indeed, recent studies show that during transendothelial migration monocytes activate the HRas/Raf/MEK/ERK signaling cascade which induces MLC phosphorylation followed by Src-mediated phosphorylation of VE-cadherin 
ERK1/2 is activated by the upstream Ras/Raf/MEK signaling cascade via phosphorylation on residues threonine 202 and tyrosine 204.
ERK1/2 is stimulated by EGFR activation, through the GRB2-SOS complex and the Ras-Raf-MEK signaling cascade [
For example, the Ras/Raf/MEK/ERK pathway was theoretically proposed to negatively feedback into the apoptotic machinery, and hence prevents apoptosis triggered by a self-feeding E2F1 
Collectively, our data firstly demonstrate the capacity of CDH17 to regulate the activity of Ras/Raf/MEK/ERK pathway for cell proliferation in GC, and suggest that CDH17 can serve as an attractive therapeutic target for future research.
The Ras/Raf/MEK/ERK mitogen-activated protein kinase (MAPK) cascade is a key intracellular signaling pathway that regulates diverse cellular functions including proliferation, survival, apoptosis, motility, transcription, metabolism and differentiation 
The Ras/Raf/MEK/ERK pathway is activated by diverse mechanisms.
This schematic diagram demonstrates the inducing effect of CDH17 on Ras/Raf/MEK/ERK signaling pathway and illustrates the hypothetic involvement of integrins in GC.
The up-regulation of cadherin-integrin signaling activates the Ras/Raf/MEK/ERK pathway.
In conclusion, the present study identifies that CDH17 is an actual oncogene and plays a major role in cell proliferation and tumor growth in GC through integrin-Ras/Raf/MEK/ERK signaling.
To confirm GDNF, EGR-1, Ras, cRaf, MEK and ERK mRNA expression differing significantly between hyperglycemic and normoglycemic fetal kidney tissues observed using microarray analysis, we performed quantitative RT-PCR and compared expression patterns, as shown in 
Measurement of serial GDNF, EGR-1, Ras, Raf, MEK and ERK gene expression by quantitative renal time PCR (qPCR) on cDNA from E11 to E15 of fetal renal tissue, either in hyperglycemic or normoglycemic state.
We further examined mRNA expression patterns of cRaf, MEK and ERK.
Expression of cRaf, MEK and ERK genes was elevated in hyperglycemic fetal kidney tissues about 85, 95 and 1020 fold, respectively, higher than in normoglycemic kidneys at E12.
Activation of ERK facilitates its translocation into nuclei, where it phosphorylates transcription activators like cRaf, MEK and ERK, all activated by GDNF (
Phosphorylated cRaf, MEK and ERK significantly increased after co-treatment with high glucose and GDNF, the latter downregulated by pretreated with ERK inhibitor, PD98059 for 1 hour.
Treatment of HRPTE cells with high glucose concentration (20 mM) and GDNF (100 ng/ml) resulted in enhanced GDNF-dependent phosphorylation of cRaf, MEK and ERK.
It was interesting to note that serine phosphorylation of cRaf was abolished by pretreating cells with protein-tyrosine kinase inhibitor (PD98059); tyrosine-threorine phosphorylation of MEK and ERK was also down-regulated by the same protein-tyrosine inhibitor (PD98059) (
We further analyzed EGR-1 contribution to hyperglycemia down-regulating GDNF-induced migration to HRPTE cells and GDNF-dependent phosphorylation of cRaf, MEK and ERK by small interfering RNA (siRNA) of EGR-1-mediated experiments.
EGR-1 siRNA also reduced 70% of GDNF/EGR-1-induced cRaf/MEK/ERK phosphorylation. 
Raf kinases are well-known as key regulators of the MEK/ERK cascade, and up-regulated signaling through the Raf/MEK/ERK pathway has an important role in various cancers 
For western blot analysis, samples were transferred to a polyvinyldine diflouride membrane by semi-wet electrophoresis and incubated with indicated primary antibody p-c-Raf (Ser259), c-Raf, p-MEK1/2 (Ser217/221), MEK1/2, p-ERK1/2 (Thr202/Tyr204), ERK1/2).
We confirmed the effect of HLC-080 on key mediators in the Ras/Raf/MEK/ERK signaling pathway.
The further analysis unveils that such effects might be induced by blocking the Raf/MEK/ERK signaling pathways.
Among the three mammalian Raf isoforms, B-RAF is the strongest MEK-ERK activator expressed in neuronal tissues and testis 
RTK signaling plays a critical role in tumorigenic processes, driving proliferation, survival, and angiogenesis through modulation of key downstream pathways such as PI3K/Akt/mTOR, Ras/Raf/MEK/MAPK, and others 
Pokemon knockdown inhibited the PI3K/Akt and c-Raf/MEK/ERK pathways and modulated the expression of various cell cycle regulators in HepG2 and Huh-7 cells.
Therefore, we aimed to determine whether Pokemon also regulates components of the (PI3K)/Akt and Raf/MEK/ERK pathways during the development of hepatocellular carcinoma.
In addition, we showed that PTEN, which is a negative regulator of Akt, and c-Raf, which is an upstream regulator of MEK and ERK, were affected by Pokemon knockdown.
We propose that Pokemon may regulate the PI3K/Akt and MEK/ERK pathways by affecting PTEN and c-Raf.
Previous studies demonstrated that Ras-Raf-MEK-ERK and PI3K-Akt signaling pathways can crosstalk, and reported that activation of Raf-MEK-ERK pathway by downregulated Akt in some cell types 
The small GTP-binding protein Ras regulates activation of several signaling pathways including Raf/MEK/ERK 
Ligands of the receptor tyrosine kinase-Raf-pathway, such as EGF, or PKC-activators, such as TPA, result in MEK1/2-dependent inhibition of GJIC [
Although it has potent activity against the Raf/MEK/ERK pathway, the therapeutic efficacy for HCC may involve other pathways.
One of the side effects of doxorubicin treatment is the induction of reactive oxygen species which in turn can activate the Raf/MEK/ERK and PI3K/PTEN/Akt/mTOR pathways 
The Ras-Raf-MEK-ERK and PI3K-Akt signaling pathways in macrophages are the most commonly studied intracellular transduction cascades.
In the Ras-Raf-MEK-ERK pathway, activated Ras (a single-subunit small GTPase) activates RAF kinase, which phosphorylates and directly leads to MEK (MEK1 and MEK2) activation; then, MEK phosphorylates and activates ERK [
EGFR signaling is well known to initiate signaling events involving the activation of the PI3K-AKT and Raf-MEK-ERK (mitogen activated protein kinases; MAPK) pathways 
For example, estrogen-induced activation of the Raf-MEK-ERK-p90RSK cascade was already shown to mediate protection of neurons against apoptosis via stabilization of Bad phosphorylation 
The Ras/Raf/MEK/ERK pathway is required for EC function during angiogenesis.
Of the array of signaling events activated in response to VEGF and cell adhesion, the Ras/Raf/MEK/ERK1/2 pathway is known to play a prominent role in EC function 
While being able to predict variations of ERK activation induced by KSR and MP1 knockout, our simulation also reveals that KSR synergistically enhances signaling via the conventional EGFR-Ras-Raf-MEK-ERK pathway.
EGF-induced ERK activation are collectively regulated at two different compartments (subpathways): near the plasma membrane (the conventional EGFR-Ras-Raf-MEK-ERK module and KSR-mediated signaling), and at late endosomes (MP1-mediated signaling).
To determine which signal transduction pathway was affected by sorafenib in the freshly isolated NK cells, we added specific signaling inhibitors for Raf/MEK/ERK, PI3K/AKT, or JAK/STAT3 to the NK and K562 coculture.
This pathway involves Raf, MEK (MAPK/ERK kinase), and ERK (extracellular signal-regulated kinase) and is considered to be centrally involved in cellular decision making processes where small quantitative differences often lead to major phenotypic changes 
Our results indicate that Golgi apparatus and GM1 polarization are controlled by distinct intracellular cascades involving the Ras/Raf/MEK/ERK and the PI3K/Akt/mTOR pathways, respectively.
The decoupling of Golgi apparatus and plasma membrane polarization appears to be the result of separate intracellular pathways controlled by Ras/Raf/MEK/ERK and PI3K/Akt/mTOR, respectively.
Both the Ras/Raf/MEK/ERK and the PI3K/AKT pathway are frequently mutated to constitutively active forms in many types of human cancers, and convey invasive properties 
Anti-CD3 or phorbol myristate acetate (PMA)-mediated MAPK activation involves the activation of Ras, leading to the activation of Raf-1 and the subsequent activation of MEK (MAPK or ERK kinase) 
Four kinases: syk, Raf-1, MEK-1/2 and ERK-1/2 exhibit reduced (A), whereas the other four kinases: lyn, PI3-K, MKK-3/6 and p38MAPK exhibited enhanced phosphorylation (B), upon increase in dose strength.
In the figures, V1, k3, (k5, k6), (k9, k10), V13, k15, (k17, 18,), (k21, k22) are syk, Raf-1, (MEK-1/2), (ERK-1/2), lyn, PI3-K, (MKK-3/6), (p38MAPK) phosphorylation rates, respectively.
(B) Raf-1 assay was performed on Raf-1 immunoprecipitate in the presence of GST or GST-14-3-3 proteins using recombinant MEK protein as a substrate.
We hypothesized that this might be related to up-regulation of the Raf/MEK/ERK signaling cascade or persistent pS6 signaling.
Ras activation leads to the recruitment and activation of the Raf kinase that can phosphorylate and activate MEK that in turn phosphorylates and activates Erk1 and 2.
Primary antibodies used were specific against ERK1/2, phospho(T202/Y204)-ERK1/2, MEK1/2, phospho(T217/221)-MEK1/2, Raf1, phospho(S259)-Raf1, phospho(S289/296/301)-Raf1, Lyn, Fgr, Slp76, pan-phospho(Y416)SFK, Vav1, GAPDH (Cell Signaling, Danvers, MA), c-Cbl (Santa Cruz Biotechnology), and phospho(S621)-Raf1 (Thermo Scientific).
Sustained activation of the Raf/MEK/ERK proteins is a long-known feature of RA-treated HL60, and direct inhibition of MEK (and subsequently ERK as well as c-Raf) using PD98095 has been shown to abolish RA-induced differentiation of HL60 
We investigated the Raf/MEK/ERK cascade and expression of CD38 binding partners after 48 h of PP2 and PP2+RA treatment in both RA-resistant HL60 cell lines.
However, PP2-induced c-Raf phosphorylation, despite a decrease in MEK and ERK phosphorylation, is consistent in that c-Raf has defined ERK-independent functions 
Phylogenetic analyses of MAPKKKs from maize, rice and Arabidopsis have classified them into three subgroups, which included Raf, ZIK and MEKK.
To examine the evolutionary relationships between different MAPKKK members in maize, Arabidopsis and rice, an unrooted tree was constructed from alignments of the full MAPKKK amino acid sequences using Neighbor-Joining (NJ) method by MEGA5.0 and phylogenetic analysis indicated that ZmMAPKKKs can be divided into three major groups: MEKK, Raf and ZIK.
A, MEKK; B, ZIK; C, Raf.
A, MEKK; B, ZIK; C, Raf.
Oncolytic influenza A viruses with deleted NS1 gene (delNS1) replicate selectively in tumour cells with defective interferon response and/or activated Ras/Raf/MEK/ERK signalling pathway.
Signal transduction pathways like the Ras/Raf/MEK/ERK signalling pathway or the PI3K/AKT signalling pathway may be stimulated by Influenza A infection and may play a role in virus replication and tumour cell survival 
Activation of the Ras/Raf/MEK/ERK signalling pathway during influenza infection seems to be important for the succesful replication of influenza A viruses in host cells 
Several inhibitors targeting p38 (SB203580), MEK1 (PD98059), B-Raf (PLX-4720 and GDC-0879) and JNK (SP600125) were tested.
Among the signaling cascades that are activated are the Ras/Raf/MEK/MAPK and the PI3K/AKT/RPS6K pathways 
This is to be expected, since apart from disparities in Raf/MEK/ERK activity 
Indeed, more than eighty percent of human melanomas harbor somatic B-Raf or N-Ras mutations causing constitutive activation of MEK1 and 2 
The activation of Met by HGF binding is linked to cell growth and survival, through activation of both the PI3-kinase/PDK/Akt and the Ras/Raf/MEK/ERK pathways, and to cell mobility and cytoskeletal organization via activation of the Rho-GTPases, Rho, Rac and CDC42.
Whereas plasma membrane targeting of Raf-1 activates the classical MEK>ERK (MAPK) cascade but does not protect cells, mitochondrial targeting of Raf-1 protects cells 
The role of Raf in cell survival pathways may explain why Raf inhibitors are performing better in the clinic than MEK inhibitors 
Activated Ras (GTP-bound state) activates downstream effectors including the Raf/mitogen-activated protein (MAP)/extracellular signal-regulated kinase (MEK/ERK), phosphatidylinositol-3-OH kinase/AKT, and RalA pathways to induce a range of cellular responses including proliferation, migration and transformation.
In order to examine how ERK1/2 activity is regulated by Brd2 in 3T3-L1 preadipocytes, the activation state of the upstream MEK regulators, the Raf family members, was evaluated in cells with Brd2 silencing or overexpression.
ERK activation is controlled by the upstream Ras/Raf/MEK pathway [
KSR1 is a molecular scaffold of the Raf/MEK/ERK MAP kinase cascade that regulates the intensity and duration of ERK activation.
KSR2, like KSR1, is able to regulate the Raf/MEK/ERK MAP kinase pathway 
(A) The Ras-Raf-MEK-ERK 1/2 signaling pathway is activated in HeLa wild-type cells after exposure to 0.5 mM SNAP or 0.5 mM H
Sorafenib is a multikinase inhibitor that acts on a number of kinases including Raf Kinases, MEK, ERK signaling as well as on vascular endothelial growth factor receptor 2 (VEGFR2), platelet derived growth factor receptor (PDGFR), FLT3, Ret and c-Kit [
It has been shown that Ras/Raf/MEK/ERK signaling cascade plays a central role in promoting entry into S-phase by indirect regulation of the expression of cyclins and the activities of cyclin-dependent kinases during the cell cycle.
Activation of receptor tyrosine kinases by growth factors and cytokines promotes cell proliferation, survival, and migration through activation of the Ras-Raf-MEK-ERK cascade 
Since activation of the Raf/MEK/ERK pathway is linked to both surface membrane translocation of the newly synthesized HA and apoptosis induction 
Activation of the Ras/Raf/MEK/MAP kinase pathway has been implicated in uncontrolled cell proliferation and tumor growth.
Both the Ras/Raf/MEK/ERK pathway and the PI3K/AKT pathway mediate signals from various growth factor receptors, and these two pathways regulate several common downstream molecules that are critical in cell survival and cell cycle progression such as forkhead transcription factors 
Roberts and Der (2007) used an EGFR-Ras-Raf-MEK-ERK pathway to explain that 10% of NSCLC arise from EGFR mutations and that 30% of NSCLC arise from mutations in Ras 
The biological effects of Ras family proteins are mediated through several different mechanisms in addition to the PI3K-dependent pathway; prominent among these is the Ras/Raf/MEK/ERK MAP kinase signalling pathway [
Insulin stimulates ERK1/2 though activation of the RAS, Raf, MEK cascade.
Purified inactive (unphosphorylated) ERK2 and purified constitutively active MEK1 (which phosphorylates ERK2) were used to reconstruct this module of c-Raf1-MEK1-ERK1/2 cascade 
The first report on the role of arrestins in the activation of c-Raf1-MEK1-ERK1/2 cascade suggested that only receptor-bound arrestins interact with c-Raf1 and ERK1/2, whereas MEK1 does not bind arrestins directly, but is recruited via c-Raf1 and ERK to the complex 
Although non-visual arrestins were proposed to act as scaffolds for the c-Raf1-MEK1-ERK1/2 cascade, their direct interactions with any of these kinases were never experimentally demonstrated.
To summarize, here we demonstrated for the first time that arrestins directly binds ERK2, determined the conformations of arrestin-2 and -3 preferred by c-Raf1 and ERK2, and showed that MEK1 similarly interacts with arrestins in all conformational states.
The authors are grateful to Dr. Robert J. Lefkowitz (Duke University) for arrestin-2/3 double knockout mouse embryonic fibroblasts and HA-tagged c-Raf1, MEK1, and ERK2 constructs, and Dr. M.G.
For instance, by inhibiting the action of a single molecule such as BRAF (B-Raf proto-oncogene, serine/threonine kinase), the entire RAF/MEK/ERK (Raf-1 proto-oncogene, serine/threonine kinase, mitogen-activated protein kinase kinase 1, mitogen-activated protein kinase 1) pathway will be tuned down, and as a consequence, collateral pathways including PI3K (phosphatidylinositol-4,5-bisphosphate 3-kinase) and RALA (v-ral simian leukemia viral oncogene homolog A (ras related)) will also be affected.
The immunocomplexes were then immunblotted (IB) with anti-LRP-1 beta-chain (5A6), anti-Ras (2006992, Millipore), anti-Raf (sc-166, Santa-Cruz) and anti-MEK-1/2 (sc-436, Santa-Cruz) antibodies.
Regulation of the ERK signaling cascade can occur at multiple levels and can involve Raf dephosphorylation, MEK1,2 phosphorylation, and also MEK1,2 dephosphorylation 
Many reports have demonstrated that the threshold of apoptosis in cancer cells can be controlled by the activities of multiple signal transduction pathways, one of which is Raf-MEK1/2-ERK1/2 pathway 
VEGFR tyrosine kinase inhibitor II (VRI), FGFR inhibitor (SU5402), EGFR inhibitor (PD 153035), non-selective eNOS inhibitor (L-NAME), Src inhibitor (PP2), P38 MAP kinase Inhibitor III (P38i), Raf kinase inhibitor IV (Rafi), MEK1/2 inhibitor (MEK1/2i), ERK1/2 inhibitor (ERK1/2i), PI3K inhibitor (LY 294002), HIF-1 inhibitor (HIFi) and three subclasses of Akt inhibitor (Akti) were purchased from Calbiochem (Merck, Germany), and each compound was dissolved in their recommended solvent, as per manufacturers.
Previous studies suggested that PI3K, P38 and Raf/MEK/ERK are crucial downstream signaling targets that are involved in VEGF and FGF-induced angiogenesis 
These scaffolds bring in closer proximity Raf isoforms, which phosphorylate MEK within the scaffold, which in turn phosphorylates and activates ERK1/2 [
ERK1/2 is activated by threonine and tyrosine phosphorylation by the dual specificity kinase MEK, which, in turn, is activated by Raf.
For example, in the proof-of-concept studies the inhibitors of Raf/MEK/ERK mitogenic kinase cascade and the IKK/NF-kB module reduce influenza virus titer in the lungs of infected mice after local aerosol administration into the trachea 
SFKs have been reported to activate the Ras/Raf/MEK/ERK pathway via recruitment of Shc and Shp2 proteins 
Phosphopeptides derived from proteins specific to the PI3K/Akt/mTor and the Raf/MEK/ERK pathways were significantly increased in neuroblastoma cells.
Phosphopeptides derived from downstream mediators of the Raf/MEK/ERK signaling pathway were more abundant in the NB10 cell line (
The major downstream targets of both IGF-1R/IR and Ret are the PI3K/Akt/mTor and Raf/MEK/ERK intracellular signaling pathways [
Specifically, our work suggests that combined inhibition of both the PI3K/Akt/mTor and Raf/MEK/ERK pathways may significantly alter neuroblastoma cell viability.
We attempted multiple times to express CSTA in keratinocytes using different expression plasmids (His or HA tag) but were unsuccessful possibly due to CSTA being negatively regulated by the Ras/Raf-1/MEK1/ERK pathway [
PKA can inhibit c-Raf activity, an upstream MAP3K to MEK1/2, which activates ERK 
Previous studies demonstrated that PKA inhibits Ras/c-Raf activation of MEK/ERK MAPK signaling 
Active Raf in turn phosphorylates and activates MEK 1/2 (Mitogen activated Protein Kinase-/Extracellular Signal Regulated Kinase-Kinase) which in turn phosphorylate and activate ERK1/2 (for a recent review see 
The reversibility of Raf/ERK induced chromatin remodeling was tested in time course experiments with the MEK inhibitor PD098059 
The compounds selected as hits do not induce osteogenesis via the same signaling pathways, however, most of them are somehow involved in either the Raf-MEK-ERK or the cAMP signaling pathway.
The PI3K/AKT and Raf/MEK/ERK are two classical cell signaling pathways and plays a key role in the regulation of cell gene expression, growth survival.
Abnormal PI3K/AKT and Raf/MEK/ERK signaling may lead to increased or uncontrolled cell proliferation, resistance to apoptosis and to chemotherapy, radiotherapy, and targeting therapies in tumors.
The activation of HIF-1 protein could be facilitated by PI3K/AKT and Raf/MEK/ERK signaling.
The PI3K/AKT and Raf/MEK/ERK signaling plays an important role in regulating tumor cell proliferation and survival.
To determine whether the BBR-mediated cell growth inhibition is also through the inactivation of the PI3K/AKT and Raf/MEK/ERK signaling pathway, we analyzed the effect of BBR on the phosphorylation of Akt and ERK in A549 cells by Western blot.
The PI3K/AKT and Raf/MEK/ERK signaling play a key role in the regulation of cell gene expression, growth survival.
The relationship of Raf/MEK/ERK and PI3K/AKT to lung cancer is still an intense research area nowadays [
RKIP is a small evolutionary conserved protein that was first identified as a physiological inhibitor of the Raf-MEK-ERK pathway 
Much of our focus has been on the PI3K/Akt and Raf/MEK/ERK pathways due to known implications in CLL cell survival and resistance to apoptosis.
H-Ras.GTP nanoclusters are the sites to which cytosolic effectors such as Raf are recruited and activated to relay robust signals via the Raf-MEK-ERK pathway 
One possibility is that the location-specific activation of MEK is controlled by its upstream activator Raf1.
Both Raf/MEK/ERK and PI3K/Akt/mTOR pathways are frequently activated in leukemia and other hematopoietic disorders caused by genetic mechanisms, playing an important role in the regulation of cell survival and proliferation 
PDGF stimulates both the Ras/Raf/MEK/ERK and the phosphatidylinositol 3-kinase (PI3K)/Akt mitogenic signaling pathways to induce vascular smooth muscle cell (VSMC) proliferation [
The MAPK/ERK (MEK) complexes are components of the Ras/Raf signaling axis.
The extracellular signal-regulated protein kinases (ERK) 1 and 2 (ERK1/2) signaling pathway is a cascade consisting of at least three families of protein kinases, including Raf (MAPKKK or MEKK), MAPKKs (MEK 1 and MEK 2), and MAPK (ERK 1 and ERK 2 or p42/p44 MAPKs).
It has been reported that in melanoma both the Ras/Raf/MEK/ERK (MAPK) and the PI3K/AKT (AKT) signalling pathways are constitutively activated through multiple mechanisms 
As the last downstream kinases in the Ras-Raf-MEK-ERK1/2 MAP kinase cascade, ERK1 and ERK2 are directly activated by MEK 
Upon activation, Ras recruits Raf-1, a serine/threonine kinase, to phosphorylate MEK (MAPK/Erk kinase), which in turn activates Erk1 and Erk2.
(B) Immunoblots to visualize the level of InR protein in cells treated with dsRNA to deplete Raf, D-MEK or GAP1.
Arabidopsis has more than sixty MAPKKKs, which can be divided into two subfamilies, including 12 MEKK1-like kinases and approximately 50 Raf-like kinases 
Interestingly, inhibition of cAMP synthesis by the knockout of the type 5 adenylyl cyclase (AC5) gene induced Raf/MEK/ERK-dependent stress resistance and lengthened life span in mice 
We selected two proteins that are known to inhibit EGF receptor signaling or Ras/Raf/MEK signaling.
If Ack kinase activity blocks apoptosis by enhancing signaling through the Ras/Raf/MEK pathway, then we would expect that Ack expression would be unable to suppress apoptosis induced by hid
In metazoans, the protein Ras, Raf and MEK act sequentially to activate ERK [
In the Ras/Raf/Mek/ERK (MAPK) cascade, Ras, Raf and, partially, MEK activation is localized to the plasma membrane, whereas MEK and ERK deactivation by phosphatases occurs in the cytoplasm.
Raf is a kinase that phosphorylates and activates MEK.
In the model, standard total concentrations of Raf, MEK, and ERK are similar to estimates for neurons (
Free EGF and Raf-, MEK-, and ERK-based species were treated as population species in the hybrid variant.
The subgraphs in the melanoma mutation network revealed featured pathways such as the Raf/MEK/ERK pathway and receptor signaling pathways (e.g., EGF/EGFR, FGF, PDGFR-beta signaling pathways).
We validated two important biological insights concerning network operation in the HepG2 cells under inflammatory cytokine and growth factor treatment: (i) identification of c-Jun as a downstream locus of crosstalk between growth factor and inflammatory cytokine treatments and (ii) the Ras/Raf/MEK pathway as an avenue for activation of key downstream proteins following exposure of cells to IL6.
In normal human and mouse renal epithelial cells, cAMP has been shown to inhibit the Ras/Raf-1/MEK/ERK pathway at the level of Raf-1 and to inhibit cell proliferation.
In the Ras-Raf-MEK-MAPK, one axis of the EGFR signaling cascade, an adaptor protein complex composed of growth factor receptor-bound protein 2 adapter protein (Grb2), which harbors a tyrosine phosphate-docking site, and son of sevenless (SOS), a Ras GDP/GTP exchange factor, then activates the Ras GTPase.
After activation, Ras (i.e., KRas) recruits and activates the serine protein Raf (i.e., B-Raf), and subsequent phosphorylation and activation of MEK and then MAPK occurs, resulting in activation of transcription factors in the cell nucleus.
Activated AKT (p-AKT), present within the cytoplasm, then activates various targets that result in cell growth, proliferation, and survival (paralleling the Ras-Raf-MEK-MAPK signaling pathway).
It consists of the Raf protein (MAP3K) that phosphorylates MEK (MAP2K), which in turn phosphorylates ERK (MAPK), the latter influencing transcription of different target genes.
B-type Raf kinase (BRAF) is a component of the RAS-RAF-MEK signaling cascade of the EGFR (see 
KSR2 is a scaffold protein in the Raf/MEK/ERK signaling cascade, where it functions along with its paralog, KSR1, to coordinate the interaction of these molecules to facilitate signal transduction and regulate the intensity and duration of ERK signaling (Dougherty et al. 
Ras family proteins function as a membrane-associated biologic switch that relays signals from ligand-stimulated receptors to cytoplasmatic downstream effectors proteins like phosphoinositide 3-kinase (PI3K) and Raf-MEK1/2.
The importance of the Ras/Raf/MEK/ERK pathway in growth control is further supported by the fact that hyperactivation of this pathway is usually found associated with many human tumors such as gliomas.
SIFT was utilized to characterize the functional significance of the nonsynonymous amino acid substitutions identified in B-Raf and MEK1.
B-Raf p.G464E, p.N486-P490del, p.V600E and MEK1 p.D67N were predicted to be deleterious substitutions causing an alteration of protein function, whereas B-Raf p.Q201H was predicted to be tolerated.
B-Raf has only two known downstream effectors, MEK1 and MEK2.
The corresponding protein molecules involved in those reactions include active Ras and Raf (RasGTP and Raf*), MEK, and ERK.
This activation of Raf becomes important for initiating the phosphorylation of MEK to MEKP through R19 (Note: reaction steps from R19 to R26 denote the phosphor-/dephosphorylation reactions in the MAPK module).
However, activated Raf is also quickly inactivated (R18) while it stimulates MEK phosphorylation (R19); in addition, activated MEK is also rapidly dephosphorylated (R22).
This is mediated by phosphorylation at Thr286 through the activity of the Ras/Raf/MEK/ERK cascade and the F-box protein FBXW8, which is an E3 ligase.
Our work shows that cyclin D1 is destabilized specifically during S phase in cancer cells and that increased degradation is mediated by phosphorylation at Thr286 through the activity of the Ras/Raf/MEK/MAPK signaling cascade.
This study has shown that the Ras/Raf/MEK/ERK MAPK signaling cascade promotes cyclin D1 phosphorylation at Thr286, resulting in ubiquitination and degradation of cyclin D1 (
Gene transcription patterns associated with activation of oncogenes Myc, c-Src, beta-catenin, E2F3, H-Ras, HER2, EGFR, MEK, Raf, MAPK, Akt, and cyclin D1, as well as of the cell cycle and of androgen signaling have been generated in previous studies using experimental models.
Here, mRNA signatures of oncogenes Myc, c-Src, beta-catenin, E2F3, H-Ras, HER2, EGFR, MEK, Raf, MAPK, Akt, and cyclin D1, along with signatures of the cell cycle and of androgen signaling, were collected from eight previously published studies.
The overlap between the Creighton erbB-2, EGFR, Raf, and MEK signatures had been noted previously 
The ERK1/2 system is constituted by a core component represented by the Raf-MEK and ERK1/2 kinases whose activation is controlled by the Ras class of small GTPases.
To evaluate the performance of the EKF for parameter estimation, we apply the EKF to a simulation dataset and two real datasets: JAK-STAT signal transduction pathway and Ras/Raf/MEK/ERK signaling transduction pathways datasets.
To evaluate its performance, the EKF will be applied to the real JAK-STAT and Ras/Raf/MEK/ERK signaling transduction pathway data.
The Ras/Raf/MEK(mitogen-activated protein kinase)/ERK (extracellular-signal-regulated kinase) pathway is a mitogen-activated protein kinase (MAPK) pathway, which is involved in proliferation, differentiation, survival and apoptosis processes 
To evaluate its performance for estimation of parameters in nonlinear state-space model of biochemical networks, the EKF was applied to simulation data, the real experimental data of the JAK-STAT pathway and Ras/Raf/MEK/ERK pathway.
The observed and predicted concentrations of Raf-1* in the Ras/Raf/MEK/ERK Pathway.
The observed and predicted concentrations of RKIP in the Ras/Raf/MEK/ERK Pathway.
Since our experimental data revealed the presence of positive feedback by ERK on upstream pathways, it was estimated that the cross-talk/feedback pathway structure of the Raf-MEK-ERK cascade might affect ERK activation dynamics in our cell system.
The inputs of the Raf-MEK-ERK cascade are the activated forms of Ras and Rap1, Ras-GTP and Rap1-GTP.
Since the Raf-MEK-ERK cascade is considered a core component of the signaling network, and Raf isoforms are key downstream targets of ErbB receptors 
The MEK/ERK pathway is critical to Epo stimulation-dependent erythroid cell proliferation and survival, which is mediated by the Grb2-Ras-Raf1 pathway 
Inhibition of MEK/ERK was achieved using U0126 (or inactive analogue U0124; both 5 uM), tpl2 (tpl2 kinase Inhibitor II; 1 uM), Raf (Raf Kinase Inhibitor IV; 500 nM), RSK (BI-D1870; 500 nM; Selleckchem, Houston, TX) and MSK (H-89; 10 uM; Sigma Aldrich, Poole, UK) inhibitors (all from Calbiochem, San Diego, CA unless otherwise stated).
It was previously shown that the Raf/MEK/ERK MAPK pathway is necessary and sufficient for the Dar response: hyper activation of the pathway by the over expression of constitutively active forms of LIN-45 (Raf), MEK-2 (MEK), or MPK-1 (ERK) results in tail swelling in the absence of infection (as we have shown for constitutively active EGL-30* and RHO-1*), while mutations in 
Previously it has been shown that a conserved LIN-45 (Raf)/MEK-2 (MEK)/MPK-1 (ERK) MAPK pathway is required for the Dar response 
We, therefore, investigated the role of the MAPK (Ras/Raf/MEK/ERK) and PI3K pathways in upregulation of EphA2 during 
Since we demonstrated that phosphorylation and acetylation of p65 was not responsible for the observed Salp15-induced modulation of cytokine responses, we set out to identify the mechanisms responsible for the Salp15-induced Raf-1/MEK-dependent decrease in TLR-induced pro-inflammatory cytokines.
This was completely restored using Raf (GW5074) or MEK (U0126) inhibitors.
Salp15 binds to the surface of immature DCs through the C-type lectin receptor DC-SIGN, which results in the phosphorylation of the serine/threonine kinase Raf-1 and subsequent MEK activation.
Silencing or inhibition of Raf-1 as well as inhibition of MEK abrogates the effects of Salp15.
Further analysis revealed that the Raf/MEK/ERK/Ets-1 pathway mediates Ras-induced reactivation.
Further analysis revealed that the activation of the cellular Raf/MEK/ERK/Ets-1 pathway is shared by multiple upstream inducers to trigger reactivation.
To explore the mechanism by which the Ras/Raf/MEK/ERK pathway reactivates KSHV, reporter assays were conducted on the RTA promoter in 293T cells.
We further investigated whether the Raf/MEK/ERK pathway also contributes to KSHV spontaneous reactivation.
Ets family transcription factors are potential downstream effectors of Raf/MEK/ERK pathway.
To examine whether activation of the Raf/MEK/ERK pathway leads to endogenous Ets-1 activation in PEL cells, electrophoretic mobility shift assay (EMSA) was conducted with nuclear extracts from BC-3 cells.
The effectiveness of this genome-wide analysis was validated by revealing the critical role of the Ras/Raf/MEK/ERK/Ets-1 pathway in mediating signals from the cell surface to the viral genome in the nucleus to reactivate KSHV.
Among these, the MAP kinase signalling cascade (Ras-Raf-MEK-ERK) plays a pivotal role and is essential for a variety of processes such as growth, differentiation, proliferation, survival and apoptosis in all eukaryotes.
In our previous report, we demonstrated that PIO treatment in PCK rats inhibited renal Raf/MEK/ERK and AKT/mTOR/S6 activity and reduced proliferation of diseased renal cells [
Four main cascades have been identified to date, of which the Ras-Raf-MEK1/MEK2-ERK1/ERK2 cascade (ERK cascade) is the
most prominent one in human cancers [
Ras-Raf-MEK1/2-ERK1/2 cascade.
The Ras/Raf/MEK/ERK signaling cascade appears to be indispensable for cell proliferation in a variety of different cell types [
Alternatively, Slik may regulate Raf- and MEK-dependent survival and proliferation independently of ERK.
The Raf serine/threonine kinase is a key component of the evolutionarily conserved signal transduction module that also includes the Ras GTPase, the mitogen and extracellular signaling-regulated kinase kinase (MEK), and the extracellular signaling-regulated kinase (ERK) [
In addition to canonical signaling through Ras-Raf-MEK, networked signaling pathways can provide alternative targets for manipulation of ERK phosphorylation.

('MAZ', 'MYC', 'increases')
MAZ (MYC-associated zinc finger protein (purine-binding transcription factor)) , also known as ZF87 and Cys2His2-type zinc finger transcription factor serum amyloid A activating factor 1 

('ATF2', 'FOXD3', 'increases')
To assess the possible role of FOXD3 in regulation of MITF we inhibited FOXD3 expression in melanocytes expressing control shRNA and shATF2.
Inhibition of FOXD3 expression increased SOX10 transcription and protein expression, albeit to lower levels compared with inhibition of ATF2 expression (
H3a human melanocytes cells were infected with Scrambled Control siRNA (siSC), shATF2, siFOXD3 or their combination.

('RUNX2', 'RUNX1', 'increases')
Similar to RUNX1, the strongest evidence for a pro-oncogenic function for RUNX2 comes from studies in lymphoma/leukemia models 
Our functional analyses were strongly indicative for similar roles of RUNX1 and RUNX2 in EOC progression, including implication in EOC cell proliferation, migration and invasion (see 
A. Venn diagram analyses of the differentially expressed genes upon RUNX1 and RUNX2 knockdown in SKOV3 cells.
B. Hierarchical clustering based on the 95-genes list (2-fold difference in gene expression; p-value cutoff of 0.05) that discriminates differentially-expressed genes in SKOV3 cells upon RUNX1 and RUNX2 knockdown.
C. IPA functional pathway analyses of genes, differentially expressed in SKOV3 cells upon RUNX1 and RUNX2 knockdown, based on the 95-genes list generated upon the clustering analysis.
However, we cannot completely exclude some common mechanisms of RUNX1/RUNX2 action in EOC cells, since both RUNX1 and RUNX2 knockdown leads to the suppression of the pro-metastatic gene p8/NUPR1 
Indeed, microarray data sustained RUNX1 correlation with EOC cell proliferation, migration and invasion, since RUNX2 knockdown resulted in reduced expression of genes associated with metabolism, cellular growth & proliferation and cellular movement, while a number of genes linked to cell death were induced (see 
Given the similar roles of RUNX1 and RUNX2 in EOC progression (implications in EOC cell proliferation, migration and invasion) and the fact that all three RUNX proteins recognize common DNA sequence motifs 
The present study also reveals that RUNX1 and RUNX2 employ distinct molecular mechanisms in EOC tumorigenesis despite evident similarities of their action on EOC cell phenotype and behavior.
Runt domain family, which contains RUNX1, RUNX2, and RUNX3, are main regulators of gene expression in cell proliferation and differentiation in human.
Runt domain family, consisting of RUNX1, RUNX2, and RUNX3, are master regulators of gene expression in cell proliferation and differentiation.
Using a novel experimental paradigm to distinguish between normal and PAC cells, we find that RUNX3 mRNA (but not RUNX1 or RUNX2 mRNAs) exhibits time-dependent increases in normal but not in PAC cells.
As examples, SIN-MLV integrations faithfully reproduced the MLV integration patterns in the LMO2, EVI2A/B, RUNX1, RUNX2, ZNF217-BCAS1, CD34, ELF1 and NFE2 loci, which were targeted at the same overall frequency and at the same hot spots within each locus (
RUNX1 belongs to the RUNX family of genes which includes RUNX2 and RUNX3 additionally 

('STAT4', 'STAT5A', 'increases')
We investigated regulation of all STAT proteins (STAT1, STAT2, STAT3, STAT4, STAT5A, STAT5B, STAT6) via qPCR after 60 min OSM stimulation in HCT116 cells (
Many of the induced transcripts are expressed in multiple immune cell types and contain binding sites for transcription factors known to be activated by innate signaling pathways, including NFAT (Arcn1, Arl5b, Ets1, Mll3, Npepps, Ppp4r2, Prpf38b, Smurf2, Stag1, Zch2), STAT1 (Csnk1a1,Ifih1), STAT4 (Bzw1, Ifh1), STAT3 (Zhx2), STAT5A (Bzw1, Cdc37l1,Ets1, Usp48), and ATF3 (Usp48, Eif2c2).
The STAT family is composed of seven members: STAT1, STAT2, STAT3, STAT4, STAT5A, STAT5B and STAT6.
First, the most reliable structure and position of the hSTAT1, hSTAT2, hSTAT3, hSTAT4, hSTAT5A, hSTAT5B and hSTAT6 SH2 domain and pTyr-linker interaction site was determined, with respect to their complete protein structure.
The IRF and STAT (IRF1, IRF2, IRF4, IRF7, IRF8, IRF9, STAT1, STAT2, STAT3, STAT4 and STAT5A) genes were seen to be differentially regulated following LPS stimulation and the peak of their expression was at 6 hours.

('GATA4', 'FOXD3', 'increases')
The iPS marker genes include OCT4, SOX2, NANOG, Oct4-Sox2, KLF4, FOXD3, ZIC3, ZFP42, GDF3, TDGF1, PBX1, and the differentiation marker include FOXA2, AFP, SOX17, GATA4, GATA6, T, GATA2, GATA3, hCGa, hCGb, CDX2.

('NF1', 'LEF1', 'increases')
For example, we found almost three-times higher GOs related to kidney development to be under positive Darwinian selection in the dolphin lineage, when compared to the cow lineage (genes such SMAD1, NPNT, LEF1, SERPINF1 and AQP2).

('AKT1', 'RAF1', 'binds')
We also note a number of interesting genes (number of samples in parentheses) that were amplified and overexpressed: AKT1 (2), ATAD2 (7), AURKA (2), BRAF (3), DERL1 (6), DNMTRB (3), ESR2 (1), FASN (3), TNFRSF12A (2), PSENEN (4), HIF1A (2), IGF1R (1), NEK2A (6), MCL1 (1), PPFIA1 (1), RAF1 (2), PRL (1), RXRA (1), SRD5A2 (1), SUMO2 (1), TYMS (2), UBA1 (1), VEGFA (1), WNT3A (2) and WNT9A (2).
Some genes in insulin and neurotrophin signaling pathways were present in the hub network, including IRS-1, PIK3R1, AKT1, FOXO1, SHC1, SOS2, RAF1, MAP2K1, MAPK1, MAPK3, RPS6KA5, NFKBIA, GSK3B, CALM1, and PLCG1, which are involved in glycolysis, cell survival, regulation of cytoskeleton, and formation of axon and synapse.
Regarding Dataset GSE3167, OPN (SPP1), VEGFA, p53, AKT1, KRAS, HRAS, cyclin D1, RAF1, and RKIP exhibited significant over-expression in BC vs. normal tissue.

('STAT3', 'YY1', 'increases')
ATF2, ATF3, BATF, BCL1, BCL3, BCLAF, BHLH, BRCA1, CFOS, CHD2, CTCF, EBF1, EGR1, ELF1, ETS1, FOXM1, GABP, GCN5, IRF3, IRF4, JUND, MAX, MEF2, MTA3, MXI1, NFATC1, NFE2, NFIC, NFYA, NFYB, NRF1, NRSF, p300, PAX5, PBX3, PML, Pol2, Pol3, POU2, PU.1, RAD21, RFX, RUNX3, RXLCH, RXRA, SIX5, SMC3, SP1, SPT, SRF, STAT1, STAT3, STAT5, TBP, TCF1, TCF3, TR4, USF1, USF2, WHIP, YY1, ZBTB3, ZEB1, ZNF143, ZNF274, ZZZ3
BHLH, BRCA1, CFOS, CHD2, CTCF, EBF1, GCN5, IRF3, JUND, MAX, MXI1, NFE2, NFYA, NFYB, NRF1, p300, RAD21, RFX, SMC3, SPT, STAT1, STAT3, TBP, TR4, USF2, WHIP, YY1, ZNF143, ZNF274, ZZZ3

('TCF3', 'RUNX1', 'increases')
The conventional nested RT-PCR and/or karyotype method detected 240 rearrangements in the 319 patients with leukemia at diagnosis: 61 PML-RARa, 39 RUNX1-RUNX1T1, 32 CBFB-MYH11, 4 MLLT3-MLL, 1 DEK-NUP214, 61 BCR-ABL1, 12 MLL rearranged, 14 TEL-AML1, and 16 TCF3-PBX1.
We validated GIPFEL for the five most common gene fusions associated with childhood leukemia (MLL-AF4, MLL-AF9, MLL-ENL, ETV6-RUNX1, and TCF3-PBX1).
for ETV6-RUNX1 and TCF3-PBX1 multiplexing was done for both rounds of PCR.
A collection was assembled encompassing 21 MLL-AF4, 16 MLL-AF9, 18 MLL-ENL, 60 ETV6-RUNX1, and 30 TCF3-PBX1 cases.
The top three factors identified by this analysis were NR3C1, RUNX1 and TCF3 (
In this context, the method identified several established regulators (e.g., NR3C1 and TCF3) of mammary stem cell biology, as well as a novel gene, RUNX1, which had not previously been implicated as a mammary stem cell regulator.

('BRAF', 'MEK1', 'adds_modification')
Very few cases showed any appreciable staining for three of the markers (BRAF V600E, pMEK1/2, and pAKT), but two cases were unambiguously positive for the BRAF V600E mutation, a finding confirmed by molecular analysis (data not shown).
Knock-down of BRAFV600E in these melanoma cells elevates basal pAKT and downstream signals, whereas knock-down of CRAF, MEK1/2 or ERK1/2 or treatment with a BRAF inhibitor have no impact on pAKT.
(A) Western blot analysis of AKT phosphorylation and PTEN in A375 melanoma cell line 24 hours after knock-down of BRAF, MEK1/2, ERK1/2, rictor, raptor, or combined knock-down.
The RAF (ARAF, BRAF and RAF1) and MEK (MEK1/MAP2K1 and MEK2/MAP2K2) family of proteins are critical downstream mediators of the RAS and other oncogenic signaling pathways 
NSCLCs have many driver mutations, including those in EGFR, HER2, KRAS, BRAF, PIK3CA, AKT1, MEK1, ROS1, and ALK [
BRAF mutated melanoma cells were more sensitive to fisetin treatment, and this was associated with a decrease in the phosphorylation of MEK1/2 and ERK1/2.
Activated BRAF in the MAPK signal transduction pathway propagates signaling by phosphorylating MAPKKs, MEK1/2 
Analyzing the evolution of the selected topology revealed a non-canonical architecture of the MAPK pathway in the A-375 melanoma cell line and a Sorafenib-mediated effect: while Sorafenib is a BRAF kinase and VEGFR-2 inhibitor and, thereby, prevents phosphorylation of MEK1/2 
We therefore generated pools of either HCT116 or IPC298 cells harboring inducible shRNAs that target, BRAF, CRAF, MEK1, MEK2 and PIK3CA either singly or in various combinations within the same line.
(C) Proliferation of CRAF, CRAF and BRAF, MEK1, MEK2 and double MEK1+2 shRNA expressing cells 4 days post dox treatment.
(C) Effect of expressing BRAF, CRAF, BRAF+CRAF, MEK1, MEK2 and double MEK1+2 shRNAs on proliferation of IPC298 cells 4 days following dox treatment.
Since, both BRAF and CRAF signal through their effectors MEK1 and MEK2, we sought to understand the effect of targeting MEKs in IPC298 cells.
Given the observed requirement for decrease in both pERK and pAKT downstream of mutant NRAS and the intense efforts to develop inhibitors targeting BRAF, MEK1/2 and PI3K in progress, we sought to understand if combined knock-down of RAF or MEK with PI3K would be an effective strategy for treatment of NRAS mutant melanomas.
(A) Immuno blot analysis of PIK3CA, PIK3CA+BRAF, and PIK3CA+MEK1/2 knock-down in IPC298 cells affects phosphorylation of downstream targets.
(B) Proliferation of IPC298 cells expressing shRNAs targeting PIK3CA alone or PIK3CA and BRAF together or PIK3CA together with MEK1/2 4 days after dox treatment.
To test the possibility that the combined targeting of RAF and PI3K effector arms would be effective in the NRAS mutant background, we generated IPC298 pools that inducibly expressed shRNAs that target either PIK3CA and BRAF together or PIK3CA along with both the RAF-effectors, MEK1 and 2.
As expected, upon dox treatment the cells showed reduced BRAF, PIK3CA or MEK1 and 2 protein (
Given that BRAF, CRAF, BRAF+CRAF and MEK1+2 double knock-down had an adverse effect on HCT116 cell proliferation and tumor growth, we examined the effect of targeting these genes on cell cycle progression.
This can be achieved either by combined targeting of BRAF and CRAF, PIK3CA and BRAF or PIK3CA and MEK1+2.
However, inhibition of MEK1+2 alone in the NRAS mutant line was not equivalent to inhibiting BRAF and CRAF together, as assessed by pERK and pAKT, suggesting the presence of differential signaling and feedback effects that arise from perturbing different nodes along the RAS/RAF signaling cascade.
Apoptosis in HCT116 or IPC298 lines expressing shRNAs that target KRAS or NRAS (A), BRAF (B) and both MEK1 and MEK2 (C).
Trametinib (a competitive MEK1/2 inhibitor) alone or in combination with BRAF inhibitor treatment has significantly improved the survival of patients with 

('MYC', 'NRAS', 'increases')
(A-E) Enrichment plots as obtained by GSEA software for the gene sets CROONQUIST_NRAS_SIGNALING_UP, positive control; IVANOVA HEMATO-POIESIS_MATURE_CELL; JAATINEN_HEMATOPOIETIC_STEM _CELL _UP; BENPORATH_MYC_TARGETS_WITH_EBOX; IVANOVA_HEMATOPOIESIS_INTER-MEDIATE_PROGENITOR.
For the PI3K family of inhibitors aberrations in NRAS, BRCA1/2 and PTEN mediate sensitivity while combinations with KRAS, MYC, and different combinations with PTEN mediate resistance.

('Ca2+', 'PKC', 'increases_activity')
An increase in the sensitivity of the contractile proteins to cytoplasmic Ca2+ via Rho kinase (RhoK) and protein kinase C (PKC) can also play a role in vasoconstriction.
Thus, the aim of this study was to determine the involvement of Ca2+ sensitisation in P2X receptor-mediated contractions of rat SPA, using the RhoK inhibitor Y27632 and PKC inhibitor GF109203X.
The activation of CCKR is associated with Ca2+ release, PKC activation, stimulation of PLA2, and cAMP production 
Additionally, estrogens could cause nongenomic effects by activating other signaling pathways, because they have been shown to activate multiple pathways in neurons including the mitogen-activated protein kinase (MAPK)/extracellular signal-regulated kinase (ERK), phosphoinositide 3-kinase (PI3K)/AKT, alpha-Ca2+/calmodulin-dependent kinase II and protein kinase C (PKC) pathways 
Three possible methods of regulating migration by MRP are the direct regulation of the cytoskeleton through actin, sequestration of PIP2 and thereby regulating PKC mediated cell migration and lastly, functioning as a reserve for Ca2+/CaM and therefore regulating its control of migration 

('RB1', 'MYC', 'increases')
Our data indicated that the G1/S checkpoint regulation pathway is one of the significantly down-regulated canonical pathways, as 46 of the 61 genes in the pathway, (ABL1, ATM, ATR, BTRC, CCND1, CCND2, CCND3, CCNE1, CCNE2, CDC25A, CDK2, CDK4, CDK6, CDKN1A, CDKN1B, CDKN2B, E2F1, E2F2, E2F3, E2F4, E2F6, GSK3B, HDAC1, HDAC2, HDAC3, HDAC4, HDAC5, HDAC6, HDAC7, HDAC9, HDAC10, HDAC11, MAX, MYC, PA2G4, RB1, RBL1, RBL2, SIN3A, SKP2, SMAD3, SUV39H1, TFDP1, TGFB2, TGFB3, TP53) were deregulated by butyrate treatment.
MSH2, MYC, MYOD1, NF1, NFKB1, TP53AIP1, KAT2B, PCBP4, PCNA, PPM1D, PRC1, PRKCA, PTEN, PTTG1, RB1, RELA, RPRM, SESN1, SESN2, SIAH1, SIRT1, STAT1, TADA3, TNF, TNFRSF10B, TNFRSF10, TP53, TP53BP2, TP73, TP63, TRAF2, TSC1, WT1, XRCC5.
MSH2, MYC, MYOD1, NF1, NFKB1, TP53AIP1, KAT2B, PCBP4, PCNA, PPM1D, PRC1, PRKCA, PTEN, PTTG1, RB1, RELA, RPRM, SESN1, SESN2, SIAH1, SIRT1, STAT1, TADA3, TNF, TNFRSF10B, TNFRSF10, TP53, TP53BP2, TP73, TP63, TRAF2, TSC1, WT1, XRCC5.
Our Wilcoxon rank analysis revealed correlations for expression and CNV for the oncogenes CCNE1, KRAS, MLL4 and MYC, while our methylation/expression per CNV screen significantly predicts the tumor suppressor RB1.
Panel A depicts the major over-represented network which has molecular relationships between some of the genes in code set and RB1, TP53, PI3K, PTEN/Akt, MYC, and RECQL4 interactions.

('MYOD1', 'MYC', 'increases')
MSH2, MYC, MYOD1, NF1, NFKB1, TP53AIP1, KAT2B, PCBP4, PCNA, PPM1D, PRC1, PRKCA, PTEN, PTTG1, RB1, RELA, RPRM, SESN1, SESN2, SIAH1, SIRT1, STAT1, TADA3, TNF, TNFRSF10B, TNFRSF10, TP53, TP53BP2, TP73, TP63, TRAF2, TSC1, WT1, XRCC5.
MSH2, MYC, MYOD1, NF1, NFKB1, TP53AIP1, KAT2B, PCBP4, PCNA, PPM1D, PRC1, PRKCA, PTEN, PTTG1, RB1, RELA, RPRM, SESN1, SESN2, SIAH1, SIRT1, STAT1, TADA3, TNF, TNFRSF10B, TNFRSF10, TP53, TP53BP2, TP73, TP63, TRAF2, TSC1, WT1, XRCC5.

('MYC', 'FOXO3', 'increases')
After 24 hours, E2F, MYC, FOXO3 firefly reporter plasmids along with renilla reporter plasmid (SA Biosciences) as internal control in a ratio of 40:1 were transfected using Fugene transfection reagent (Promega).
Furthermore, we found that FOXO3a-induced potentiation of hTERT gene expression is regulated in a c-MYC/E-box dependent manner.
In addition, we found that FOXO3a binds to the novel binding element in the c-MYC promoter, and this interaction activates the transcription of the c-MYC gene.
(A) c-MYC/E-box dependency of the FOXO3a-induced activation of hTERT transcription was assessed using luciferase reporters containing a wild-type hTERT core promoter (phTERTp-289) or a mutant hTERT core promoter (phTERTp-289EM).
(B) c-MYC recruited to the hTERT core promoter was increased when HUC-F2 cells were transduced with recombinant retrovirus that expressed FOXO3aWT or FOXO3aTM.
(C) FOXO3a enhances the transcriptional activation of c-MYC.
GAL4-c-MYC, pFR-Luc, and the FOXO3aTM expression vector were co-transfected into HUC-F2 cells, and the normalized luciferase activity was assessed.
(E, F) The effect of FOXO3a on the transcription of c-MYC was determined by normalized luciferase activity under the control of the c-MYC promoter (E) and by qRT-PCR analysis of c-MYC mRNA (F).
Subsequently, we investigated the FOXO3a-mediated increase in c-MYC transcription to determine if FOXO3a directly interacts and activates the c-MYC promoter.
Elements responsible for the FOXO3a-induced activation were determined using luciferase reporters that contain a wild-type c-MYC promoter (c-MYCpWT) or a mutant c-MYC promoter (c-MYCpUM, c-MYCpDM, and c-MYCUDM).
C, An increased amount of FOXO3a was recruited to the downstream region of c-MYC promoter when HUC-F2 cells were transduced with recombinant retrovirus expressing SIRT1 or FOXO3aTM.
The association of FOXO3a with downstream elements of the c-MYC promoter was assessed by the ChIP assay.
FOXO3a, a downstream target molecule of SIRT1, binds to the downstream FOXO binding element (DBE) in the c-MYC promoter and activates the transcription of c-MYC, which results in the increased transcription of hTERT gene in an E-box dependent manner.
In addition, we found that FOXO3a-induced enhancement of hTERT transcription is regulated in a c-MYC/E-Box dependent manner.
FOXO3a augmented the amount of c-MYC recruited to the hTERT promoter and activated the hTERT promoter through c-MYC-dependent changes in histone acetylation, which likely involves c-MYC-binding to histone acetyltransferases 

('HOXA4', 'HOXA9', 'increases')
Of these candidate genes, we found HOXA2, HOXA4, HOXA5, HOXA7, and HOXA9 showing underexpression with hypermethylation.

('STAT1', 'IRF1', 'increases')
TLR3-mediated interferon regulatory factor 1 (IRF1) expression was inhibited by SOCS3 overexpression in hMSC while SOCS1 overexpression reduced STAT1 activation.
The expression of SOCS1 inhibited JAK2/STAT1 signaling, while SOCS3 inhibited IRF1 signaling.
Our results showed that SOCS1 reduced STAT1 activation while SOCS3 inhibited IRF1 upregulation, which indicate that SOCS1 and SOCS3 each play a distinct role in regulating TLR3 signaling in hMSC.
This study established that in TLR3-stimulated hMSC, the transcription factor, IRF1 was upregulated, and a JAK2/STAT1 downstream pathway was indirectly activated following an induction of a unique cytokine expression profile, which we have previously described 
SOCS1 inhibits STAT1 phosphorylation and CXCR7 internalization, while SOCS3 inhibits IRF1 upregulation and the internalization of both CXCR4 and CXCR7.
Anti-IRF1 and anti-pSTAT1 (Ser727) antibodies were obtained from Cell Signaling Technology (cat#8478 and cat#8826 respectively).
Many proteins published in association with the immunopathogenesis of psoriasis were highly ranked hubs in PPI networks: IL1, IL8, TGFB1, SP1, STAT1, STAT3, NFKB1, IRF1 etc.
In many model systems, IFN/STAT1 signaling promotes anti-proliferation and pro-apoptosis predominantly through the transcriptional modulation of key components of growth and apoptosis signaling including IRF1, Fas, FasL, TRAIL, p21waf1, and caspase-2, -3, and -7 
This revealed STAT1, IRF1, TRIM22 and IRF9 as potential regulators, which were predominantly increased in IBM, but also present in many PM and several DM samples.
Programmed cell death 1 ligand 1 (PD-L1, CD274, B7-H1) is encoded by the CD274 gene on chromosome nine under the control of an interferon regulatory factor 1 (IRF1) and Signal Transducer Activation of Transcription 1 (STAT1) response elements within its promoter. 
Antibodies against IRF1 (BD Biosciences #612046), phospho-STAT1
To determine whether this GRA15-mediated activation of IRF1 is dependent on STAT1, we infected U3A STAT1-deficient cells 
The type II GRA15 protein induces IRF1 expression independently of STAT1 (
In cells exposed to inflammatory stimuli, IRF1 has been shown to be up-regulated partly directly and partly through enhanced STAT1 activation 
The IRF and STAT (IRF1, IRF2, IRF4, IRF7, IRF8, IRF9, STAT1, STAT2, STAT3, STAT4 and STAT5A) genes were seen to be differentially regulated following LPS stimulation and the peak of their expression was at 6 hours.
Among regulators of up-regulated genes we can separate members of several known signaling cascades: NFKB, angiotensin signaling (AGT, functional class angiotensin II receptor, chymase (CMA1)), TGF signaling (functional class TGF family, TGFB1, TGFB2, BMP2, functional class SMAD, SMAD7), and interferon gamma signaling (IFNG, STAT1, IRF1), suggesting that these pathways may be disturbed in dystrophin-deficient muscle.
p38-STAT1-IRF1 signaling positively regulates 

('PI3K', 'PDK1', 'increases_activity')
The phosphorylated form of PI3K then activates Phosphoinositide-dependent kinase-1 (PDK1.
PI3K signaling appears to depend upon PDK1 rather than AKT in several breast cancer cell lines harboring the H1047R mutation in PIK3CA, and thus it remains to be seen if a similar mechanism exists in the L3.3 model 
Membranes were blocked in Baileys Irish Cream (Dublin, Ireland) for 30 min and incubated overnight with primary antibodies (4E-BP1 (Thr37/46); Akt (Ser473); Akt; eIF4E (Ser209); mTOR (Ser2448); p70S6K (Thr389); p70S6K; PDK1 (Ser241); PI3K (Tyr458(p85)/Tyr199(p55)); Ubiquitin (P4D1) from Cell Signaling Technologies, Danvers, MA.
Immunoblot analysis showed that treatment of HCCC-9810 cells with 50% conditioned media from hUC-MSCs cultures led to the down-regulation of p-PI3K, p-PDK1
Binding of IGF to IGF-IR activates PI3K to generate PIP3 which in turn recruits and activates proteins that contain a pleckstrin homology (PH) domain, including AKT and PDK1.
Here we demonstrate that targeting PDK1 with the potent and selective PDK1 inhibitor PF-5177624 in the IGF-PI3K pathway blocks breast cancer cell proliferation and transformation.
The oncogenic activity of aberrant PI3K pathway signaling through PDK1 has been extensively studied.
PDK1 is downstream of PI3K and elevated phosphorylation of PDK1 has been associated with 
Foxo is a well-known target of the PI3K/AKT pathway and it is PDK1 that mediates activation of AKT downstream of PI3K.
PDK1 is a direct downstream kinase of PI3K and activates the membrane bound Akt protein.
Thus, after PI3K activation, AKT is phosphorylated in Serine 473 by mTORC2 and in Threonine 308 by PDK1 [
There was also no change in the abundance of both the regulatory and catalytic subunits of PI3K as well as its negative regulator, PTEN or in the abundance of total and phosphorylated PDK1 and Akt (
Of these, the phosphoinositide-3 kinase (PI3K) and the phosphoinositide-dependent kinase 1 (PDK1) play a critical role 
We identify a novel post-translational modification, mono-ubiquitination, of PDK1, which plays a central role in signaling via the PI3K pathway to control many cellular processes.
Upon activation, PI3K is known to induce Akt phosphorylation via PDK1 activation using PIP3 as a second messenger 
It has been demonstrated that HEK293 cells phosphorylated PDK1 induced by phosphorylated PI3K in turn phosphorylates SGK1 
These results show that in the oligodendrocytes of the corpus callosum, (1) repeated exposure to WIRS increases plasma corticosterone levels, (2) increased plasma corticosterone levels induce PDK1 phosphorylation, (3) upregulated phosphorylated PDK1 in turn phosphorylates SGK1, and (4) the increase in SGK1 expression is not induced by the activation of the PI3K pathway.
(B) The levels of phosphorylated PDK1 and PI3K-p85 were evaluated by Western Blot at indicated periods of AA treatment.
Using this transfection system together with a series of constitutive active mutants, we showed that the PI3K-3-phosphoinositide dependent kinase-1 (PDK1)-Akt pathway mediated the potentiation of insulin secretion.
These data suggest that the PI3K-PDK1-Akt pathway plays a significant role in newcomer granule fusions, probably through an alteration of the dynamics of the intracellular insulin granules.
Our results indicated that the acute inhibition of PI3K-PDK1-Akt pathway activated the motility of intracellular insulin granules and increased the glucose-induced insulin secretion by the upregulation of newcomer granule fusions.
Among the downstream pathways of PI3K, we selected Rac1, Arf6 and PDK1 pathways as candidates in the mediation of the effect of PIK-75 on insulin secretion because of the following reasons.
In the present study, we found that the enhancement of the glucose-induced insulin secretion induced by PI3K inhibitors was mediated by acute but not chronic inhibition of the PI3K-PDK1-Akt pathway.
The inhibition of PI3K-PDK1-Akt pathway selectively enhanced newcomer granule fusions in parallel with the activation of the dynamic behavior of the intracellular insulin granules, suggesting that an effector downstream of Akt would control the number of newcomer granule fusions by regulating the motility of intracellular insulin granules.
We observed that the potentiation of insulin secretion induced by acute inhibition of PI3K-PDK1-Akt was mostly due to the upregulation of newcomer granule fusions (
The potentiation of insulin secretion induced by the acute inhibition of the class IA PI3K-PDK1-Akt pathway was achieved by the increase in the number of exocytotic responses originating from newcomer granules, and the activation of the dynamic behavior of intracellular insulin granules could cause the upregulation of newcomer granule fusions.
Among these is the insulin receptor substrate (IRS), which is also phosphorylated by the IGF-I receptor, phosphatidylinositol 3-kinase (PI3K), phosphoinositide-dependent kinase 1 (PDK1), and PKB/Akt.
Primary antibodies against Akt, phospho-Akt, PI3K, phospho-PI3K, phospho-PDK1, phospho-PTEN (phosphatase and tensin homolog), caspase-8, cleaved caspase-8, PARP, ERK1/2, phospho-ERK1/2, and GAPDH, as well as horseradish peroxidase (HRP)-conjugated anti-mouse and anti-rabbit secondary antibodies, were purchased from Cell Signaling (Beverly, MA, USA).
Importantly, perifosine does not directly affect either activity of PI3K or phosphoinositide-dependent kinase 1 (PDK1) 
Consideration of PI3K/PDK1/AKT signalling pathway, as a point of convergence of growth factor-related effects on cell proliferation, as a potential new target for MMe therapy, led to the experiments reported here.
Tyrosine-phosphorylated IRS proteins bind to and activate phosphatidylinositol 3-kinase (PI3K), which increases phosphatidylinositol-3,4 (PtdIns3,4)P2) and phosphatidylinositol-3,4,5 (PtdIns3,4,5)P3) levels that, in turn, activate phosphoinositide-dependent kinase 1 (PDK1).
Moreover, the expression of p-PDK1, PDK1, PI3K, AKT showed little change (
An obvious candidate responsible for activation of AKT signaling is PI3K, because PI3K has been shown to activate both PDK1 and mTORC2 
In the stabilized PDK1-IFPC::IFPN-AKT1 complex, AKT1 T308 phosphorylation was independent of PtdIns, as demonstrated by treatment with Phosphatidylinositol 3 Kinase (PI3K) inhibitors.
The PDK1-IFPC::IFPN-AKT1 complex was sufficient for phosphorylation of known AKT substrates, and conferred resistance to inhibitors of PI3K (LY294002, PI103, GDC0941 and TGX286) but not inhibitors of the downstream TORC1 complex (rapamycin).
The PDK1-IFPC::IFPN-AKT1 complex provides a cell-based platform to examine specificity of drugs targeting PI3K pathway components.
(C) Translocation of the PDK1-IFPC::IFPN-AKT1 complex upon PI3K signaling activation or inhibition.
We further confirmed that AKT1 phosphorylation in the PDK1-IFPC::IFPN-AKT1 complex was independent of PI3K activity using the PI3K inhibitor, GDC0941.
Further, the constitutive activation of the PDK1-IFPC::IFPN-AKT1 complex in the presence of LY294002 allowed us to access its specific function in the context of PI3K inhibition, which abrogates endogenous signaling.
We thus determined whether the PDK1-IFPC::IFPN-AKT1 complex could promote cell viability, a major cellular function of the endogenous PDK1 and AKT, when particular PI3K pathway components were inhibited.
The expression of the PDK1-IFPC::IFPN-AKT1 complex, but not IFPN-AKT1 either alone or with IFPC-ACTN4, promoted cell viability in the presence of PI3K inhibitors, LY294002 and PI103, indicating the hyperactive PDK1-IFPC::IFPN-AKT1 was sufficient to increase cell viability in the absence of PI3K signaling (
The PDK1-IFPC::IFPN-AKT1 complex could also be used to examine if AKT1 activation is responsible for a resistance to drugs targeting non PI3K pathway mediated events.
In summary, we have employed PCA as a novel tool to characterize AKT1 phosphorylation by PDK1 and provided direct evidence showing stabilized AKT1 association with PDK1 by the reconstituted IFP is sufficient for AKT1 phosphorylation by PDK1 independent of PI3K and membrane localization.
Phosphorylation of GSK3 was blocked by LY294002 in cells overexpressing PDK1-GFP alone, indicating that PDK1 overexpression was not sufficient for the observed PI3K-independent phosphorylation of AKT substrates.
When we inhibited PDK1, which transmits the signal from PI3K to AKT, levels of phospho-ERM increased (mean p-ERM intensity: control 27.9%; PDK1 inhibitor 37.0%) (
PDK1 and Akt are recruited to the plasma membrane by products of PI3K, PIP2, PIP3 (phosphatidylinositol 3,4,5 trisphosphate and phosphatidylinositol 3,4 bisphosphate).
Loss of PTEN function, as well as PI3K activation (either by growth factors or oncogenic mutations), results in accumulation of PIP3 triggering the activation of its downstream effectors, PDK1 and AKT.
B16-F10 cells were pre-treated with different concentrations of wogonin for 24 h. (A) Effects of wogonin on the protein levels of PI3K and PDK1 were examined.
PI3K activity was monitored by detection of PI3K, PTEN, PDK1, and AKT phosphorylation.
The antibodies used were against: PI3Kinase p85 [Tyr458]/p55 [Tyr199], PTEN [Ser380/Thr382/383], PDK1 [Ser241] purchased from Cell Signaling Technology, Danvers, USA (CST), and AKT [Ser473] from Invitrogen.
(C) Effect of DACE on the phosphorylation status of PI3K and its regulators PTEN and PDK1.
PI3Ks form the lipid second messenger PI(3,4,5)P3 at the plasma membrane upon platelet activation and recruit phosphoinositide-dependent protein kinase 1 (PDK1) and AKT.
PDK1 phosphorylates AKT on Thr308 and AKT is subsequently phosphorylated on Ser473 by mTORC2, a key downstream mediator of PI3K-dependent signaling, resulting in maximal AKT activity 
Most prominently, activation of Akt is initiated by the insulin receptor (InR), relayed via an intracellular signaling cascade comprising insulin receptor substrate (IRS), class IA PI3 Kinase (PI3K), PDK1 and TOR complex 2 (TORC2), consisting of TOR, Rictor, Sin1, Lst8 and PRR5L 
Four genes of the PI3K and TOR pathways -PDK1, TOR, Rheb and Raptor- were among the positive hits.
To analyze which of the candidate mechanisms are active in our cellular system, we treated primary mouse hepatocytes with HGF in combination with specific Met inhibitor (PHA 665752), MEK inhibitor (U0126), PI3K inhibitors (LY294002, Wortmannin and PI-103) and PDK1 inhibitor (BX-912) alone or in combination.
To experimentally validate the model predictions on combinatorial treatments, we first performed single inhibitor treatments targeting PDK1, PI3K, Met and MEK prior to HGF stimulation and estimated the inhibition strength parameters for each individual inhibitor for model 4_8_12 (
Our model predictions suggest that the effects of intervention in one signaling pathway can be compensated by the impact of the other pathway, as in case of treatment with single PI3K or PDK1 inhibitor.
One comprises the nodes PKC, PKB, PDK1, PIP3, PI3K and IRS-P.
Ras also activates the PI3K-PDK1 (3-phosphoinosisitide-dependent protein kinase 1)- Akt pathway.
Alteration in specific components of the PI3K signaling pathway, such as PDK1, leads to an impaired transition from DN to DP thymocytes, suggesting an essential role of factors downstream of PDK1 in T cell development.
The Akt Inhibitor X selectively inhibits the phosphorylation of Akt with minimal effects on PI3K, PDK1, or SGK1 signaling.
The PI3K/PDK1/Akt/mTORC1 pathway regulates vital cellular processes that are important for viral replication and propagation, including cell growth, proliferation, and protein translation 
Abnormal activation of the growth-factor-stimulated PI3K/PDK1/PKB signaling cascade is a common feature in cancer [
PAK1 may induce MEK1/2 or ERK1/2 independent of RAF, as well as increase PI3K/AKT signalling by scaffolding PDK1 to increase phosphorylation of AKT.

('MYC', 'CEBPA', 'increases')
For qRT-PCR analysis, the following TaqMan probes (Life Technologies, Carlsbad, CA) were used: Hs00234592_m1 (hPPARG), Hs03929097_g1 (hGAPDH), Hs00153408_m1 (hMYC), Hs00160173_m1 (hPLIN1), Hs00269972_s1 (hCEBPA), Hs01086177_m1 (hFABP4), Hs00998133_m1 (hTGFB1), Hs00608224_m1 (hWNT2).

('ETS2', 'ETS1', 'increases')
ADM (adrenomedullin/progesterone biosynthetic process), CTGF (connective tissue growth factor/angiogenesis), CYR61 (cysteine-rich angiogenic inducer/patterning of blood vessels), EMP2 (epithelial membrane protein 2/cell death), ETS1 (v-ets erythroblastosis virus E26 oncogene homolog 1 (avian)/DNA dependent transcription), ETS2 (DNA dependent transcription), HMGCS1 (transporter 2, ATP-binding cassette, sub-family B (MDR/TAP)/protein complex assembly), IL1RAP (interleukin 1 receptor accessory protein/transmembrane receptor activity involved in the inflammatory response), ITGA6 (integrin, alpha 6/cell adhesion and calcium ion binding), KLF4 (Kruppel-like factor 4 (gut)/DNA dependent transcription and nucleic acid binding), KLF6 (Kruppel-like factor 6/DNA dependent transcription and nucleic acid binding), NET1 (neuroepithelial cell transforming gene 1/regulation of Rho protein signal transduction), NME1 (non-metastatic cells 1, protein (NM23A)/nucleic acid binding), ODC1 (ornithine decarboxylase 1/polyamine biosynthetic process), PIM1 (pim-1 oncogene/protein serine/threonine kinase activity), PSAT1 (phosphoserine aminotransferase 1/phosphoserine transaminase activity), RND3 (Rho family GTPase 3/cell adhesion), SGK (serum/glucocorticoid regulated kinase/serine/threonine kinase activity), SLC7A1 (solute carrier family 7, (cationic amino acid transporter, y+ system) member 11/amino acid transport activity), SPRR1B (small proline-rich protein 1B (cornifin)/epidermis development), TAF5L (TAF5-like RNA polymerase II, p300/CBP-associated factor (PCAF)-associated factor, 65 kDa/DNA dependent transcription), THBS1 (Thrombospondin 1/cell motility, adhesion in response to inflammation), TUBB3 (tubulin, beta 3/microtubule-based movement), TUBB2A (tubulin, beta 2A/microtubule-based movement), UGT1A6 (UDP glucuronosyltransferase 1 family/xenobiotic metabolic process).
ETS1 and ETS2 are members of the ETS family of transcription factors and are downstream effectors of the RAS/RAF/ERK pathway 
Given the high homology between ETS1 and ETS2 protein structures, we hypothesized that ETS1 could be compensating for a loss of ETS2 in driving 
ETS1 and ETS2 share high homology in their DNA binding and Pointed domains, and several studies have revealed that dominant-negative forms of these factors ablate 
In addition to the Ets family DNA binding motif, Yan/TEL1 and PntP2/ETS1/ETS2 all carry a second conserved domain, the sterile alpha motif (SAM; 
To assess further Mae-mediated negative regulation of ETS1 and ETS2, we examined the ability of Mae to prevent transcriptional activation of native Ets target genes by performing transcription assays in transiently transfected HeLa cells.
Two transcriptional reporters, MMP9-luciferase and dEts-luciferase, that contain Ras responsive elements (RRE) from the regulatory regions of the ETS1/ETS2 target genes MMP9 and MMP3, were assayed 
The activities and regulation of ETS1 and ETS2 were slightly different in the two cell types that were used for our analysis.
In S2 cells, we observed higher levels of luciferase reporter activation by ETS1 than ETS2 (
TEL2SAM was able to prevent Ras stimulated transcriptional activation of both reporters by ETS1 and ETS2 (
In conclusion, our work predicts that SAM-mediated interactions are likely to modulate the activity of mammalian TEL1 and ETS1/ETS2, as has been previously shown for the 
We would like to thank Dr. B. Graves for the ETS1and ETS2 expression constructs and the MMP9 and dEtsluciferase reporters, Dr. G. Grosveld for TEL1 and TEL2 expression constructs, Dr. A. Ghysdael for the E74tkluciferase vector, Maureen Cetera for subcloning assistance and David Doroquez and Jennifer Jemc for helpful comments on the manuscript.
ETS family of transcription factors including Elk1, ETS1 and ETS2 are some of the well-known targets for the EGFR-Ras-MEK1/2 signaling pathway 
In (A) External transcribed spacer regions (ETS1, ETS2), Internal transcribed spacer regions (ITS1, ITS2), the transcription start site (+1) and major rRNA processing sites of primary rDNA transcripts are indicated.
Therefore, we designed lentiviral shRNA vectors to permanently knock down ETS1 or ETS1 and ETS2 expression.
Mononuclear cells were infected with lentiviruses expressing shRNAs targeting ETS1 (ets1) or ETS1 and ETS2 (ets1/2) or the corresponding scrambled shRNA controls (scr1, scr1/2).
The data of the present study demonstrate that increased nuclear DNA-binding activities of ETS1 and ETS2 transcription factors are crucial determinants of diabetes- and high glucose-induced reduced number of VPC.
Inhibition of ETS1 and ETS2 expression counteracts the reduction of VPC number by enhancing endothelial lineage commitment.

('STAT6', 'STAT5A', 'increases')
We investigated regulation of all STAT proteins (STAT1, STAT2, STAT3, STAT4, STAT5A, STAT5B, STAT6) via qPCR after 60 min OSM stimulation in HCT116 cells (
Two Janus kinases (JAK1 and JAK2) as well as signal transducers and activators of transcription (STAT2, STAT5A and STAT6) were enhanced.
STAT transcription factors bind to similar DNA sequences, and the similar DNA binding specificity of various STAT transcription factors, such as STAT1, STAT5A/5B, or STAT6, have been experimentally proven 
Although there are seven mammalian STATs (STAT1-4, STAT5A, STAT5B and STAT6), numerous other STATs are commonly found in fishes or invertebrates, and the functions of these other STATs are also incorporated in this sub-classification tier.
The STAT family is composed of seven members: STAT1, STAT2, STAT3, STAT4, STAT5A, STAT5B and STAT6.
First, the most reliable structure and position of the hSTAT1, hSTAT2, hSTAT3, hSTAT4, hSTAT5A, hSTAT5B and hSTAT6 SH2 domain and pTyr-linker interaction site was determined, with respect to their complete protein structure.
Phosphorylation profile of STAT1, STAT2, STAT3, STAT5A/B, STAT6 was evaluated by magnetic bead-based multiplex immunoassays.

('DAG', 'PKC', 'increases_activity')
C1 region contains binding sites for DAG, phorbol ester, and phosphatidylserine, and for the PKC inhibitor calphostin C. C2 region contains Ca
When PKC is activated by phosphatidylserine, DAG and Ca
Since Titball's proposal of a PKC activation due to DAG generation by bacterial phospholipases C 
PMA has been previously shown to activate a number of intracellular signaling molecules which are sensitive to DAG generation downstream of phospholipase C. These include the classical and novel protein kinase C (PKC) family as well as a host of other DAG responsive molecules
It is well known that PKC comprises a large family of proteins, subdivided in three subfamilies: (i) classic PKC (cPKC), which are activated by calcium, DAG, phosphatidyl choline and phorbol esters; (ii) new PKC (nPKC), which are activated by the same compounds as cPKC, but calcium insensitive; and (iii) atypical PKC (aPKC), which are only activated by phosphatidyl serines 
DAG and DAG analogues such as PMA (phorbol 12-myristate 13-acetate) bind conventional and novel forms of protein kinase C (PKC) through a conserved domain called C1.
Prolonged exposure to DAG analogues can also negatively impact PKC activity through induced enzyme degradation.
Although early research on DAG and DAG analogues focused on their regulation of PKC family members, it is now clear that additional families of proteins exist with homologous DAG-binding C1 domains and that these families serve critical biological roles 
DAG analogues activate RasGRPs by PKC-mediated phosphorylation as well as by direct recruitment to cellular membranes 
Diacylglycerol (DAG)-mediated signaling pathways, such as those mediated by protein kinase C (PKC), are central in regulating cell proliferation and apoptosis.
Our group has designed a novel class of compounds targeted to the DAG binding site within the C1 domain of PKC.
C1 domains of classical and novel PKC isozymes represent the first recognized effectors for the physiological second messenger DAG and tumor-promoting phorbol esters 
The C1 domain is regarded as an attractive drug target because PKCs and other DAG-responsive C1 domain-containing proteins play key roles in controlling cell proliferation, apoptosis, and motility 
A strong up-regulation of an oxidative/respiratory burst involving the NADPH oxidase system, activated via the angiotensin-II and most likely the DAG-PKC pathways, occurs in kidneys of hyperoxaluric rats.
This is evident in lung cancer, where PKCs, mainly those isoforms responsive to DAG/phorbol esters (cPKCs and nPKCs), have been poorly studied.
It is a primary target of DAG and a downstream effector of protein kinase C (PKC).
In intact cells, PKD is directly phosphorylated by DAG-responsive PKCs on the two conserved serine residues in the activation loop of the catalytic domain, which leads to its activation.
P2Y2-R is a Gq11-coupled protein that is activated equipotently by extracellular ATP and UTP, leading to Gq-dependent activation of Phospholipase C (PLC), which in turn regulates calcium flux and Protein kinase C (PKC) activity by an Inositol trisphosphate (IP3) and diacylglycerol (DAG) dependent mechanism 
P2Y2-R is a Gq11-coupled protein that is activated equipotently by extracellular ATP and UTP, leading to Gq-dependent activation of PLC, which in turn regulates calcium flux and PKC activity by an IP3 and DAG dependent mechanism 
DGK catalyzes the phosphorylation of DAG by converting it to PA, thereby exchanging one second messenger for another and activating protein kinase C (PKC) 
Phorbol esters, such as phorbol 12-myristate 13-acetate (PMA) can substitute for DAG in stimulating classical and non-conventional PKC isoforms 
A hallmark of PKC activation is its translocation to the membrane where it interacts with DAG and becomes functionally active 
In our previous study we carried out a comprehensive analysis of genes controlled by DAG/phorbol ester-regulated PKC isozymes by microarray using a prostate cancer cell line as a model 
For the activation of PKC, DAG is necessary 
DAG activates PKC-
The intracellular signals underlying programmed cell death suggests that DAG activated PKC may serve as a negative regulator.
DAGs are signal molecules capable of increasing the activity of some species of protein kinase C (PKC).
PMA activates PKC because of its similar structure to DAG.
Phospholipase C (PLC) that hydrolyses phospholipids into different phosphate group derivatives and diacyl glycerol (DAG) constitutes a potential upstream mediator of PKC activation.
DAG couples to PKC and positively regulates PKC activity in various disorders such as diabetes and cancer 
Receptors and effectors, the best known of which is protein kinase C (PKC), mediate signaling by DAG.
PKC is a Ser/Thr kinase that mediates many physiological effects of DAG in vertebrates 
DAG released by the phospholipases C activates PKC to phosphorylate several substrates.
We used the diacyl-glicerol (DAG) analogue phorbol 12-myristate 13-acetate (PMA), which activates every DAG sensitive kinase, particularly PKCs and also PKD isoforms in a PKC dependent manner [
PMA activates every DAG sensitive kinases including PKC isoforms and PKD1 through PKC activation bypassing upstream activation-for example by VEGF.
Various natural and synthetic compounds - mainly diterpenes - are able to activate PKC isoforms by binding to its regulatory domain, mimicking the physiologic ligand diacylglycerol (DAG) 
Previous reports have connected DAG signaling through protein kinase C (PKC) to processes important in cancer progression 
Mitogenic stimuli (such as growth factors), through increasing the membrane DAG (diacylglycerol), activate PKC.
The PKC superfamily includes six isoforms with regulatory and catalytic domains that can be activated by 1,2-diacylglycerol (DAG) produced from receptor-mediated hydrolysis of inositol phospholipids 
Because DAG-mediated activation of PKC is one way by which PLC could modulate TRPV1 channel activity 
The structure of PKC has been compared before and after activation by PMA or DAG.
Protein kinase C (PKC) is a key modulator in cellular responses mediated by the second messenger diacylglycerol (DAG) and phorbol ester tumor promoters.
In the present study, our data clearly indicate that phorbol ester PMA, a potent PKC activator and an analogues of diacylglycerol (DAG), synergizes with bacterium NTHi to induce MUC5AC expression via cross-talk with TRAF6.
LPS, lipopolysaccharide; GEF, guanine nucleotide exchange factor; ROK, Rho-kinase; NO, nitric oxide; eNOS, endothelial nitric oxide synthase; iNOS, inducible nitric oxide synthase; GPCR, G protein-coupled receptor; PLC, phospholipase C; DAG, diacylglycerol; PKC, protein kinase C; IP
In fact, in addition to PKD, DAG targets and activates other proteins containing C1 domains such as classical and novel protein kinase Cs (PKCs), Diacylglycerol Kinase, RasGRPs, Chimaerins, and Munc13s 
(A) PKC translocates to the membrane via passive diffusion coupled with binding to the membrane phospholipid DAG.
Left column shows inactive PKC, middle column shows calcium bound PKC, and right column shows active (DAG-bound) PKC.
Experimental evidence shows that PKC presents low to virtually null activation at basal calcium concentration in the absence of exogenous DAG, the exact level of activation being dependent, among other factors, on the particular PKC isoenzyme and the substrate molecule considered [
The basic unit of the model is the 5HT GPCR (S) that once activated leads to the production of diacylglycerol (DAG), which is capable of activating and translocating PKC Apl II to the membrane 
The diacylglycerol (DAG) analog PMA was used to determine if PKC is involved in modulation of larval HR.
Protein kinase C is subdivided into 3 different groups: calcium-dependent diacylglycerol (DAG)-activated classical PKC (e.g.
alpha, beta1, and beta2), calcium-independent DAG-activated novel PKC (e.g.
delta and epsilon), and calcium-independent DAG-non-resposive atypical PKC (e.g.
Known indirect activators of the channels which bind G protein coupled receptors (GPCR) leading to activation of TRP channels via production of diacylglycerol (DAG) and activation of Protein Kinase C (PKC) by phospholipase C (PLC) are indicated on the left of the figure.
PC-PLC cleaves PC into phosphorylcholine and diacylglycerol (DAG), which is a potent activator of protein kinase C (PKC) signaling).
DAG is a potent second messenger, activating members of the Protein Kinase C (PKC) family.
The diacylglycerol- (DAG-) protein kinase C- (PKC-) extracellular signal-regulated kinase (ERK)
pathway is enhanced in mesangial cells cultured under high-glucose conditions
and in glomeruli isolated from streptozotocin- (STZ-) induced diabetic rats [
Given that RasGrp1 (and RasGrp4) is relatively abundant in mast cells, and activated by a combination of PKC-mediated phoshorylation and diacylaglycerol (DAG) binding, and in lymphocytes is the primary mechanism driving activation of Ras downstream of antibody receptor activation 

('HNF4A', 'FOXA1', 'increases')
Hepatic induction was achieved with as little as three transcription factor mRNAs encoding HNF1A plus any two of the factors, FOXA1, FOXA3, or HNF4A in the presence of an optimized hepatic growth medium.
Color chart representation of 100 bp sequences in 4215 regions with a wide range of HNF4A/FOXA1 binding constraints.

('LMO2', 'GATA1', 'increases')
TAL1 is a core erythroid transcription factor which assembles with GATA1, LMO2 and LDB1 in a multimeric protein complex during erythroid maturation [
Previous studies have shown that in erythroid cells LMO2 is usually present as part of a complex with the transcriptional regulators, TAL1, E47, LDB1, and GATA1 
The transcription factors GATA1, LMO2, E2A, LDB1 and SCL itself are known to associate in a DNA-binding complex in erythroid cells 
Histogram shows the ChIP enrichments obtained for GATA1, E2A (E12 and E47), SCL, LDB1 and LMO2 at +51 (black bars).

('HSF1', 'IRF1', 'increases')
(A) Dual-luciferase assays show the effect of several transcription factors (IRF1, MZF1, AP-1, HSF1, and Sp1) on miR-203 promoter activity.

('PI3K', 'FAK', 'adds_modification')
Activation of FAK then activates signaling pathways such as mitogen activated protein kinase (MAPK) and phosphatidylinositol 3-kinase (PI3K) pathways, altering the expression of cell cycle regulatory proteins and promoting proliferation [
Since FAK, ERK1/2, and PI3K/Akt/eNOS pathways mediate endothelial cell proliferation and migration during angiogenesis, we next studied whether these signaling pathways were involved in rCD93D23-stimulated HUVECs by analyzing the levels of phospho- and total protein of the cell lysates with western blotting.
FAK is located in focal adhesions and coordinates signals from integrins, cytokines, growth factor receptors and oncogenes, playing an important role in cell motility and survival through extracellular signal-regulated kinase (ERK), PI3K/Akt, MAPK and JAK/STAT signaling pathways 
Co-immunoprecipitated proteins were AMPAr subunits Glu-R1-3, NMDAr subunits NR2A-B, PSD-95, FAK, C-Src and GIRK1, not PI3K.
We first examined the dependence of OCCCs on FAK and the PI3K/AKT signaling pathway.
PI3K/Akt and Ras/Raf/MEK/ERK are the most well-known cell-survival promoting pathways engaged in mediating FAK/Src signaling by integrins 
Mechanistic analysis revealed that CTGF suppression activated FAK/PI3K/AKT and its downstream signals regulating the cell cycle, epithelial-mesenchymal transition (EMT) and MMPs.
Our study demonstrates that reduced expression of CTGF promoted cell proliferation, migration, invasion and cell cycle progression through FAK/PI3K/AKT, EMT and MMP pathways in NPC.
Our studies demonstrated that reduced CTGF expression stimulates cell proliferation, migration, invasion and cell cycle progression via FAK/PI3K/AKT signaling, EMT and MMP pathways.
FAK/PI3K/AKT has been reported as upstream signal modulating cell cycle, EMT, and MMPs signals.
We examined the effect of CTGF on FAK/PI3K/AKT pathway and found that reduced CTGF significantly increased the expression of phosphorylated FAK, PI3K and AKT, but not their total protein levels (
Reduced CTGF levels lead to elevated cell proliferation, migration, invasion, and cell cycle progression by activating the FAK/PI3K/AKT pathway.
Since the 3 activated signals (Wnt, PI3K-AKT/PKB, and MAPK signals) are located downstream of FAK belonging to the focal adhesion pathway, FAK 
Activation of FAK results in autophosphorylation at Tyr397, serving as a binding site for the Src homology 2 (SH2) domains of Src-family tyrosine kinases and the p85 subunit of phosphatidylinositol 3-kinase (PI3K) 
These adhesions can influence growth factor signaling in a number of important ways, including locally concentrating growth factor receptors and recruiting key mitogenic signaling intermediates such as focal adhesion kinase (FAK) and PI3K.
ON-TARGETplus siRNAs of FAK, c-Src, PI3K, p65 and control were purchased from Dharmacon Research.
(E) Cells pretreated with FAKi or PP2 for 30 min were stimulated by CCN1, p-PI3K expression rated by western blot.
(B&C) Osteoblasts pretreated with FAK inhibitor, PP2, Wortmannin, Ly294002, PDTC, and TPCK for 30 min or transfected with FAK, c-Src, PI3K, and p65 siRNA were treated with CCN1.
Src and other members of its family of kinases such as Lyn or Fyn, exert a key role in cell migration and invasion through multiple downstream mediators including STAT, CAS, PI3K, FAK, paxillin, and others [
FAK can activate CrK/CAS, PI3K and Grb2/Ras cell signaling pathways to regulate cell proliferation, motility, differentiation and intracellular trafficking 
Here, we report that the PI3K/Akt and FAK pathways are crucial for fibroblast to myofibroblast differentiation of normal and diseased primary human lung fibroblasts.
Moreover, we have validated that the signaling between GPR30 and phosphorylated FAK is indeed mediated by the EGFR/PI3K/ERK pathway.
In conclusion, we demonstrated for the first time that estrogen- and antiestrogen-induced migration of endometrial cancer cells was through GPR30 signaling and activation of EGFR/PI3K/ERK/FAK pathway in endometrial cancer cells (
Our current model of activation of the GPR30-EGFR-PI3K-ERK-FAK pathway by E2, G1 and OHT.
Increased adhesion complex assembly in OPN-treated blastocysts was mediated through focal adhesion kinase (FAK)- and phosphatidylinositol 3-kinase (PI3K)-dependent signaling pathways.
OPN binding to its cell surface receptors, including CD44 and integrins, initiates a variety of kinase cascades, including FAK and PI3K/AKT signaling 
OPN-induced blastocyst adhesion complex assembly is mediated through FAK and PI3K signaling.
OPN binding to blastocyst surface receptors (CD44 and/or integrins) initiates FAK- and PI3K-dependent signaling cascade by which integrins are activated.
OPN then acts on the trophectoderm cell surface to activate FAK and PI3K/AKT signaling pathways, which regulate the formation of functional integrin adhesion complexes.
Western blotting analyses of phosphorylated and non-phosphorylated PI3K, AKT, MEK1/2, ERK, FAK, SAPK/JNK, paxillin and p130Cas in (a) A549, (b) H3255, and (c) H1975 cell lines after a 24-h treatment with 100, 250 or 500 nM digoxin.
A recent study indicated that Src activation governs a variety of pathways, including survival, angiogenesis, proliferation, migration, and invasion, through a variety of proteins, including PI3K/AKT, STAT3, MEK/ERK and FAK/paxillin/p130CAS [
Other predicted off-targets of Nelfinavir, for example, IGF-1R, Abl, FGFR, EPHB4 and FAK, have similar effects to EGFR, again by controlling activation of PI3K and Ras.
These include the FAK, PI3K, Src kinase, and Rho GTPase pathways.
Because the PI3K/Akt pathway functions as a critical upstream regulator of mTOR signaling, we next determined whether the mTOR pathway was affected by the loss of FAK by examining the activation of two major mTOR targets, p70S6K and 4EBP1.

('NRF1', 'MAX', 'increases')
This set consists of c-Fos, CORESTSC30189, ELK, JunD, MAX, MAZAB85725, NF-YA, NF-YB, NRF1, POL2, RAD21, SMC3, TBP, and USF2.
ATF2, ATF3, BATF, BCL1, BCL3, BCLAF, BHLH, BRCA1, CFOS, CHD2, CTCF, EBF1, EGR1, ELF1, ETS1, FOXM1, GABP, GCN5, IRF3, IRF4, JUND, MAX, MEF2, MTA3, MXI1, NFATC1, NFE2, NFIC, NFYA, NFYB, NRF1, NRSF, p300, PAX5, PBX3, PML, Pol2, Pol3, POU2, PU.1, RAD21, RFX, RUNX3, RXLCH, RXRA, SIX5, SMC3, SP1, SPT, SRF, STAT1, STAT3, STAT5, TBP, TCF1, TCF3, TR4, USF1, USF2, WHIP, YY1, ZBTB3, ZEB1, ZNF143, ZNF274, ZZZ3
BHLH, BRCA1, CFOS, CHD2, CTCF, EBF1, GCN5, IRF3, JUND, MAX, MXI1, NFE2, NFYA, NFYB, NRF1, p300, RAD21, RFX, SMC3, SPT, STAT1, STAT3, TBP, TR4, USF2, WHIP, YY1, ZNF143, ZNF274, ZZZ3

('BRAF', 'MEK2', 'adds_modification')
The RAF (ARAF, BRAF and RAF1) and MEK (MEK1/MAP2K1 and MEK2/MAP2K2) family of proteins are critical downstream mediators of the RAS and other oncogenic signaling pathways 
We therefore generated pools of either HCT116 or IPC298 cells harboring inducible shRNAs that target, BRAF, CRAF, MEK1, MEK2 and PIK3CA either singly or in various combinations within the same line.
(C) Proliferation of CRAF, CRAF and BRAF, MEK1, MEK2 and double MEK1+2 shRNA expressing cells 4 days post dox treatment.
(C) Effect of expressing BRAF, CRAF, BRAF+CRAF, MEK1, MEK2 and double MEK1+2 shRNAs on proliferation of IPC298 cells 4 days following dox treatment.
Since, both BRAF and CRAF signal through their effectors MEK1 and MEK2, we sought to understand the effect of targeting MEKs in IPC298 cells.
Apoptosis in HCT116 or IPC298 lines expressing shRNAs that target KRAS or NRAS (A), BRAF (B) and both MEK1 and MEK2 (C).

('TFAP4', 'RUNX1', 'increases')
of triplicates; C: changes in firefly luciferase activity in mock-transfection and upon knock-down of TFAP4, RUNX1, CREB and TFAP4.

('MYC', 'LEF1', 'increases')
(B) Bar graphs showing fold changes of c-MYC and LEF1 mRNA expression by qPCR analysis.
(C and D) Bar graphs showing the target gene expression of c-MYC and LEF1 by qPCR analysis, respectively.

('LEF1', 'RUNX1', 'increases')
In the first class, oncogenes (RUNX1, FLT3, LEF1) or tumor suppressors (RUNX1, CEBPA) implicated in leukemia 
B: rs12722508 is bound by several transcription factors (upper panel) among them the RUNX1-CBFB heterodimer, although the sequence around rs12722508*A does not match perfectly the transcription factor consensus motif (lower panel); C: Quantitative SNP pull-down screen identifies LEF1 to bind around 8 times stronger to rs41295061*A.

('HNF1A', 'FOXA1', 'increases')
Hepatic induction was achieved with as little as three transcription factor mRNAs encoding HNF1A plus any two of the factors, FOXA1, FOXA3, or HNF4A in the presence of an optimized hepatic growth medium.

('GATA3', 'FOXA1', 'increases')
GATA3 and FOXA1 binding to ENH1 decreased by approximately two-fold relative to untreated controls.
The role of GATA3 and FOXA1 in the regulation of 
AIB1, FOXA1, GATA3), genes that have been implicated in endocrine resistance (e.g.

('NF1', 'POU2F1', 'increases')
snRNA promoters are characterized by an enhancer element (DSE) typically containing an octamer motif and a ZNF143 binding site (Z-motif), which in some specific genes has been shown to recruit, respectively, the POU domain protein POU2F1 and the zinc finger protein ZNF143 (see 
Spearman correlations of scores for genes occupied by ZNF143, POU2F1, and GABP.
Summary of the occupancy scores for ZNF143, POU2F1, and GABPA for the same genomic loci as in 

('POU6F1', 'EN1', 'increases')
As an intuitive insight into the gain and loss of activities during HSC progression, we found that downregulation of Class A in ST-HSC relative to LT-HSC was accompanied by a gain of negative RCs in ST-HSC (e.g., CKROX, GABP, C/EBPdelta, and myogenin/NF-1) and by a loss of positive RCs in LT-HSC (e.g., IRF-2, HEN1, POU6F1, and RBP-jkappa).

('TCF4', 'LEF1', 'increases')
In order to measure TCF4/LEF1-dependent transcriptional activity of 293FT cell lines, cells were transfected with TOP/FOP flash reporter plasmids.
Fold induction is shown relative to reporter vector alone, in response to chimeric proteins harboring the Cdx1 N terminus fused to LEF1 or TCF4 DNA binding domains (Cdx1-LEF1 HMG, Cdx1-TCF4 HMG, respectively) or analogous constructs using the Cdx2 N terminus (Cdx2-LEF1 HMG, Cdx2-TCF4 HMG).
The mammalian T-cell factor (TCF) family is composed of four members (TCF1, LEF1, TCF3 and TCF4 [
T-cell factors and lymphoid enhancer factor (TCF/LEF) constitute a family of highly conserved transcriptional regulators that is comprised of four members in humans: TCF1, LEF1, TCF3 and TCF4 (gene symbols 
To investigate the potential acetylation of different vertebrate TCF/LEF family members, LEF1, the TCF1E splice form, TCF3 and the TCF4E2 splice form were co-expressed with the acetyl-transferases p300 and CBP in HEK293 cells.
Expression vectors for HA-tagged versions of LEF1, TCF1E, TCF3 and TCF4E2 were transfected into HEK293 cells in the presence or absence of expression vectors for the acetyl-transferases p300 or CBP as indicated.
(A) mRNA expression of TCF1, LEF1, TCF3 and TCF4 in two different passages of canine mammary cell lines normalized to the expression of Rps19.
More and more frequently it seems that TCF1 and LEF1 operate by opposing TCF3/TCF4 repression and providing strong activation.
Since TCF1 and LEF1 are strongly active for ATF2 engagement and cooperation, and TCF4 is not, ATFs could be important players in the push-and-pull between family members.
(F) Effects of DN-TCF4 induction in Ramos cells on the expression of LEF1 and Axin 2 by quantitative real-time PCR.
(A) Empty pcDNA3HA vector or increasing amounts of HA-tagged TCF1, LEF1 or TCF4 constructs were co-transfected with SuperTop or SuperFop and renilla luciferase plasmids in 293T cells and the Top/Fop ratio was calculated.
We established that both TCF1 and LEF1 interact with ATF2 transcription factors to promote TCF/LEF activity, and inhibition of such activity using either DN-TCF4 or shATF2/7 decreased the expression of Wnt target genes, as well as lymphoma cell growth.
(C) Empty vector, TCF1, LEF1 or TCF4 constructs were co-transfected with SuperTop or SuperFop and renilla luciferase plasmids in 293T cells and the Top/Fop ratio was calculated.

('NF1', 'SRF', 'increases')
ATF2, ATF3, BATF, BCL1, BCL3, BCLAF, BHLH, BRCA1, CFOS, CHD2, CTCF, EBF1, EGR1, ELF1, ETS1, FOXM1, GABP, GCN5, IRF3, IRF4, JUND, MAX, MEF2, MTA3, MXI1, NFATC1, NFE2, NFIC, NFYA, NFYB, NRF1, NRSF, p300, PAX5, PBX3, PML, Pol2, Pol3, POU2, PU.1, RAD21, RFX, RUNX3, RXLCH, RXRA, SIX5, SMC3, SP1, SPT, SRF, STAT1, STAT3, STAT5, TBP, TCF1, TCF3, TR4, USF1, USF2, WHIP, YY1, ZBTB3, ZEB1, ZNF143, ZNF274, ZZZ3

('MYCN', 'MAX', 'increases')
This result suggests that higher MAX levels are associated to improved patient prognosis in patients with high risk, MYCN non-amplified metastatic neuroblastoma.
To address whether MAX expression could affect neuroblastoma by activating a differentiation pathway, we have analyzed a dataset of MYCN non-amplified neuroblastoma cells SH-SY5Y subjected to a differentiation protocol.
This data makes us believe that MAX is one the late effectors SH-SY5Y differentiation, suggesting that its expression is implicated in favorable outcomes for MYCN non-amplified neuroblastoma patients by means of enhancing cell differentiation and/or impairing proliferation.
We have previously shown that this compound interferes with the MYCN/MAX interaction leading to cell cycle arrest, apoptosis, and neuronal differentiation in 
In our previous study we observed a reduction in MYCN/MAX interaction after treatment with 10058-F4 
A) Proximity ligation assay (PLA) for MYCN/MAX interaction after treatment of SMS-KCN69n cells with the different small molecules at the indicated concentrations for 6 hours.
Green signals represent the proximity of the MYCN and MAX proteins, while the red signal shows the total MYCN signal in the cell.
10058-F4, #474 and #764 were also able to decrease the interaction of MYCN and MAX as analyzed in a proximity ligation assay, whereas 7RH did not.
Taken together, these experiments suggest that the full biological effects of MYC inhibiting compounds are most apparent not only when the binding between MYCN and MAX is inhibited but when the levels of MYCN protein are reduced as well.

('PI3K', 'AKT1', 'adds_modification')
Aberrant expression of PI3K and AKT1 genes or loss of PTEN tumor suppression gene leads to downstream upregulation of mTOR and tumorigenesis.
It is also highly interconnected with the target-of-rapamycin (TOR) pathway, mainly mediated through CHICO, PI3K and AKT1 in the IIS and the TSC-complex, L (LOBE), TOR-C2 and S6K in the TOR pathway.
CSF2-induced phosphorylation of AKT1 was inhibited completely by the PI3K inhibitor (
[A] The effects of the PI3K inhibitor (LY294002) and MAPK inhibitor (U0126) on CSF2-induced p-AKT1 proteins.
To confirm whether PI3K-AKT1 and ERK1/2 MAPK signal transduction pathways are involved in CSF2-induced stimulation of pTr cell proliferation, cell proliferation assays were conducted in the presence or absence of CSF2 (20 ng/ml), U0126 and LY294002.
Results of the present study indicate a key role for CSF2 in stimulating proliferation of pTr cells via the PI3K-AKT1-dependent ERK1/2 MAPK cell signaling cascade.
However, the PI3K specific inhibitor (LY294002) inhibited CSF2-induced phosphorylation of ERK1/2 and MTOR as well as CSF2-induced phosphorylation of AKT1.
These results indicate that ERK1/2 MAPK cell signaling is activated by the PI3K-AKT1 pathway in response to CSF2 and that MTOR protein is a common downstream target for phosphorylation and for cross-talk between these two cell signaling cascades.
Three proteins (AKT1, p70S6K and 4E-BP1) involved in PI3K/AKT/mTOR signaling were assayed for this study.
AKT is recruited to the plasma membrane via interactions with the products of PI3K and is subsequently phosphorylated on two sites, T308 and S473 in AKT1, which results in kinase activation.
For instance: (1) STAT3 is not activated by TGFA; (2) Phosphorylation of the autocatalytic domain of P70S6 (termed P70S6K in the model) is independent of ERK1; (3) The activation of CREB1 in response to TGFA is likely to be caused by a MEK1 independent route; (4) Phosphorylation of AKT1 is regulated to PI3K activity; and (5) The activation of MEK1 and ERK1 is dependent to MAP3K activation.
We have previously reported that NRG1-stimulated migration of B lymphoblasts is PI3K-AKT1dependent and impaired in patients with schizophrenia and significantly linked to the catechol-o-methyltransferase (COMT) Val108/158Met functional polymorphism.
Since SH-SY5Y cells also migrate in response to NRG1 in a PI3K/AKT1-dependent manner, the SH-SY5Y-COMT transfection system is suited for this experiment.
As with other chemokine-stimulated migratory responses, activation of AKT1is essential for NRG1-stimulated cell adhesion and migration in B lymphoblasts, evidenced by the severe attenuation of adhesion and migration by PI3K or AKT1 inhibition in these cells 
In conclusion, these data show that GDC-0941 has broad anti-proliferative activity amongst many tumor types represented in the NCI-60 cell panel, suggesting its clinical utility against multiple tumor types, and that a number of tumor cell lines with activated AKT1 are highly sensitive to inhibition of PI3K with GDC-0941.
Taken together, these results suggest that the miR-99 family plays an important role in dermal wound healing by concurrently targeting IGF1R, mTOR, and AKT1 (as well as AKT2, to a lesser extent), which in turn modulate the PI3K/AKT and mTOR signaling pathways.
We further demonstrated that inhibition of AKT1, mTORC1, mTORC2 and PI3K reduced CA916798 expression, while overexpression of AKT1 augmented CA916798 expression.
Additionally we focus on HER2 due to the HER2+ status of the cell lines, PIK3CA due to the known mutation in HCC1954, as well as MAPK1 and AKT1 as main players in the MAPK and PI3K/AKT pathway, respectively. 
In the stabilized PDK1-IFPC::IFPN-AKT1 complex, AKT1 T308 phosphorylation was independent of PtdIns, as demonstrated by treatment with Phosphatidylinositol 3 Kinase (PI3K) inhibitors.
The PDK1-IFPC::IFPN-AKT1 complex was sufficient for phosphorylation of known AKT substrates, and conferred resistance to inhibitors of PI3K (LY294002, PI103, GDC0941 and TGX286) but not inhibitors of the downstream TORC1 complex (rapamycin).
The PDK1-IFPC::IFPN-AKT1 complex provides a cell-based platform to examine specificity of drugs targeting PI3K pathway components.
(C) Translocation of the PDK1-IFPC::IFPN-AKT1 complex upon PI3K signaling activation or inhibition.
(B) The reconstituted IFP is indispensable for the PI3K-independent IFPN-AKT1 phosphorylation.
We further confirmed that AKT1 phosphorylation in the PDK1-IFPC::IFPN-AKT1 complex was independent of PI3K activity using the PI3K inhibitor, GDC0941.
Further, the constitutive activation of the PDK1-IFPC::IFPN-AKT1 complex in the presence of LY294002 allowed us to access its specific function in the context of PI3K inhibition, which abrogates endogenous signaling.
We thus determined whether the PDK1-IFPC::IFPN-AKT1 complex could promote cell viability, a major cellular function of the endogenous PDK1 and AKT, when particular PI3K pathway components were inhibited.
The expression of the PDK1-IFPC::IFPN-AKT1 complex, but not IFPN-AKT1 either alone or with IFPC-ACTN4, promoted cell viability in the presence of PI3K inhibitors, LY294002 and PI103, indicating the hyperactive PDK1-IFPC::IFPN-AKT1 was sufficient to increase cell viability in the absence of PI3K signaling (
The PDK1-IFPC::IFPN-AKT1 complex could also be used to examine if AKT1 activation is responsible for a resistance to drugs targeting non PI3K pathway mediated events.
In summary, we have employed PCA as a novel tool to characterize AKT1 phosphorylation by PDK1 and provided direct evidence showing stabilized AKT1 association with PDK1 by the reconstituted IFP is sufficient for AKT1 phosphorylation by PDK1 independent of PI3K and membrane localization.
As a read-out of PI3K/AKT signalling in NSCLC we determined the phosphorylation status of residue S473 of AKT1 (pAKT).
In addition, this manuscript provides novel experimental evidence to the observation that SCCs and ADCs develop by different genetic alterations: i) mutations in PIK3CA and AKT1 (3% altogether) were detected only in SCCs [this manuscript; 24] whereas KRAS mutations were observed in ADCs (19%); ii) SCC patients (85%) presented at least one genetic alteration in PI3KCA, AKT1, AKT2 or PTEN more frequently than ADC patients (50%); iii) PIK3CA copy gains occurred more frequently in SCCs (25%) than in ADCs (9%) as described previously 
FISH analysis indicated that gene amplification of PIK3CA, AKT1 and AKT2 (but not of PI3KR1) and the loss of PTEN are common and may account for changes in the expression of the corresponding proteins.
As a read-out of PI3K/AKT signalling in OC from Italian patients we determined the phosphorylation status of aminoacid S473 of AKT1 (pAKT).
To investigate the molecular mechanisms leading to AKT activation in Italian patients affected by OC we performed a comprehensive analysis of the expression and/or the genetic status of AKT1 and AKT2 and their closest regulators (KRAS, PI3K and PTEN).
Loss of PTEN, PI3K mutation, AKT1 and AKT2 amplification may activate AKT kinase.
This regulation depends on IIS through the evolutionarily conserved pathway including dInR, the insulin receptor substrate Chico, PI3K and AKT1 
To determine the molecular mechanism of differential impact of CR on insulin sensitivity in normal mice and GHRKO mice, we evaluated insulin signal transduction through the IR/IRS/PI3K/AKT1/AKT2 pathway in liver and skeletal muscle in normal and GHRKO mice fed AL or subjected to CR for one year in response to an insulin challenge (10 IU/kg insulin versus saline).
An important downstream target of the insulin/PI3K signaling cascade is protein kinase B (AKT1).
A central node in PI3K downstream signalling is controlled by the serine-threonine kinase AKT1.
The activation of AKT1 occurs through phosphatidylinositol 3-kinase (PI3K).

('YY1', 'POU2F1', 'increases')
A single nucleotide mutation (4q32 A>C) affects the binding of transcription factors POU2F1 (also called OCT1) and YY1 to a DNA motif in the enhancer and significantly alters the luciferase reporter activity.
(B) ChIP assay for transcription factors POU2F1 and YY1 using antibodies against POU2F1 and YY1 in lymphoblastoid cell lines.
To validate the binding of POU2F1 and YY1 to the enhancer and the disruption of POU2F1 occupancy at the mutated C-allele, we performed ChIP assays and found that the POU2F1 binding was enhanced in the presence of the wild type A/A genotype in a control cell line whereas the binding was significantly reduced in a heterozygous A/C patient cell line (

('STAT3', 'IRF1', 'increases')
MDA cells were transiently transfected with a reporter plasmid containing a STAT3-binding SIE-fragment of the promoter region of mouse IRF1 gene (p2xSIE-Luc) in serum-free medium 
There were 27 TRs identified after Cd exposure and 17 following Cr exposure, with eight in common for both metals (RELA, MYC, MYCN, BRCA1, IRF1, IRF7, TRIM24, and STAT3; 
Multiple inflammation-related TRs, such as STAT3, IRF1, IRF7, and TRIM24 were activated or inhibited, and their activation state is the same after exposure to either metal.
The transcription factors STAT3, IRF1, and IRF7 are mediators of the acute phase inflammatory response [
Many proteins published in association with the immunopathogenesis of psoriasis were highly ranked hubs in PPI networks: IL1, IL8, TGFB1, SP1, STAT1, STAT3, NFKB1, IRF1 etc.
Interestingly, there were eleven transcription regulators (ARID5B, EPAS1, GATA3, IRF1, IRF7, IRF9, LEF1, SP100, STAT3, TRIM22, XBP1) among the detected genes, seven of which (64%; EPAS1, IRF1, IRF7, IRF9, LEF1, STAT3, XBP1) corresponded to transcription factor motifs recently identified as enriched in lineage-specific enhancers compared to random locations in genome (
The IRF and STAT (IRF1, IRF2, IRF4, IRF7, IRF8, IRF9, STAT1, STAT2, STAT3, STAT4 and STAT5A) genes were seen to be differentially regulated following LPS stimulation and the peak of their expression was at 6 hours.
Ischemia is a known stimulator of
many transcription factors including hypoxia inducible factor-1 (HIF1), signal
transducer and activator of transcription-3 (STAT3),
early growth response-1 (Egr1), nuclear factor (erythroid-derived 2)-like 2 (Nrf2), interferon
regulatory factor-1 (IRF1), activating
transcription factor-3 (ATF3), cAMP response element binding protein (CREB), cAMP response element modulator (CREM), and
nuclear factor-kappa B (NF-

('JUN', 'RUNX1', 'increases')
Moreover, to drive early differentiation gene expression RUNX1 directly up-regulated the expression of the AP-1 factors FOS, FOSB and JUN, which in turn recruited RUNX1 to 

('MAX', 'SRF', 'increases')
We gratefully acknowledge excellent help with structural refinement by Dr. Chaithanya Madhurantakam and Dr. Tatyana Sandalova, access to synchrotron radiation at beamline ID14-1 at the ESRF laboratory, Grenoble, France, at beamline MX-41 at the BESSY laboratory, Berlin, Germany and at beamline 711 at MAX laboratory, Lund University, Sweden.
We gratefully acknowledge access to synchrotron radiation at the ESRF, Grenoble and at MAXlab, Lund, Sweden.
Other cofactors such as transcriptional coactivator with PDZ binding motif (TAZ), interferon response factor 2 binding protein 2 (IRF2BP2), a basic helix-loolp-helix leucine zipper protein (MAX), and serum response factor (SRF) a member of the MADS box superfamily of transcription factors have all been implicated as potential cofactors of TEAD4 and other members of the TEAD family of proteins. 
We appreciate the support in data collections from the staff at ESRF, Grenoble and MAX-Lab, Lund (beamline I911-2).
The excellent support during data collection at BESSY, MAX-Lab, ESRF, and EMBL-Hamburg is gratefully acknowledged.
We gratefully acknowledge the European Synchrotron Radiation Facility (ESRF), Grenoble, and MAX-lab, Lund, for beam time allocation.
We gratefully acknowledge access to synchrotron radiation at the ESRF, Grenoble, France and at MAX IV laboratory, Lund, Sweden, and thank the staff for support at the beam line.
We gratefully acknowledge access to synchrotron beam lines 14.2 and 14.4 at ESRF (Grenoble, France), MX-41 at BESSY (Berlin, Germany) and I911 at MAX II (Lund, Sweden).
The use of synchrotron beamlines and excellent user support at ESRF, EMBL-Hamburg/DESY, MAX-Lab, BESSY, and ASTRID are gratefully acknowledged.
ATF2, ATF3, BATF, BCL1, BCL3, BCLAF, BHLH, BRCA1, CFOS, CHD2, CTCF, EBF1, EGR1, ELF1, ETS1, FOXM1, GABP, GCN5, IRF3, IRF4, JUND, MAX, MEF2, MTA3, MXI1, NFATC1, NFE2, NFIC, NFYA, NFYB, NRF1, NRSF, p300, PAX5, PBX3, PML, Pol2, Pol3, POU2, PU.1, RAD21, RFX, RUNX3, RXLCH, RXRA, SIX5, SMC3, SP1, SPT, SRF, STAT1, STAT3, STAT5, TBP, TCF1, TCF3, TR4, USF1, USF2, WHIP, YY1, ZBTB3, ZEB1, ZNF143, ZNF274, ZZZ3

('SHC', 'GRB2', 'binds')
After rigorous attempts using phosphospecific antibodies from several vendors (Cell Signaling technology Inc, Santa Cruz Biotechnology, Assay Biotech, US Biologicals, Abcam, Sigma and R&D systems etc), we were able to confirm GRB2 interactions with PTPN11pY584, SHCpY427, EGFRpY1092 and VEGFRpY1213 (
The signal is then transduced through a series of adaptor proteins SHC, GRB2, and SOS, which in turn activates the MAPK cascade RAF, MEK and ERK.
NGF binding to cell-surface TrkA receptor results in activated receptor complexes, which contain adaptors such as SHC (SH2-containing protein), GRB2 (growth-factor-receptor bound protein 2) and Gab (GRB2-associated binding) proteins.

('ELK1', 'STAT4', 'increases')
We identified six Hub TFs, GFI1, NR3C1, SOX17, STAT4, ZNF354C, and TCF8 from 318 SMAD4-dependent target genes in A2780 cells, while four Hub TFs, LEF1 (TCF), ELK1, COUPTF (NR2F5), and E2F, were identified in IOSE cells by our previous study using a similar approach (CART model) 

('E2F1', 'MAZ', 'increases')
A transcription factors analysis of 1,372-probe signature reveals significant associations with the EGR/KROX family of proteins, MAZ, and E2F1.
We found the following connection between EGR/KROX, E2F1 and MAZ transcription factors that makes their concurrent finding notable.
A transcription factors analysis of 1,372-probe gene expression signature reveals significant associations with the EGR/KROX family of proteins, MAZ, and E2F1.
We highlight the appearance of V$E2F1DP1_01 complex (p-value <4.28E-5), V$DEAF1_01 (p-value <4.28E-5), V$MAZR_01 (p-value <1.0E-3) and V$E2F4DP2_01 (p-value <1.1E-3).

('RUNX1', 'NRAS', 'increases')
Patients were also assessed for the presence of mutations in 13 genes, including ASXL1, CBL, c-KIT, DNMT3A, FLT3, IDH1, IDH2, MLL, NPM1, NRAS, RUNX1, TET2, and WT1.

('TCF3', 'FOXO4', 'increases')
The sum of all these inputs determines the expression level of genes for cell survival and/or cell cycle progression through numerous transcriptional regulators including FOXO(FOXO1, FOXO4) and TCF(TCF3).

('RUNX1', 'RUNX2', 'increases')
Similar to RUNX1, the strongest evidence for a pro-oncogenic function for RUNX2 comes from studies in lymphoma/leukemia models 
Our functional analyses were strongly indicative for similar roles of RUNX1 and RUNX2 in EOC progression, including implication in EOC cell proliferation, migration and invasion (see 
A. Venn diagram analyses of the differentially expressed genes upon RUNX1 and RUNX2 knockdown in SKOV3 cells.
B. Hierarchical clustering based on the 95-genes list (2-fold difference in gene expression; p-value cutoff of 0.05) that discriminates differentially-expressed genes in SKOV3 cells upon RUNX1 and RUNX2 knockdown.
C. IPA functional pathway analyses of genes, differentially expressed in SKOV3 cells upon RUNX1 and RUNX2 knockdown, based on the 95-genes list generated upon the clustering analysis.
However, we cannot completely exclude some common mechanisms of RUNX1/RUNX2 action in EOC cells, since both RUNX1 and RUNX2 knockdown leads to the suppression of the pro-metastatic gene p8/NUPR1 
Indeed, microarray data sustained RUNX1 correlation with EOC cell proliferation, migration and invasion, since RUNX2 knockdown resulted in reduced expression of genes associated with metabolism, cellular growth & proliferation and cellular movement, while a number of genes linked to cell death were induced (see 
Given the similar roles of RUNX1 and RUNX2 in EOC progression (implications in EOC cell proliferation, migration and invasion) and the fact that all three RUNX proteins recognize common DNA sequence motifs 
The present study also reveals that RUNX1 and RUNX2 employ distinct molecular mechanisms in EOC tumorigenesis despite evident similarities of their action on EOC cell phenotype and behavior.
Runt domain family, which contains RUNX1, RUNX2, and RUNX3, are main regulators of gene expression in cell proliferation and differentiation in human.
Runt domain family, consisting of RUNX1, RUNX2, and RUNX3, are master regulators of gene expression in cell proliferation and differentiation.
Using a novel experimental paradigm to distinguish between normal and PAC cells, we find that RUNX3 mRNA (but not RUNX1 or RUNX2 mRNAs) exhibits time-dependent increases in normal but not in PAC cells.
As examples, SIN-MLV integrations faithfully reproduced the MLV integration patterns in the LMO2, EVI2A/B, RUNX1, RUNX2, ZNF217-BCAS1, CD34, ELF1 and NFE2 loci, which were targeted at the same overall frequency and at the same hot spots within each locus (
RUNX1 belongs to the RUNX family of genes which includes RUNX2 and RUNX3 additionally 

('GATA6', 'FOXA1', 'increases')
In our study, the regulation interaction network showed several interconnected transcription factors of which the Forkhead family members (FOXP2, FOXA1, FOXA2), NKX2-1, and GATA6 are known to be involved in lung development 

('Raf-1', 'MEK', 'adds_modification')
As previously mentioned, PEBP1 from bovine, human or rat is able to bind small ligands as well as proteins such as the Raf-1, MEK and ERK kinases 
On the other hand, the activation of PKA is known to counteract the Ras/Raf-1/MEK signaling pathway 
Pharmacologic inhibition and transfection studies demonstrated that atypical PKCs but not conventional or novel PKCs contributed towards CSF-1 induced MEK-Erk activity in a c-Raf-1 and A-Raf-independent fashion.
Previously, we showed in 32D.R cells that CSF-1 activated MEK-Erk using both an A-Raf-dependent and an A-Raf independent pathway that did not involve c-Raf-1 
Raf kinase inhibitory protein (RKIP; also known as PEBP1, for phosphatidylethanolamine-binding protein1), as indicated by the name, was first identified as the endogenous inhibitor of the RAF/MEK/ERK pathway, inhibiting Raf-1 activation 
The initiating signal for autophagy formation is poorly understood, whereas it has been established that several molecules and signaling pathways are implicated in regulating autophagy, such as PI3K-AKT-mTOR (phosphatidylinositol 3-kinase/protein kinase B/mammalian target of rapamycin), MAPKs, Raf-1-MEK1/2-ERK1/2 and PTEN (phosphatase and tensin homologue) pathways 
ERK1 and ERK2, the output of the cascade, are phosphorylated by MEK1 and MEK2, and MEK1/2 are activated upstream by Raf-1, and B-Raf 
The cytoplasmic tyrosine kinase Jak2 couples with a variety of cytokine receptors, such as the erythropoietin (Epo) receptor (EpoR) and the IL-3 receptor, and plays a crucial role in regulation of proliferation and apoptosis of hematopoietic cells by activating various signaling pathways including the STAT5, RAS/Raf-1/MEK/Erk, and phosphatidylinositol 3'-kinase (PI3K)/Akt pathways 
Anti-CD3 or phorbol myristate acetate (PMA)-mediated MAPK activation involves the activation of Ras, leading to the activation of Raf-1 and the subsequent activation of MEK (MAPK or ERK kinase) 
Four kinases: syk, Raf-1, MEK-1/2 and ERK-1/2 exhibit reduced (A), whereas the other four kinases: lyn, PI3-K, MKK-3/6 and p38MAPK exhibited enhanced phosphorylation (B), upon increase in dose strength.
In the figures, V1, k3, (k5, k6), (k9, k10), V13, k15, (k17, 18,), (k21, k22) are syk, Raf-1, (MEK-1/2), (ERK-1/2), lyn, PI3-K, (MKK-3/6), (p38MAPK) phosphorylation rates, respectively.
(B) Raf-1 assay was performed on Raf-1 immunoprecipitate in the presence of GST or GST-14-3-3 proteins using recombinant MEK protein as a substrate.
Whereas plasma membrane targeting of Raf-1 activates the classical MEK>ERK (MAPK) cascade but does not protect cells, mitochondrial targeting of Raf-1 protects cells 
For instance, by inhibiting the action of a single molecule such as BRAF (B-Raf proto-oncogene, serine/threonine kinase), the entire RAF/MEK/ERK (Raf-1 proto-oncogene, serine/threonine kinase, mitogen-activated protein kinase kinase 1, mitogen-activated protein kinase 1) pathway will be tuned down, and as a consequence, collateral pathways including PI3K (phosphatidylinositol-4,5-bisphosphate 3-kinase) and RALA (v-ral simian leukemia viral oncogene homolog A (ras related)) will also be affected.
We attempted multiple times to express CSTA in keratinocytes using different expression plasmids (His or HA tag) but were unsuccessful possibly due to CSTA being negatively regulated by the Ras/Raf-1/MEK1/ERK pathway [
Upon activation, Ras recruits Raf-1, a serine/threonine kinase, to phosphorylate MEK (MAPK/Erk kinase), which in turn activates Erk1 and Erk2.
In normal human and mouse renal epithelial cells, cAMP has been shown to inhibit the Ras/Raf-1/MEK/ERK pathway at the level of Raf-1 and to inhibit cell proliferation.
The observed and predicted concentrations of Raf-1* in the Ras/Raf/MEK/ERK Pathway.
Since we demonstrated that phosphorylation and acetylation of p65 was not responsible for the observed Salp15-induced modulation of cytokine responses, we set out to identify the mechanisms responsible for the Salp15-induced Raf-1/MEK-dependent decrease in TLR-induced pro-inflammatory cytokines.
Salp15 binds to the surface of immature DCs through the C-type lectin receptor DC-SIGN, which results in the phosphorylation of the serine/threonine kinase Raf-1 and subsequent MEK activation.
Silencing or inhibition of Raf-1 as well as inhibition of MEK abrogates the effects of Salp15.

('NRF1', 'MAZ', 'increases')
This set consists of c-Fos, CORESTSC30189, ELK, JunD, MAX, MAZAB85725, NF-YA, NF-YB, NRF1, POL2, RAD21, SMC3, TBP, and USF2.

('HNF4A', 'HOXA9', 'increases')
ERK1/2 and Akt (green nodes) have been shown to directly modulate the activity and/or expression of numerous proteins that themselves have direct effects on the transcription regulators HOXA9 and HNF4A (blue nodes, predicted to be inhibited in the Gef+ISO condition) and TRIM24 (red node, predicted to be activated in the Gef+ISO condition).

('NFE2', 'TLX2', 'increases')
NCOA7 (RA/noRA 3.97), TLX2 (RA/noRA 2.79), ID3 (fold change RA/noRA 2.11), NFE2L2 (RA/noRA 1.68), ZNRF1 (RA/noRA 1.27) and HOXD10 (RA/noRA 3.30).

('TCF3', 'LEF1', 'increases')
The mammalian T-cell factor (TCF) family is composed of four members (TCF1, LEF1, TCF3 and TCF4 [
T-cell factors and lymphoid enhancer factor (TCF/LEF) constitute a family of highly conserved transcriptional regulators that is comprised of four members in humans: TCF1, LEF1, TCF3 and TCF4 (gene symbols 
To investigate the potential acetylation of different vertebrate TCF/LEF family members, LEF1, the TCF1E splice form, TCF3 and the TCF4E2 splice form were co-expressed with the acetyl-transferases p300 and CBP in HEK293 cells.
Expression vectors for HA-tagged versions of LEF1, TCF1E, TCF3 and TCF4E2 were transfected into HEK293 cells in the presence or absence of expression vectors for the acetyl-transferases p300 or CBP as indicated.
(A) mRNA expression of TCF1, LEF1, TCF3 and TCF4 in two different passages of canine mammary cell lines normalized to the expression of Rps19.
More and more frequently it seems that TCF1 and LEF1 operate by opposing TCF3/TCF4 repression and providing strong activation.

('RAF1', 'MEK1', 'increases_activity')
ERKs (p44/42 MAPK or ERK1/2) are phosphorylated by the sequential activation of RAF1 and MEK1/2 in response to growth factors and mitogens and induce either proliferation or differentiation 
The RAF (ARAF, BRAF and RAF1) and MEK (MEK1/MAP2K1 and MEK2/MAP2K2) family of proteins are critical downstream mediators of the RAS and other oncogenic signaling pathways 
Activated RAF1 phosphorylates MEK1/2, which in turn activate ERK1/2 

('AR', 'FOXA1', 'increases')
Depletion of FOXA1 in a prostate cancer cell line (LNCaP) using small interfering RNA (siRNA) significantly inhibited AR activity, led to cell-growth suppression, and induced G0/G1 arrest.
To determine the effect of FOXA1 knockdown on AR activity, we transfected the siFOXA1-transfected LNCaP cells with a luciferase expression plasmid driven by the prostate-specific antigen (PSA) promoter, pGL3PSAp-5.8.
Although there was no difference in the protein expression of AR in siFOXA1-transfected cells or in nega-transfected cells, siFOXA1-transfected cells showed almost 80% reduction of PSA promoter activity compare to that of nega-transfected cells (
To determine whether FOXA1 mRNA expression is mediated by AR activity, we tested the effect of treatment of LNCaP cells with DHT and or with the AR antagonist bicalutamide on FOXA1 mRNA expression.
(C, D) LNCaP cells were transfected with a negative control siRNA (nega) or with an AR siRNA (si AR) and/or a FOXA1 siRNA (si FOXA1#1) and, 48 h after transfection, AR mRNA and protein (C) or IGFBP-3 mRNA levels (D) were analyzed using qRT-PCR and/or western blot analysis.
In the prostate, FOXA1 interacts with the AR and controls androgen induced activation of prostate-specific genes 
Another possible mechanism of FOXA1 regulation of IGFBP-3 could be through FOXA1 regulation of the AR.
One of the potentially therapeutically useful features of FOXA1 is that it does not require the ligand binding domain of the AR for its effects on the AR.
FOXA1 directly binds to the DNA binding domain of AR and alters the 3-D structure of the AR 
Survival curves were obtained using the Kaplan-Meier method and differences in survival rates between FOXA1-positive and FOXA1-negative cases, and between AR-positive and AR-negative cases, were compared using a log-rank test.
Furthermore, the association between FOXA1 and ER in breast cancer and FOXA1 and androgen receptor (AR) in prostate cancer suggests that expression levels of FOXA1 may influence responsiveness to antihormonal treatment in hormone dependent cancers.
FOXA1 has been recognized as an important transcription factor that modulates the functions of steroid receptors such as estrogen receptor in breast cancer and AR in prostate cancer.
Pioneer factors such as FOXA1 are able to bind to tightly packed heterochromatin, opening DNA structure to allow binding and regulation by nuclear receptors, including ER, GR and AR 
In contrast, FOXA1 appears to play a dual role in androgen signalling, where it promotes androgen responsiveness of some AR targets and acts as a repressor of others.
This is supported by a recent study in LNCaP prostate cancer cells where depletion of FOXA1 caused significant remodelling of AR binding patterns and a marked increase in androgen regulated transcripts 
A search in the JASPAR CORE database provided further evidence that the rs11257655 SNP is located within predicted binding sites for FOXA1 and FOXA2, with only the T risk-allele predicted to contain a FOXA1 and FOXA2 consensus core-binding motif (

('PI3K', 'BTK', 'translocates')
inhibitor to protein kinases PI3K and BTK, are entering clinical practice and conveying new mechanisms of treatment resistance compared to standard chemoimmunotherapy [
Thus, CD19 and its PI3K/BTK/AKT signaling pathway is essential for B-cell activation and the establishment of central human B-cell tolerance by mediating the function of both BCRs and TLRs that recognize self-antigens during early B-cell development

('MAZ', 'MAX', 'increases')
This set consists of c-Fos, CORESTSC30189, ELK, JunD, MAX, MAZAB85725, NF-YA, NF-YB, NRF1, POL2, RAD21, SMC3, TBP, and USF2.

('MYC', 'RUNX2', 'increases')
Network analysis of these gene expression changes identified several regulatory hubs, including GLI1, RUNX2, MYC, BMP2, and NOTCH1.

('HRAS', 'RAF1', 'adds_modification')
Regarding Dataset GSE3167, OPN (SPP1), VEGFA, p53, AKT1, KRAS, HRAS, cyclin D1, RAF1, and RKIP exhibited significant over-expression in BC vs. normal tissue.

('TFDP1', 'MYC', 'increases')
Our data indicated that the G1/S checkpoint regulation pathway is one of the significantly down-regulated canonical pathways, as 46 of the 61 genes in the pathway, (ABL1, ATM, ATR, BTRC, CCND1, CCND2, CCND3, CCNE1, CCNE2, CDC25A, CDK2, CDK4, CDK6, CDKN1A, CDKN1B, CDKN2B, E2F1, E2F2, E2F3, E2F4, E2F6, GSK3B, HDAC1, HDAC2, HDAC3, HDAC4, HDAC5, HDAC6, HDAC7, HDAC9, HDAC10, HDAC11, MAX, MYC, PA2G4, RB1, RBL1, RBL2, SIN3A, SKP2, SMAD3, SUV39H1, TFDP1, TGFB2, TGFB3, TP53) were deregulated by butyrate treatment.

('PAX5', 'SRF', 'increases')
ATF2, ATF3, BATF, BCL1, BCL3, BCLAF, BHLH, BRCA1, CFOS, CHD2, CTCF, EBF1, EGR1, ELF1, ETS1, FOXM1, GABP, GCN5, IRF3, IRF4, JUND, MAX, MEF2, MTA3, MXI1, NFATC1, NFE2, NFIC, NFYA, NFYB, NRF1, NRSF, p300, PAX5, PBX3, PML, Pol2, Pol3, POU2, PU.1, RAD21, RFX, RUNX3, RXLCH, RXRA, SIX5, SMC3, SP1, SPT, SRF, STAT1, STAT3, STAT5, TBP, TCF1, TCF3, TR4, USF1, USF2, WHIP, YY1, ZBTB3, ZEB1, ZNF143, ZNF274, ZZZ3

('E2F1', 'MYC', 'increases')
ATAD2 may be a transcriptional coactivator of ESR1 required to induce the expression of estradiol target genes such as CCND1, MYC and E2F1 and may be required for histone hyperacetylation 
These heatmaps show the gene expression signatures of the E2F1, MYC, and RAS pathways collected on Affymetrix and Illumina.
Also in case of miR-9 transfection, tumor suppressor p53 and oncogene transcription factors such as Runx1, E2F1, MYCN and MYB have been found active.
CDCA7 expression is controlled by E2F1 and MYC factors that play important roles in cell cycle[130].
This study also unveiled a strong association between the decreased expression of genes regulated by B-MYB with E2F1 and to a lesser extent c-MYC.
The transcription factors E2F1, E2F2, E2F3 and MYC activate the members of the miR17-92 clusters 
Our data indicated that the G1/S checkpoint regulation pathway is one of the significantly down-regulated canonical pathways, as 46 of the 61 genes in the pathway, (ABL1, ATM, ATR, BTRC, CCND1, CCND2, CCND3, CCNE1, CCNE2, CDC25A, CDK2, CDK4, CDK6, CDKN1A, CDKN1B, CDKN2B, E2F1, E2F2, E2F3, E2F4, E2F6, GSK3B, HDAC1, HDAC2, HDAC3, HDAC4, HDAC5, HDAC6, HDAC7, HDAC9, HDAC10, HDAC11, MAX, MYC, PA2G4, RB1, RBL1, RBL2, SIN3A, SKP2, SMAD3, SUV39H1, TFDP1, TGFB2, TGFB3, TP53) were deregulated by butyrate treatment.
LEE_MYC_E2F1_UP and IDX_TSA_UP_CLUSTER1; 
Identification of such a large number of targets is not exceptional, since E2F1 and MYC are known to be recruited to >20,000 and >17,000 targets, respectively, in the human genome
Considering the fact that the miR-17/92 cluster and its paralogs have recently been shown to be tightly linked to the functions of MYC and E2F1 in the regulatory circuitry that controls cell proliferation 
A network of proliferative and anti-proliferative miRNAs interacting with MYC and E2F1 predicted by IntegraMiR.
A similar manner of regulation of E2F1 has been discussed by O'Donnell et al., who found that MYC simultaneously activates E2F1 transcription and limits its translation through up-regulating E2F1-targeting miRNAs 
Our work showed that putative interactions between these TFs (such as ESR1/Sp1, E2F1/Sp1, c-MYC-ESR, Smad3/c-Myc, and NFKB1/RELA), between TFs and their target genes (such as BMP41/Est1, TSC2/Myc, APE1/Sp1/p53, RARA/HOXA1, and SP1/USF2), and between signaling pathways (such as PPAR signaling pathway and Adipocytokines signaling pathway).
The major functional networks showed that AHR and MYCN can interact through E2F1.
To further verify the correlation between AHR, E2F1, and MYCN, the mRNA expression levels of AHR and MYCN in another 14 NB tumor samples were determined by real-time PCR.
The immunoblotting data showed that ectopic expression of AHR downregulated E2F1 and MYCN expression in a dose-dependent manner (
AHR overexpression in SK-N-DZ cells suppressed E2F1 and MYCN expression and upregulated the mRNA expression level of differentiation markers, GAP43 and CRT.
After 48 h, total mRNA were collected and subjected to real-time PCR with specific primers for AHR, E2F1, MYCN, Nestin, and Vimentin.
Using a lentivirus transduction system, shRNA efficiently suppressed AHR expression in SK-N-SH cells with an upregulation of E2F1 and MYCN mRNA expression (
Using IPA, we also found that AHR could interact with MYCN through E2F1.
Therefore, we hypothesized that AHR might downregulate MYCN expression through modulation of E2F1.
The locations of the following 13 transcription factors were recently mapped by ChIP-Seq: NANOG (NM_028016), OCT4 (also called POU5F1, NM_013633), STAT3 (NM_213659), SMAD1 (NM_008539), SOX2 (NM_011443), ZFX (NM_011768), c-MYC (NM_010849), n-MYC (NM_008709), KLF4 (NM_010637), ESRRB (NM_011934), TCFCP2L1 (NM_023755), E2F1 (NM_007891), and CTCF (NM_181322) 
The following ChIP-seq datasets were downloaded from GEO: OCT4, SOX2, NANOG, SMAD1, KLF4, ESRRB, CTCF, n-MYC, c-MYC, STAT3, E2F1, TCFCP2L1, ZFX (GSE11431) 
For quantification of DALRD3, trefoil factor 1 (TFF1/pS2), pri-miR-191, pri-miR-425, VEGFA, FSCN1, EGR1, TNC, CDC42, SATB1, SOX4, CCND1, VIM, CCND2, E2F1, SIAH2, API5, FIBR, CSDA, MYC, CTNN1 and CDH1 mRNAs, the appropriate TaqMan probes were purchased from Applied Biosystems.
Analysis of E2F1, MYC, SP1 and p53 occupancy on the 
For example, when average signals of CMYC and E2F1 binding were calculated, we observed less significant difference in values between cell cycle and non-cell cycle genes.
The P-values of average signal comparisons are 2e-8 for CMYC and 9e-7 for E2F1 (
Other than CMYC and E2F1, many other TFs also reflect significant differences in binding strengths between cell cycle and non-cell cycle genes, especially when TIP is utilized (

('CEBPA', 'JUN', 'increases')
The non-IR scenario consisted of transcription factors as CEBPA, VDR, SPDEF, MLL2, and NR3C1, whereas the IR scenario comprised of TP53, ESR2, NFkB (complex), TP63, and JUN.
These include STAT1/3, JUN/ATF2, CEBPA/B which regulate a large number of immune response genes, RB1 which has been implicated in viral immune response networks 
Some of its targets are additionally regulated by other markers such as CEBPA, STAT3, FOS, and JUN.
The signature with the highest predictive accuracy of 65% (68% area under the ROC curve, AUC) consisted of the proteins STAT3, FOS, JUN, CDX2, CEBPA, and BRCA1 (see 
Gene expression of prognostic signature genes was quantified by the relative expression values using the following gene specific TaqMan Gene Expression Assays: BRCA1 (Hs01556193_m1), FOS (Hs01119266_g1), CDX2 (Hs01078080_m1), STAT3 (Hs00234174_m1), HBA2 (Hs00361191_g1), HBB (Hs00758889_s1), SRD5A1 (Hs00602694_mH), SP1 (Hs00293689_s1), JUN (Hs00277190_s1), USF1 (Hs00273038_m1), and CEBPA (Hs00269972_s1).

('RAF1', 'MEK1', 'adds_modification')
ERKs (p44/42 MAPK or ERK1/2) are phosphorylated by the sequential activation of RAF1 and MEK1/2 in response to growth factors and mitogens and induce either proliferation or differentiation 
The RAF (ARAF, BRAF and RAF1) and MEK (MEK1/MAP2K1 and MEK2/MAP2K2) family of proteins are critical downstream mediators of the RAS and other oncogenic signaling pathways 
Activated RAF1 phosphorylates MEK1/2, which in turn activate ERK1/2 

('JUN', 'EN1', 'increases')
Validation of Affymetrix data was performed using the following collection of Taqman assays-on-demand by Applied Biosystems: CAV1: Hs00184697_m1; CCND1: Hs00277039_m1; DDIT4: Hs00430304_g1; DKK1: Hs00183740_m1; ENC-1: Hs00171580_m1; EPAS1: Hs00181674_m1; FZD1: Hs00268943_s1; GPC1: Hs00892476_m1; HDAC9: Hs00206843_m1; HES1: Hs00172878_m1; HES6: Hs00610927_g1; IL1A: Hs00174092_m1; IL24: Hs00169533_m1; IL8: Hs00174103_m1; JAG1: Hs00164982_m1; JUN: Hs00357891_s1; KREMEN1: Hs00230750_m1; RAD52: Hs00172536_m1; ROR1: Hs00178178_m1; RSPO3: Hs00262176; SERPINB5: Hs00184728_m1; SOX2: Hs00602736_s1; SOX4: Hs00268388_s1; TCF3: Hs00413032_m1; TGFB2: Hs00234244_m1; TLE1: Hs00270768_m1; TNFRSF10B: Hs00187196_m1; TOX: Hs00207075_m1.

('ESRRA', 'FOXA1', 'increases')
In rainbow trout fed the unsupplemented diet (diet U) estrogen-related receptor alpha (ESRRA) and forkhead box A1 (FOXA1) were predicted activated with a regulation z-score of 2.7 and 2.4, respectively.

('JUN', 'STAT1', 'increases')
We identified 113 transcription regulators including CREB1, JUN, SP1, STAT1 and STAT3.
ATF2, ATF3, BATF, BCL1, BCL3, BCLAF, BHLH, BRCA1, CFOS, CHD2, CTCF, EBF1, EGR1, ELF1, ETS1, FOXM1, GABP, GCN5, IRF3, IRF4, JUND, MAX, MEF2, MTA3, MXI1, NFATC1, NFE2, NFIC, NFYA, NFYB, NRF1, NRSF, p300, PAX5, PBX3, PML, Pol2, Pol3, POU2, PU.1, RAD21, RFX, RUNX3, RXLCH, RXRA, SIX5, SMC3, SP1, SPT, SRF, STAT1, STAT3, STAT5, TBP, TCF1, TCF3, TR4, USF1, USF2, WHIP, YY1, ZBTB3, ZEB1, ZNF143, ZNF274, ZZZ3
BHLH, BRCA1, CFOS, CHD2, CTCF, EBF1, GCN5, IRF3, JUND, MAX, MXI1, NFE2, NFYA, NFYB, NRF1, p300, RAD21, RFX, SMC3, SPT, STAT1, STAT3, TBP, TR4, USF2, WHIP, YY1, ZNF143, ZNF274, ZZZ3
These include STAT1/3, JUN/ATF2, CEBPA/B which regulate a large number of immune response genes, RB1 which has been implicated in viral immune response networks 
STAT1 phosphorylation, a downstream marker of activation of IFN signaling pathway, was readily detected in JUNV infected IFN-competent cells.

('YY1', 'SRF', 'increases')
In the normal myogenesis, the recruitment of MyoD/SRF and the displacement of YY1/PRC from miR-29 promoter lead to the elevation of miR-29 expression and its feedback inhibition on YY1 and successful myogenic differentiation.
The SNP lies between two regions of transcription factor binding sites, including a c-Fos/c-Jun (AP-1 heterodimers), p300 (a transcriptional co-activator), YY1, SRF, GATA-2 complex, and a USF-1 binding site.
ATF2, ATF3, BATF, BCL1, BCL3, BCLAF, BHLH, BRCA1, CFOS, CHD2, CTCF, EBF1, EGR1, ELF1, ETS1, FOXM1, GABP, GCN5, IRF3, IRF4, JUND, MAX, MEF2, MTA3, MXI1, NFATC1, NFE2, NFIC, NFYA, NFYB, NRF1, NRSF, p300, PAX5, PBX3, PML, Pol2, Pol3, POU2, PU.1, RAD21, RFX, RUNX3, RXLCH, RXRA, SIX5, SMC3, SP1, SPT, SRF, STAT1, STAT3, STAT5, TBP, TCF1, TCF3, TR4, USF1, USF2, WHIP, YY1, ZBTB3, ZEB1, ZNF143, ZNF274, ZZZ3
At two hours following the first dose of vorinostat, we saw a burst in transcriptional activation including upregulation of sequence-specific DNA binding transcription factors YY1, Serum Response Factor (SRF) and SERTA Domain-Containing Protein 3 (SERTAD3), a potent co-activator of E2F responsive promoters 

('SOX9', 'ETS1', 'increases')
Furthermore, several of these genes correspond to currently unexploited drug targets, namely H-Ras, SOX9, Shc, ETS1, and STAT1, potentially leading to novel treatment strategies.

('AR', 'CYP26A1', 'increases')
(D) CYP26A1 transcriptional
                        repression in DNC8 cells is associated with significant histone H4
                        hypoacetylation, unresponsive to RA, at the CYP26A1 regions encompassing
                        either the distal RARE (D-RARE), or the proximal RARE (P-RARE).

('MEK', 'ERK', 'adds_modification')
The compound demonstrated reduction in PI3K and MEK/ERK pathway signaling and prolonged stable disease.
Mutations have been detected in BRAF, NRAS and c-KIT which lead to activation of the RAS/RAF/MEK/ERK pathway and dysregulation of melanoma cell proliferation.
Inhibition of these dually specific threonine/tyrosine kinases leads to down-regulation of the RAS/RAF/MEK/ERK signalling pathway.
Activated MEK phosphorylates ERK1/2 on its threonine/tyrosine residues that thereby become activated [
The N2B domain binds specifically to four and a half LIM protein 1 (FHL1), which in turn is the core of a signalosome consisting of RAF, MEK1/2, and ERK2, thus connecting growth factor-mediated Gq signaling and extracellular signals to titin extensibility and finally to changes in gene expression.
Egr gene induction by BzATP is prevented by inhibitors of the MEK-ERK and p38 MAP kinase pathways, but not by inhibitors of calmodulin kinase II.
Further experiments using a variety of inhibitors of intracellular signaling pathways suggest that ADPbetaS and UTP pathways for ERK1/2 phosphorylation converge on MEK but differ in the upstream signaling pathways.
We have previously found that fibronectin (FN) increases microglial P2X4R protein through activation of PI3K- and MEK/ERK-mediated signaling pathways.
Together, these results suggest that the PI3K/Akt pathway regulates P2X4R expression at the transcriptional level through p53 and the MEK/ERK pathway regulates P2X4R expression at the translational level.
We found that the potentiating effect of ATP on cyclin expression was significantly reduced by U0126, an inhibitor of MEK, the upstream activator of ERK.
Our studies demonstrate that the increased expression of cyclin D1 and cyclin A induced by FGF2 and extracellular ATP involves ERK because cyclin expression was attenuated by blocking MEK, the upstream activator of ERK.
The mitogen-activated protein kinase (MAPK/ERK)-activating kinase (MEK) inhibitor PD98059 blocked this response.
MEK inhibition decreases ATP- and UTP-mediated ERK1/2 phosphorylation.
As expected, the MEK inhibitor PD98059 blocked ATP- and UTP-mediated ERK1/2 phosphorylation, confirming that MEK, the only known kinase upstream of ERK1/2, contributes to ERK1/2 phosphorylation.
Activation of ERK1/2 independent of MEK1 may involve inhibition of phosphatases.
Many studies reveal that GPCRs and growth factor receptors share a number of signalling modules (e.g., Raf/MEK/ERK, PI 3-K/PDK/PKB) to transduce their effects.
In PC12 cells NGF-promoted induction of HO-1 expression requires the activation of the MEK/ERK pathway [
Crosstalk between the PI3K and the Raf/MEK/ERK pathways has been reported on multiple levels, with some research stating that PI3K activity is essential for induction of Raf/MEK/ERK activity [
Work by several groups, including ours, has shown a modulation of the Akt/Ras/Raf/MEK/ERK signalling pathway by adenosine.
Of great interest are the different effects of adenosine on the Akt/Ras/Raf/MEK/ERK signalling pathway modulation in different cells.
The observation that ERK is the only known MEK substrate and that ERK is commonly activated in tumor cells has triggered substantial interest in the identification and development of inhibitors of MEK as a means to block ERK activation in human cancers [
A deregulated PI3K pathway (usually due to mutated or null PTEN) can also inhibit the Ras/MEK/ERK pathway, through enhanced activation of AKT.
This event leads to the activation of Raf/Ras/MEK/ERK pathway.
We demonstrate that Ras activation, MEK phosphorylation, and ERK phosphorylation oscillate in a circadian manner.
In this study, we demonstrate that Ras activation, MEK phosphorylation, and ERK phosphorylation exhibit circadian rhythms in mouse liver and ERK phosphorylation rhythms are controlled by circadian core clock components.
ERK phosphorylation is regulated by the upstream signaling factors such as Ras and MEK1/2.
In this study, we demonstrate that ERK phosphorylation, Ras activation, and MEK phosphorylation all show circadian oscillations in mouse liver.
The antibodies utilized in this study included anti-ERK1/2 (Santa Cruz), anti-phospho-ERK1/2 (Cell Signaling), anti-MEK1/2 (Santa Cruz), anti-phospho-MEK1/2 (Santa Cruz), anti-Ras (Upstate).
Cancer, Lysergic Acid diethylamide, stem cell, apoptosis, mollusc, recombinant DNA, retinoic acid, HIV, cholera, Bovine spongiform encephalopathy, cell cycle, evolution, bone morphogenetic protein, miRNA OR microRNA, ectodysplasin OR tabby, Wnt OR wingless (in combination with: frizzled, TCF, beta-catenin, axin, lgr5, disheveled, LRP, dickkopf, Lef1, GSK3, canonical, planar cell polarity, skin, non-canonical, calcium), Fibroblast growth factor (in combination with: fgf4 OR KS3 or hst or Fgfk or kFGF or Fgf-4 or hst-1 or Hstf-1, sprouty, fgf20, mapk, limb bud, ERK, stem cell, MEK, RAS, fgfr2, cancer, kidney, salivary gland).
Pharmacological inhibition of JAK/STAT3, PI3K/Akt or MEK/ERK signaling by AG490, Wortmannin or U0126, respectively, reduced leptin-induced cyclin D1 expression and NP cell proliferation.
Taken together, we show that leptin induces human NP cell cyclin D1 expression and proliferation via activation of JAK/STAT3, PI3K/Akt or MEK/ERK signaling.
Leptin has been shown to instigate intracellular signaling via activation of JAK2/STAT3, PI3K/Akt, and MEK/ERK pathways in other cell types.
To examine the possible involvements of JAK2/STAT3, PI3K/Akt, and MEK/ERK pathways in leptin-induced NP cell proliferation, NP cells were treated with or without AG490 (JAK inhibitor), wortmannin (PI3K inhibitor) or U0126 (MEK inhibitor), alone or in combination, in the absence or presence of leptin.
The data presented so far indicates that JAK/STAT3, PI3K/Akt, and MEK/ERK pathways mediated the mitogenic effect of leptin in NP cells.
In contrast, MEK inhibitor U0126 reduced phosphorylation of ERK1/2, STAT3 and Akt while PI3K inhibitor wortmannin specifically reduced Akt phosphorylation induced by leptin (
These findings suggest that leptin induces cyclin D1 Expression and proliferation of human NP cells via JAK/STAT, PI3K/Akt and MEK/ERK pathways.
In summary, this study has shown that human CTL effector function may be regulated by the IL-12 induced serine-threonine protein kinase Tpl2, likely upstream of MEK/ERK mediated pathway.
Blocking Tpl2 function upstream of MEK-ERK activation markedly diminished effector cytokine secretion and cytolytic capabilities of human effector and T
The pharmacological inhibition of phosphatidylinositol-3-kinase (PI3K), mammalian target of rapamycin (mTOR), and MEK suggests that both PI3K/Akt/mTOR and MAPK/ERK signaling are required for FGF2-induced E-cadherin down-regulation.
PKD plays an important role in mediating mitogenic signaling and has been shown to potentiate the GPCR-induced cell proliferation through the MEK/ERK/RSK pathway [
We then asked the question, whether small molecules, which suppress phosphorylation of ERK1/2 and PKB/Akt similar to SB202190 in HT29 cells, such as PD098059, a specific inhibitor of the ERK upstream kinases MEK1/2, and wortmannin, a specific inhibitor of PI3K, are able to induce vacuolization in these cells.
Protein A/G beads, anti-mouse and anti-rabbit IgG-conjugated horseradish peroxidase, rabbit polyclonal antibodies specific for p-MEK, MEK, p-ERK, ERK, p-p65, p65, CCR5 siRNA, control siRNA, control shRNA plasmid, and CCL5 shRNA plasmid were purchased from Santa Cruz Biotechnology (Santa Cruz, CA, USA).
MEK/ERK signaling pathway can be activated by a variety of growth factors, such as insulin and growth factors 
MEK/ERK pathway plays a critical role in CCL5/CCR5 signaling 
Fu for providing MEK1 dominant negative mutant; Dr. M. Cobb for providing ERK2 mutant.
Accordingly, inhibitors of the RAS-RAF-MEK-ERK pathway carry great promises for anticancer treatment.
Perturbation of Raf, MEK or ERK had similar effects on the functional markers with ERK being the most notable (
Mitogen-activated protein kinase (MAPK) pathways, such as the Jun-N-terminal-kinase (JNK) and the mitogen-activated protein kinase kinase/extracellular-regulated kinase (MEK/ERK) pathways, integrate signals from multiple RTKs to control cell proliferation, cell motility and other cellular traits 
Ras then activates BRAF, and BRAF phosphorylates MEK which in turn phosphorylates ERK.
Among MAPKs, the MEK-ERK cascade is a central signalling pathway that regulates a wide variety of cellular processes, including proliferation, differentiation, and survival.
Anti-ERK1/2, anti-phospho-ERK1/2, anti-MEK1/2, and anti-phospho-MEK1/2 were purchased from Cell Signaling (MA, USA).
Newer anti-influenza agents include MEK/ERK and protein kinase C inhibitors; however, the downstream effectors of these pathways have not been determined.
Inhibiting MLC phosphorylation by blocking RhoA/Rho kinase, phospholipase C/protein kinase C, and HRas/Raf/MEK/ERK pathways with the use of genetic or chemical manipulation leads to the inhibition of influenza proliferation.
In contrast, the induction of MLC phosphorylation enhances influenza proliferation, as does activation of the HRas/Raf/MEK/ERK signaling pathway.
Influenza-induced activation of Raf/MEK/ERK, PKC, and PLC has been reported 
The accumulation of influenza hemagglutinin on the surface of infected cells results in the activation of the Raf\MEK\ERK signaling cascade 
Several anti-influenza compounds have been described, including those that inhibit intracellular calcium, PKC, and Raf/MEK/ERK, as well as calmodulin antagonists and donors of nitric oxide (NO) 
Previous studies demonstrated that activation of Raf/MEK/ERK is crucial for proliferation of the influenza virus 
This process requires viral activation of the cellular Raf/MEK/ERK signaling cascade.
We sought to determine if MLC phosphorylation mediates the role of HRas\Raf\MEK\ERK in influenza proliferation.
The reduction in influenza proliferation seen when MDCK cells were treated with the MEK/ERK inhibitor, U0126, or with the Raf kinase inhibitor, GW5074, was reversed when MDCK cells were also treated with the MLC phosphatase inhibitor, calyculin A (
The anti-influenza effects of Raf kinase and MEK/ERK inhibitors were reversed when HUVECs were treated with an MLC phosphatase inhibitor.
In particular, we showed that MEK/ERK inhibitors suppressed the proliferation of influenza virus by blocking MLC phosphorylation.
To determine the function ERK1/2 and Akt phosphorylation serves in VEGF-A-induced processes, LECs were stimulated with VEGF-A in the presence of either PD098059 or LY294002, inhibitors that selectively block MEK1 and PI3-K, respectively.
In neuroblasts and other cell lines, Gadd45a has been reported to exert downstream effects on cell growth and differentiation through the MAPK pathway, including MEKK4, ERK1/2 and p38 
The late endosomal LAMTOR complex serves as a convergence point for both the RAF/MEK/ERK and the PI3K/AKT/mTOR pathways.
Scaffold proteins were originally identified in yeast and are now recognized to contribute to the specificity of MEK/ERK pathways in mammalian cells.
Recently, we reported that TH1 served as a negative regulator of A-Raf and PAK1, inhibiting MEK/ERK signaling pathway 
Inhibition of MAPK/ERK kinase (MEK) promotes pluripotency by blocking differentiation signals autoinduced by FGF-4 in cultured mES cells 
Antibodies towards the indicated proteins were purchased from the following sources: ERK1/2, pERK (pY204), MEK1/2, pMEK (pS218, pS222) (Santa Cruz Biotechnology), ppERK (pT202, pY204) (Cell Signaling Technology & mouse clone MAPK-YT from Sigma-Aldrich), Ki67 (mouse clone MIB-1), p27
In order to assess the individual contributions of ARAF, BRAF, and CRAF to paradoxical MAPK activation caused by dabrafenib in HCT-116 (wild-type BRAF, mutant KRAS) cells, phospho and total MEK (pMEK, tMEK) and ERK (pERK, tERK) were evaluated by immunoblot after a 72-hour incubation with siRNA towards ARAF, BRAF, or CRAF, or medium (none), and treatment with 0, 100, or 300 nM dabrafenib for 1 h (A).
We demonstrated that dabrafenib could elevate pMEK and pERK in a CRAF-dependent manner in cells encoding mutant RAS, but wild-type RAF, and which are also dependent on the MAPK pathway for growth (sensitive to MEK inhibition).
PI3K/Akt and MEK-ERK signaling pathways have previously been shown to cross-talk 
To further validate the role of JNK, p38 and ERK/MAPK signaling pathway in cocaine/gp120-induced astrocytic apoptosis, cells were pretreated with inhibitors specific for JNK (SP600125), p38 (SB203580), and MEK1/2 (U0126) prior to exposure with gp120 and/or cocaine followed by assessment of cell viability.
The activation of ERK1/2 in response to CTS in cancer cells suggests that the Ras-Raf-MEK-ERK pathway plays an important role in cell survival, possibly through the regulation of ion channels and cell volume after an increase in intracellular Ca
Having demonstrated that IL-6 is able to induce autophagy in LNCaP cells in the absence of androgen, we further investigated the potential signaling pathways involved, namely (i) JAK-STAT3, (ii) PI3K-Akt and (iii) MEK-ERK.
IL-6 activates three major signaling pathways, namely the JAK-STAT3, PIK3-Akt and MEK-ERK pathways.
But aberrant activation of the Ras-Raf-MEK-ERK pathway in TNBC has already been noticed 
F. MEK1/2 inhibitor UO126 and selective ERK1/2 inhibitor FR180204 increased the stability of BikDD in 231 cells.
The effectiveness of U0126 on MEK inhibition was verified by analysis of ERK phosphorylation, the primary target of MEK 
Ras/MEK activation in the mutant cells was confirmed by western blot analysis using anti-phosphorylated ERK, and Ras antibodies (
(A) Western blot analysis using anti-Ras, phosphorylated ERK or GAPDH antibody to determine Ras/MEK activation in control SKOV3 and Ras transformed SKOV3 (clone 10 and 15).
It was however, reduced by MEK or PKC inhibition and by mutations preventing TEY phosphorylation or that abrogate ERK binding to D (docking) domain partners.
Whole cell protein extracts were then immunoblotted for phospho Ser217/221 MEK1/2 (ppMEK1/2), phospho Thr183/Tyr185 ERK (ppERK) and for total ERK (ERK1 and/or 2) as indicated.
Together, the data above show that mechanisms other than phosphorylation-dependent release from MEK or agonist-induced up-regulation of nuclear DUSPs are needed to achieve the full ERK nuclear localization response elicited by activation of a GPCR.
Whilst MEK is of crucial importance for cytoplasmic retention of ERK in unstimulated cells, TEY phosphorylation of ERK can be uncoupled from nuclear localization by a variety of mechanisms.
Taken together, we show that GnRH-induced phosphorylation of ERK by MEK on the TEY motif is necessary but not sufficient for GnRH to cause the full nuclear localization response.
Anti-Phospho-MEK1 (Thr386) (p-MEK1) and anti-MEK1 were purchased from Millipore Co. Anti-Phospho (Thr202/Tyr204) ERK1/2 (p-ERK1/2), anti-ERK1/2, anti-MMP-2, anti-MMP-9, anti-TIMP-1 and anti-TIMP-2 antibodies were purchased from Cell Signaling.
(A) The protein levels of MEK1, p-MEK1, ERK1/2 and p-ERK1/2.
(B) Phosphorylation densities of MEK1 and ERK1/2 were digitally scanned.
To further verify the specific effect of baicalein on ERK pathway, we transfected MHCC97H cells with a plasmid (pcDNA3.1(+)-MEK1) expressing human MEK1 (
(B) Quantification of the protein levels of MEK1, p-MEK1, ERK1/2 and p-ERK1/2.
PHB plays an important role in the Ras-mediated activation of the Raf/MEK/ERK pathway 
The role of ERK1/2 in mediating the electrophysiological response of dopamine neurons to leptin was assessed by blocking the MEK1/2 kinase needed for phosphorylation and activation of ERK1/2.
Apart from PI3-kinase/Akt, the MEK/ERK pathway also plays a key pro-survival role by activating its downstream pathways that are also responsible for the regulation of a number of biological processes.
Several groups have reported that PI3K plays a role in activation of the MEK/ERK pathway 
The PI(3)K and MEK inhibitors were first used to monitor the phosphorylation of AKT and ERK1/2, downstream targets of PI(3)K and MEK respectively.
It has been reported that Bim could be regulated by MEK-ERK or PI3K-Akt pathway 
This conclusion is in agreement with a previous work applying multi-parametric global sensitivity analysis to an integrated, system-specific MAPK network including both an upstream EGF signal pathway and the core cascade consisting of Ras and Raf (MAPKKK), MEK (MAPKK), and ERK (MAPK) 
To clarify if the proliferative effects of EB were mediated by the MAPK pathway or dependent upon IGF-IR, cells were exposed to the optimum concentration of EB (10 nM), with or without pharmacologic inhibition of MEK, a MAP kinase upstream of ERK, by PD 098059 (PD) 
Apart from PTKs, the Raf/MEK/ERK pathway has been implicated in transformed B cell survival although the role of this pathway in the survival of EBV-transformed human B cells is unclear.
PP2 and compound 5 are small molecule inhibitors of Src family tyrosine kinases, whereas CI-1040 and PD 198306 inhibit primarily the activation of MEK/ERK pathway.
Deregulation of the MEK/ERK pathway has been associated with sensitivity and resistance to leukemia therapy highlighting the importance of this pathway for controlling hemopoietic malignancies 
The signaling mechanisms behind NETosis are still largely unexplored although the Raf-MEK-ERK signaling pathway has already been implicated. 
While above presented results revealed induced phosphorylation of ERK-1/2 MAPK by CO, inhibition of ERK-1/2 activation with the MEK-1/2-inhibitor PD98059 (2 mg/kg) did not attenuate the effect of CO on RGC density (
MAPK pathway activation in lactation was evident by high phosphorylated (p) MEK1/2 levels, and nuclear translocation of ERK1.
Still other pathways could include MEK, but without subsequent activation of ERK, as we did not observe any increase in OXT-induced ERK phosphorylation.
In virgins, OXT induced the phosphorylation of MEK, but not ERK, while in lactating rats OXT induced dephosphorylation of MEK, without affecting pERK levels.
Total MEK and ERK levels did not change (not shown).
As the OXT-induced phosphorylation of MEK1/2 appeared to be uncoupled from the phosphorylation of ERK1/2, we inhibited the activity of pMEK1/2 pharmacologically with U0126 (1 nmol, icv) to determine whether pMEK1/2 exerts ERK1/2 phosphorylation activity in the PVN of female rats.
Treatment with U0126 lowered basal pERK1/2 concentrations to a similar extent in both virgin and lactating rats (where pMEK1/2 had a profound effect on basal anxiety-like behaviour; 
In the present study we reveal that the complex neuronal adaptations, observed during lactation, include a tonic activation of MEK1/2 and ERK1 within the hypothalamic PVN.
This was indicated by the profound anxiogenic effect of blockade of this pathway only in lactating rats, the increased pMEK1/2 levels in cytoplasmatic PVN extracts from mid-lactating rats compared with virgins, and by increased pERK1 and ERK1 levels in the nucleus; indicative of nuclear translocation.
While MEK phosphorylation, as measured by western blotting, and MEK activity-dependent anxiety-like behaviour were in perfect agreement, ERK phosphorylation was negligibly influenced by icv OXT infusion.
This is quite remarkable, as ERK1/2 are the only known targets of MEK1/2 in the brain to date.
We favour a model in which both MEK1/2 and ERK1 are necessary to develop the anxiolytic phenotype observed during lactation (on the basis of increased MEK phosphorylation and ERK translocation in lactating animals).
Some other MEK-controlled factor(s) must be responsible for the anxiolytic effect of OXT in virgin rats, because of lack of ERK1/2 phosphorylation.
To assess if icv pre-treatment with the MEK1/2 kinase inhibitor, U0126, reduced basal or OXT-induced ERK1/2 activation in virgin or lactating (LD8) rats, the following groups were compared: vehicle/vehicle, U0126 (1 nmol)/vehicle, vehicle/OXT (1 nmol) or U0126/OXT.
To further support the importance of MEK1/ERK1 in our system, p38 or STAT1 inhibitors could further raise ICAM-1 expressions in non-induced or ATRA-induced NB4 (
The mechanism for this action was explored and found to be related to MEK1/ERK1 activation reduction.
MEK1 is upstream from and the main activator of ERK1, yet we found that the MEK1 inhibitor was more effective than the ERK1 inhibitor in suppressing ATRA-caused ICAM-1 elevation, suggesting there may be some way other than MEK1 using ERK1 to regulate ICAM-1 expressions.
It is also worth noting that there might be at least two ways for celastrol to inhibit ERK1 activation; one is through MEK1 inhibition, another is through direct ERK1 inhibition, a reported action found by informatics simulation and laboratory tests 
Here, we provide the first documentation that celastrol can blunt tissue infiltration in DS animal models, reduce pro-inflammatory cytokine secretion, and specifically inhibit the key hyper-inflammation component ICAM-1 in ATRA-induced NB4 in a MEK1/ERK1-related way, all without obvious effects on differentiation.
HA mediates its effects through cell surface receptors such as RHAMM/HMMR, CD44, LYVE1 and TLR2,4, which activate downstream signaling pathways including PI3 kinase/AKT and MEK1/ERK1,2.
(d) Ingenuity Pathway Analysis (IPA) of differentially up-regulated geneset and down-regulated geneset (dii) showing their strong connections to PI3K/AKT and MEK/ERK signaling pathways.
AKT, MEK/ERK, and NFATc1 activation are required for osteoclast differentiation 
Unexpectedly, MEK/ERK and AKT signaling were elevated in the absence of TIEG1, which is the opposite of what one would expect if these pathways were causing the defect in osteoclast differentiation.
We and others have documented that MEK/ERK and AKT pathways are required to support osteoclast survival 
(C) PD 98059 (MEK1/2 inhibitor) blocked ERK phosphorylation in PC12 cells exposed to 6-ODHA.
To dissect the role of individual members of MAPK, we examined the effects of MEK1/2 (upstream of ERK1/2) inhibitor PD98059, or p38 inhibitor PD169316 on phosphorylation of MAPKs and on the cell viability of PC12 cells exposed to 6-OHDA.
 MEK1/2 is an ERK kinase, which phosphorylates ERK resulting in its activation.
To further elucidate the role of ERK pathway in the protective effect against HG by silencing TRPM7, U0126, an inhibitor of MEK1/2, was used.
The Ras/Raf/MEK/extracellular signal-regulated kinase (ERK) cascade couples signals from cell surface receptors to transcription factors, which regulate gene expression of proteins that control cell cycle progression 
As FGF2/FGFR activates various signaling pathways such as MEK/ERK, PI3K/Akt, PLC/PKC and Src, we investigated whether the cytostatic effect of FGF2 involves these canonical pathways.
The mitotic and survival pathways known to be activated by FGFRs (MEK/ERK, PI3K/AKT and PKC) were next tested for possible involvement in the cytostatic effects of FGF2.
Densitometry based quantification of the western blots showing relative expression intensity of pMEK1 vs. MEK1 and pERK1/2 vs. ERK1/2.
An important signaling pathway in the tumor genesis of uveal melanomas is the mitogen-activated protein kinase (MAPK) pathway incorporating RAS, RAF, MEK, and ERK 
For example, nerve growth factor (NGF) and epidermal growth factor (EGF) induce different activation kinetics of the Raf/MEK/ERK signaling pathway and result in differentiation and proliferation, respectively.
However, a direct and quantitative linkage between the temporal profile of Raf/MEK/ERK activation and the cellular outputs has not been established due to a lack of means to precisely perturb its signaling kinetics.
Here, we construct a light-gated protein-protein interaction system to regulate the activation pattern of the Raf/MEK/ERK signaling pathway.
Light-induced activation of the Raf/MEK/ERK cascade leads to significant neurite outgrowth in rat PC12 pheochromocytoma cell lines in the absence of growth factors.
A good example is the Raf/MEK/ERK signaling pathway, which plays a vital role in cell proliferation, differentiation, and apoptosis 
Despite the obvious importance of the temporal dimension of the Raf/MEK/ERK pathway, there are very limited means to probe this dimension with high accuracy.
In this paper, we construct a light-gated Raf/MEK/ERK activation and inactivation system based on the CRY2 and CIBN protein pair.
We demonstrate that a low intensity of blue light allows precise temporal control of the Raf/MEK/ERK activity over several days.
In the absence of growth factors, light-induced Raf/MEK/ERK activation stimulates significant neurite outgrowth in PC12 cells.
However, NGF induces more neurites per cell than light does, likely due to light-induced selective activation of Raf/MEK/ERK pathway in contrast to NGF-induced activation of multiple downstream pathways.
Membrane recruitment of Raf1 should subsequently activate MEK and ERK.
Next, we showed that light could be used to precisely control the activation kinetics of the Raf/MEK/ERK pathway.
As NGF activates several signaling pathways, we set out to examine whether light-induced Raf/MEK/ERK activation alone could steer PC12 cells toward differentiation in the absence of NGF.
To confirm that light-induced neurite outgrowth is due to light-induced Raf/MEK/ERK activation, we quantified the neurite length at various conditions by measuring the longest neurite for each cell 
Light allows precise and versatile control of Raf/MEK/ERK activation kinetics, which enables us to quantitatively measure how the activation kinetics determines neurite outgrowth in PC12 cells.
In this report, we demonstrated precise and reversible control of the Raf/MEK/ERK signaling activity utilizing light-mediated CRY2PHR-CIBN interaction.
Light-induced Raf/MEK/ERK activation was sufficient to induce neurite outgrowth in PC12 cells in the absence of growth factor stimulation.
However, it is intriguing that the activation of Raf/MEK/ERK pathway alone induced longer but fewer neurites compared with NGF.
The results suggest that the Raf/MEK/ERK signaling pathway is primarily responsible for neurite extension whereas other downstream pathways of NGF binding play roles in neurite initiation.
In this study we show that the H-Ras oncoprotein engages the MEK-ERK pathway to drive phosphorylation of STAT3 on S727, while phosphoinositide 3-kinase (PI3K) and mTOR activity were superfluous.
However, cells expressing a mitochondrially restricted STAT3 with a phospho-mimetic mutation at S727 were partially resistant to inhibition of the ERK pathway, exhibiting a partial rescue of anchorage-independent cell growth in the presence of MEK inhibitor.
This study shows that the MEK-ERK pathway is required for activated Ras-induced phosphorylation of STAT3 on S727, that inhibition of STAT3 S727 phosphorylation contributes to the anti-oncogenic potential of MEK inhibitors, and that mitochondrial STAT3 is one of the critical substrates of the Ras-MEK-ERK- axis during cellular transformation. 
In this study, we used genetic mutants and pharmacological inhibitors to show that H-, N- and K-Ras engage the Raf-MEK-ERK pathway to cause phosphorylation of STAT3 on S727, which is necessary for the anchorage-independent growth of transformed fibroblasts as colonies in soft agar.
Moreover, we show that a STAT3 mutant that mimics S727 phosphorylation (S727D) is partially refractory to the block in transformation resulting from pharmacologic inhibition of the Raf-MEK-ERK MAPK pathway.
Ras engages numerous signaling pathways to elicit its tumorigenic activities, primarily the MEK-ERK, phosphoinositol-3-kinase (PI3K), and Ral pathways [
To confirm that the Raf-MEK-ERK pathway is engaged by activated Ras to transduce phosphorylation of STAT3 on S727, we titrated the dose of the MEK-ERK pathway inhibitor, PD0325901 [
The data described above document that H-Ras activation of MEK-ERK signaling results in phosphorylation of STAT3 on S727, and that the expression of a mitochondrially-restricted phospho-mimetic STAT3 supports Ras transformation.
If STAT3 S727 phosphorylation is a critical MEK-ERK target, then inhibition of this pathway in H-RasV12 transformed cells should impede colony formation.
Moreover, if this phosphorylation event is a major ERK pathway target, then MTS-STAT3S727D mutation might be expected to support cell transformation even in the presence of MEK-ERK inhibition.
The best characterized in the context of cancer are the Raf1-MEK-ERK, PI3K, and Ral pathways.
Inhibition of the MEK-ERK pathway blocked colony formation driven by all three activated Ras isoforms (
Notably, our study further demonstrated that MEK1/2 (upstream of ERK1/2) inhibitor U0126 or p38MAPK inhibitor SB203580 or JNK inhibitor SP600125 dramatically abolished CoCl
A multifactorial approach was developed to rationally evaluate the singular and interactive control of MEK/ERK pathway, GSK-3 inhibition, and LIF/STAT3 signaling at physiological and non-physiological oxygen tensions.
Oncogenic RET effector pathways include ERK/MEK, PI3K/AKT and STAT3 
To identify the downstream signaling molecules of the receptor activated by BDNF in BMSCs, we analyzed the phosphorylation of MEK/ERK and PI3K/AKT by western blot.
Dys-regulation and activation of Raf-MEK-ERK-survivin has been shown associated with anti-apoptotic capability of cancer cells 
It has been reported that the activation of Raf-MEK-ERK-survivin signaling pathway could protect endothelial cells against gamma-radiation-induced apoptosis 
Mammalian MAP kinase pathways are composed of three major pathways: MEK1 (mitogen-activated protein kinase kinase 1)/ERK 1/2 (extracellular signal-regulated kinases 1/2)/p90 RSK (p90 ribosomal S6 kinase), JNK (c-Jun amino (N)-terminal kinase)/c-Jun, and p38 MAPK pathways.
Conventional MAP kinases comprise three intracellular signaling pathways: MEK1 (mitogen-activated protein kinase kinase 1)/ERK 1/2 (extracellular signal-regulated kinases 1/2)/p90 RSK (p90 ribosomal S6 kinase), JNK (c-Jun amino (N)-terminal kinase)/c-Jun, and p38 MAPK pathways.
In the present study, the abundance of phospho-MEK1, phospho-ERK1/2, phospho-p90 RSK, phospho-JNK, phospho-c-Jun, phospho-P38 MAPK, total-MEK1, total-ERK1/2, total-p90 RSK, total-c-Jun and total-P38 MAPK was simultaneously quantified in the cochlear samples.
In the present experiments, both phosphorylated and total MAP kinases were quantitatively examined, as phospho- MEK1, ERK1/2, p90 RSK, JNK, c-Jun, and p38 MAPK are the active forms of the each proteins, which further regulate the downstream signaling pathways including several transcription factors.
Similarly to the levels of total-MEK1 and total-ERK 1/2, those of total-p90 RSK (
As the key markers for each pathway of the MEK1/ERK1/2/p90RSK, JNK/c-Jun, and p38 MAPK cascades, immunolocalizations of phospho-p90RSK, phospho-JNK and phospho-p38 MAPK were investigated in the cochlea.
Upstream from the MEK1/ERK1/2/p90 RSK signaling pathway, growth factor binding to receptor protein tyrosine kinases in the cell membrane triggers activation of a G-protein, Ras, by exchange of its guanosine diphosphate (GDP) to guanosine triphosphate (GTP) 
The inhibitory effects of PI3K inhibitor LY294002, MEK1/2 inhibitor PD98059, and transient induction of AKT and ERK1/2 phosphorylation by FGF-2 suggested important roles of PI3K and ERK signaling pathways in FGF-2-induced AQP3 expression and cell migration.
In addition, the finding that MEK1/2 inhibitor PD98059 exhibited more dramatic suppressing effects on AQP3 expression in comparison to PI3K inhibitor LY294002, highlighted the importance of ERK signal pathway.
Intriguingly, MEK/ERK inhibitors PD98059 and U0126 suppressed RAD001 plus MK-2206-induced beclin-1 expression, autophagy induction and cytotoxicity in HGC-27 cells.
A recent study by Wang et al., suggests that although moderate or transit MEK/ERK activation might inhibit cell autophagy, sustained and profound MEK/ERK activation can actually induce autophagy 
In this study, MEK inhibitor U0126 attenuated the inflammatory nociceptive response and the activation of spinal ERK 1/2 and Cdk5 phosphorylation in the CFA or formalin-induced inflammatory pain.
Previous biochemical work has implicated chemical inhibition of MEK and subsequent blocking of ERK1/2 activation as a major pathway responsible for cortactin S405/418 phosphorylation 
Selumetinib inhibition of cortactin S405/S418 phosphorylation reinforces the MEK-ERK1/2 pathway as the main signaling route responsible for phosphorylating these cortactin sites in tumor cells 
pERK, pMTOR, pMEK1/2 and pPRAS40 are shown for one case and pBAD and pAKT are shown from a second case.
Furthermore, previous studies have demonstrated that both PI3k-Akt and MEK-ERK1/2 signals play a pivotal role in the cardioprotection of sevoflurane or ischemic postconditioning [
In addition to these reactions, HRG stimulates cell growth of both HCC2998 and MKN45-1 cells, depending on the ERK pathway given that the MEK inhibitor abolishes this effect.
A recent study by Hu and colleagues demonstrated a critical role for the endogenous Akt and MEK1/ERK pathways in counteracting ER stress and proposed that the endogenous Akt/IAPs and MEK/ERKs control cell survival by resisting ER stress-induced cell death signaling 
PD98059 (Calbiochem) inhibits ERK phosphorylation by blocking MEK activity.
Plasmids expressing JNK1/2, ERK2, p38, MEKK3 and MEKK4 were generous gifts from Dr. Richard R. Vaillancourt at University of Arizona.
Expression of the stress signaling molecules MEK1/2, ERK, JNK and p38 MAP kinase, the intracellular Ca
To assess the relevance of ERK activation to muscle wasting, TB mice were treated with the MEK inhibitor PD98059 (PD) 
Such cytokine suppression appears to be associated with reduced signaling as evident from reduced phosphorylation of AKT and MEK/ERK in presence of rhSP-D.
We observed that inhibitors of MEK and ERK promote pathway activation through release of negative feedback, consistent with previous data.
Combination of Raf inhibitors with MEK or ERK inhibitors led to an additive promotion of MAPK pathway activation through the combined effects of negative feedback release and priming.
Upstream of the Ras/MAPK pathway, M-CSF binding to its membrane receptor, c-Fms, stimulates phosphorylation of Y807 in the activation loop, resulting in a conformational shift that enhances intrinsic kinase activity and docking of adaptor proteins such as Grb2 and Sos with subsequent activation of the Ras/Raf/MEK/ERK cascade.
Rabbit polyclonal antibodies to ERK (ERK1/ERK2) were purchased from Santa Cruz Biotechnology (Santa Cruz, CA); anti-phospho-ERK protein, anti-MEK (MEK1/MEK2), and anti-p-MEK1/2 were purchased from Cell Signaling Technology (Beverly, MA), and anti-tubulin was from Covance (Princeton, NJ).
Shoc2 has a synergistic effect on activation of the Ras-Raf-MEK-ERK pathway 
MEK inhibitors have shown promise in treating cancers addicted to oncogenic mutations that dysregulate the RAF/MEK/ERK signaling pathway.
Since mutations in the RAS/MEK/ERK or PI3K/AKT/MTOR pathways have been linked to the response to MEK inhibitors, we evaluated these mutations against our seven-gene signature in predicting drug response (
In conclusion, our study suggested that FGF-2 induced PI3K/AKT and MEK/ERK-1/2, but also PKCs in hPS cells.
To address whether MEK activation is essential for ERK mediated Egr inductions under the TCR-stimulated condition, we stimulated DP cells in the presence of U0126, an inhibitor of MEK1/2 
These effects appeared to be specific because HCCC-9810 cells treated with hUC-MSC cultures did not alter the levels of either phosphorylated ERK1/2 or phosphorylated MEK1/2 in HCCC-9810 cells (data not shown).
It has been reported that transcription factors Elk1, c-fos and c-myc are all highly related to cell proliferation, and regulated by MEK/ERK pathway 
In summary, we demonstrate for the first time that JWA deficiency enhances DNA damage in epidermal cells induced by DMBA, however, suppresses TPA-induced MEK-ERK activation, cell proliferation, and formation of skin papillomas.
A panel of seven human breast cancer and melanoma cell lines harboring different mutations in the Ras-Raf pathway was implanted orthotopically in mice, and tumor growth, ERK1/2, MEK1/2 and AKT activation, and blood vessel density and permeability were analyzed.
B-Raf is a serine/threonine kinase responsible for the activation of the MEK-ERK signaling pathway downstream of the Ras GTPase.
Growth inhibition was associated with reduced ERK1/2 phosphorylation and MEK1 phosphorylation in the two cell lines harboring mutations in exon 11 of B-Raf.
A lesser degree of growth inhibition was observed for MCF7 cells transfected with HER2, which was accompanied by a less pronounced decrease in pERK1/2 and pMEK1 expression.
To confirm that B-Raf was targeted in the pazopanib-sensitive primary tumors, the phosphorylation levels of the B-Raf downstream targets MEK1/2 and ERK1/2 was determined by immunohistochemistry (
Representative photographs of pERK1/2, pMEK1/2 and pAKT immunostaining are shown for the vehicle and the 100 mg/kg pazopanib treated groups.
The effect of pazopanib on the tumor growth of the WM3918 cell line was confirmed to not be associated with B-Raf targeting as a significant decrease of pMEK1/2 and pERK1/2 was not observed at any drug dose.
In cells harboring a wild type genotype in the Ras-Raf pathway, Raf inhibitors induced a paradoxical activation of the downstream MEK-ERK pathway, due to transactivation of C-Raf 
The Ras-Raf-MEK-ERK pathway induces VEGF expression directly or indirectly 
Our data suggest that several markers, including B-Raf status (pMEK/pERK), Ras mutation and HER2/receptor tyrosine kinase activation, should be investigated in tumors to determine if they constitute predictive markers of efficacy for pazopanib treatment.
Mice were orally administered either 8 ml/kg buffer, 100 mg/kg of the MEK (ERK pathway) inhibitor PD0325901 or 40 mg/kg of the p38 inhibitor SB239063.
The ERK pathway inhibitor, PD0325901, is a specific non-ATP competitive inhibitor of MEK, with well described pharmacokinetics, that blocks the phosphorylation of ERK 
To gain further insight into the connection between p-ERK and PS, the specific MEK1/2 inhibitors U0126 and PS18 were used in 
We show that death receptor expression and TRAIL sensitivity critically depend on c-MYC and that c-MYC amounts are increased by MEK/ERK and PI3K/AKT signalling pathways which are suppressed by neurofibromin.
To determine if MEK/ERK or PI3K/AKT pathways are involved in the regulation of death receptor expression and TRAIL sensitivity we treated 1507.2 cells with specific inhibitors of MEK (U0126) and PI3K (LY294002).
Different mechanisms have been uncovered of how MEK/ERK and PI3K/AKT signalling may regulate c-MYC including protein stabilisation 
In addition, Raf-MEK-ERK pathway was involved in the neuroprotective effect of AGS-IV against glutamate-induced neurotoxicity in PC12 cells.
Both Ras/RAF/MEK/ERK and Akt pathways, which are downstream to Met and Tpr-Met, are known to be involved in the growth promotion and protection of cardiomyocytes from apoptosis.
The autocrine-paracrine signaling diverges from the intracellular signaling distal to MEK/ERK.
In melanoma, both the Ras-Raf-MEK-ERK (MAPK) and the PI3K-AKT (AKT) signaling pathways are constitutively activated through multiple mechanisms, and thus exert several key functions in melanoma development and progression 
ERK is a MAPK kinase located downstream of Raf and MEK in the RAS signalling pathway.
It has been reported that Raf/MEK/ERK and PI3K/AKT signaling pathways represent the downstream targets of activated EGFR.
To explore the importance of ERK1/2 activation in CPV infection, percentage of infected cells and depolarization of mitochondria were determined in the presence of the MEK1/2 specific inhibitor U0126 (Promega, Madison, WI, USA).
EGR-1 induction) requires an intact MEK-ERK signalling pathway 
The MEK blocker U0126 completely inhibited this ERK phosphorylation.
In previous studies, we analyzed how oxidative stress affects the activation and localization of ERK1/2 and Akt kinases, key components of MEK and PI3 signaling cascades.
This research demonstrated crosstalk between MEK and PI3 kinase pathways, and identified a novel signaling link in the nucleus of stressed cells that connects Akt phosphorylated on Ser473 with dually phosphorylated ERK1/2 
The Ras-MEK-ERK signaling pathway is involved in cell proliferation, apoptosis and differentiation.
EGF stimulates cell proliferation via the Ras-MEK-ERK signaling cascade 
Activation of the Shh pathway results in increased levels of Gli1 expression and activation of the downstream Ras-MEK-ERK pathway, causing cell proliferation.
In WT neurospheres cultured in the presence of EGF, PIC signals via TLR3 to inhibit Gli1 expression and interfere with MEK and ERK phosphorylation.
Inhibition of MEK-ERK activation results in the decreased proliferation and induced Fas expression and apoptosis observed after PIC treatment of primary cortical neurospheres.
Activation of Ras leads to initiation of a signal via Raf/MEK/ERK which in turn phosphorylates/activates transcription factor ELK.
Activation of Ras signaling pathway stimulates a signal through Raf/MEK/ERK pathway inducing phosphorylation of ELK.
C- peptide binds specifically to a membrane structure, most likely a G-protein coupled receptor, with subsequent activation of PLC, isoforms of both classic and novel PKC, Rho A, MEK1/2 and ERK1/2.
Since MEK/ERK pathways are known to be involved in both RANK and c-fms signalling 
The results above indicated that ERK1/2 phosphorylation was enhanced by co-treatment with M-CSF and RANKL, suggesting that MEK/ERK signalling may be involved in M-CSF enhancement of RANKL-induced resorption activity.
To test this possibility, we examined the effects of PD98059, a specific inhibitor of the ERK1/2 activator MEK-1, on this effect.
RanBPM was found to inhibit MEK and ERK activation induced by ectopic expression of active RasV12.
Using a similar experimental scheme, we next investigated whether RanBPM expression could inhibit MEK and ERK activation by active c-Raf.
In order to achieve more knowledge about underlying mechanisms we investigated activation of the Raf/MEK/ERK1/2 signaling pathway known to have an important role in receptor upregulation 
In an attempt to gain more knowledge about underlying mechanisms we examined the expression of p-ERK1/2 since an important role of the Raf/MEK/ERK1/2 pathway in receptor upregulation has been established earlier in human cerebral arteries 
NS-TGFP cells were treated with p38, extracellular signal-regulated kinase mitogen-activated protein kinase (MEK/ERK) and PI3K/Akt chemical inhibitors (SB203580, PD98059 and wortmannin, respectively), and the differentiation status was evaluated after 24 h (
Human PEBP1 has also been shown to inhibit the Raf/MEK/ERK pathway.
As previously mentioned, PEBP1 from bovine, human or rat is able to bind small ligands as well as proteins such as the Raf-1, MEK and ERK kinases 
To determine if the activation of ERK and AKT is required for the neuroprotective effects of CPE, we used the MEK inhibitor, U0126 and the PI3-K inhibitor, LY294002.
To investigate the signal transduction pathway for the neurotrophic function of CPE, we analyzed the effect of CPE on the activation of the MEK/ERK and PI3-K/AKT signaling pathways since both are major pathways for survival and neuroprotection 
These effects are mediated by MEK/ERK and PI3-K/AKT signaling pathways leading to increased expression of BCL-2, a pro-survival protein, to modulate mitochondrial energetics (
CPE signals the MEK/ERK and PI3-K/AKT signaling pathways which up-regulate the expression of the anti-apoptotic protein, BCL-2, and inhibit the caspase cascade leading to a decrease in cleaved caspase-3, the apoptotic executioner.
The RAS-RAF-MEK-ERK signaling pathway is frequently hyperactivated in colorectal cancer. 
Means between control and icKO mice, or between control and shERK5/caMEK5 infected cells, were analyzed by unpaired two-tail Student 
Using RNAi technology to suppress ERK5 expression or retroviral expression of caMEK5 to activate endogenous ERK5 signaling, we demonstrate that ERK5 is both necessary and sufficient for SVZ-derived aNPCs to differentiate into neurons in culture.
We have presented evidence indicating that hCG stimulates leptin expression in placenta through a signal transduction pathway including Epac, Rap1, and probably B-Raf, up-stream of the MEK-ERK cascade.
The protein kinase C (PKC) inhibitor and the MAPK/ERK kinase (MEK) inhibitor significantly blocked the potentiation of PMA-mediated KLF6 induction and the down-regulation of PTTG1, indicating that PTTG1 is suppressed via the activation of PKC/ERK/KLF6 pathway.
U0126 [1,4-diamino-2,3-dicyano-1,4-bis (2-aminophenylthio)-butadiene], a selective inhibitor of MAPK/ERK kinase 1/2 (MEK1/2), was purchased from Promega (Madison, WI, USA).
It is well described that the ACTH/ACTH receptor complex activates the cAMP/PKA and the MEK/ERK1/2 signaling pathways in adrenal cells 
NCI-R cells were treated with the MAPK/ERK inhibitors PD98059 and U0126 in presence and absence of 8Br-cAMP stimulation under normal (GM) or starved (SM) conditions for 48 h. PD98059 inhibits MEK1 
Downstream signaling of cAMP does not depend on PKA or MEK/MAPK/ERK signaling although these pathways modulate HSD3B2 expression under basal conditions.
Upon treatment with MEKi, target inhibition (dephosphorylation of ERK
Such studies suggest that, in the Ras-Raf-MEK-ERK pathway, Ras clusters act as an analog-digital-analog converter, where analog, continuous EGF input is converted into digital, fully active clusters.
For instance: (1) STAT3 is not activated by TGFA; (2) Phosphorylation of the autocatalytic domain of P70S6 (termed P70S6K in the model) is independent of ERK1; (3) The activation of CREB1 in response to TGFA is likely to be caused by a MEK1 independent route; (4) Phosphorylation of AKT1 is regulated to PI3K activity; and (5) The activation of MEK1 and ERK1 is dependent to MAP3K activation.
Phosphorylation by MEK activates MAPK/ERK in the cytoplasm, and phospho-ERK is thought to enter the nucleus readily to modulate transcription.
The significantly reduced phosphorylation of ERK1/2 was in line with its important role in cellular migration and that of Nox2 in the activation of Ras/Raf/MEK/ERK signalling cascade downstream from the tyrosine receptors.
Phosphorylation of the GTP-Ras-Raf1 complex is catalyzed by PAK and Src, leading to a series of subsequent phosphorylations of MEK, ERK and others.
In contrast, inhibition of ROS, MEK, JNK, or p38 did not significantly alter p-ERK 1/2 localization or apoptosis in TR1- and Trx1-deficient cells compared to control cells.
Since we had noticed that serum, in contrast to insulin, significantly activates ERK in our fibroblasts, we blocked ERK activation with the MEK inhibitor U0126 (
Many studies reveal that the activation of the RAS/RAF/MEK/ERK pathway may be correlated with ADI prostate cancer growth 
Insulin activates two major signaling pathways: the phosphoinositide 3-kinase (PI3K) / protein kinase B (Akt) and methyl ethyl ketone (MEK) /ERK pathways.
ERKs are the direct downstream proteins activated by MEK via phosphorylation 
Chronic morphine treatment suppressed opioid-induced desensitization of cAMP and MAPK signaling and induced activation of the transcription factor, CREB through a MAPK/ERK pathway, since it was prevented by a selective MEK inhibitor, an upstream protein of ERK.
Differences in PI3K/AKT, Ras/Raf/MEK/ERK and JAK/Stat3 signalling between fswt/fs188 and fs164/fs120 cells are shown.
To determine the extent to which MEK-ERK inactivation contributes to mTORC1 inhibition, MEK was inhibited using drugs.
Mitogen-activated protein kinases (MAPKs) such as ERK1/2 (activated by MEK), JNK or p38 are important intracellular mediators of the stimulation of pro-inflammatory cytokine production during innate immune responses 
In the present study, The MEK inhibitor, PD98059, was used to investigate the role of the ERKs pathway in LMP1-enhanced kappa light chain production in NPC cells.
The ERKs upstream kinase MEK inhibitor, PD98059 (Cell Signaling, USA), was prepared as a stock solution of 20 mM in dimethylsulfoxide (DMSO, Sigma).
Although the basal levels of ERK1/2, MEK1/2, and P38 were inconsistently altered in ovarian cancer cells, the phosphorylated forms of MEK1/2 (Ser217/221), ERK1/2 (Thr202/Tyr204), JNK1/2 (Thr183/Tyr185), and P38 (Thr180/Tyr182) were consistently reduced after RPS7 was silenced.
ERK 1/2, MEK1/2 and JNK1/2 were reduced in SKOV3-shRPS7 and OVCA429-shRPS7, but not in OVCA433-shRPS7 (
Canonical MEK1/2-ERK1/2 signaling, and more recently MEK5-ERK5 signaling, have been shown to be critical for neuronal stress responses and/or neurotrophin-mediated neuronal survival 
Importantly, U0126 can also inhibit the MEK5-ERK5 signaling pathway 
In order to define the relative contributions of MEK1/2-ERK1/2 and MEK5-ERK5 signaling to the slow Wallerian degeneration (
A protective or maintenance role for MEK-ERK signaling in injured axons and during developmental axon pruning was previously postulated based on the negative effects of the pan-MEK inhibitor U0126 on neurite health when modeling these conditions in primary rat SCG cultures 
We conclude that MEK-ERK signaling, specifically through MEK1/2 or MEK5, is not required for the preservation of transected neurites by Wld
We have chosen trametinib, a drug targeting MEK in the ERK pathway, to address two questions.
The MAPK (Mitogen activated protein kinase) pathway (RAS-RAF-MEK-ERK) and PI3K-AKT-mTOR pathways play dominant roles in regulating diverse cellular processes, including proliferation and survival, in breast cancer.
The PI3K/AKT/mTOR and MEK/ERK pathways are interconnected by multiple points of convergence, cross-talk, and feedback 
Furthermore, utilization of the MEK-ERK signaling pathways, as determined by phosphorylation of signaling components, varied widely across a series of cell lines and did not directly reflect mutation of genes coding these components 
Previous studies have shown that even minimal concentrations of Epo activate STAT5, MEK, Ras, and ERKs in primary human erythroid progenitors 
Inhibitors specific to JNK (SP600125), MEK/ERK (PD98059), p38 MAPK (SB203580), caspases (z-VAD-fmk), protease (MG132) and ER stress (Salubrinal) were purchased from Calbiochem (San Diego, CA).
Surprisingly, the MEK/ERK inhibitor U0126 had only a slight sensitization to BPDE-induced cell death.
Activation of RAS-RAF-MEK-ERK signaling pathway is implicated in the development of a wide variety of human tumors.
Research studies conducted over the last decade on melanoma molecular pathogenesis improved the elucidation of its key signaling pathways, such as those mediated by Ras/Raf/MEK/ERK (alias MAPK), PI3K/Akt/mTOR, Wnt/b-catenin/APC, MITF and glutamate cascade 
To identify the effector(s) of the EGFR-induced signalling pathway on which NPM1 may act, and to determine whether NPM1 action is direct or not on the EGF gene promoter, we performed transfection assays with a constitutively active form of MEKK1 (caMEKK1): caMEKK1 phosphorylates ERK1/2 kinase MEK1/2, and thereby, constitutively activates ERK1/2 in the absence of MEK1/2 inhibition.
In shScr LNCAP cells, caMEKK1 transfection induces the phosphorylation of ERK1/2.
(a) ERK1/2 activation is rescued by caMEKK1.
shScr and shNPM1 LNCaP cells are transfected with a constitutively activated construct of MEKK1 (caMEKK1) and ERK1/2 phosphorylation level was analysed using western blotting.
The increased activity of the EGF/EGFR complex that is associated with prostate tumour progression leads to the activation of different downstream signalling pathways including MEKK/ERK and PI3K/AKT (Phosphoinositide 3-OH Kinase).
Indeed, the transfection of a constitutively active form of MEKK1 in shNPM1 LNCaP cells rescues the phosphorylation status of ERK1/2 and above all, EGF promoter activity.
To gain a molecular insight into how CARP attenuated heart hypertrophy, we examined expression of the mitogen-activated protein kinase cascade and found that the concentrations of phosphorylated ERK1/2 and MEK were markedly reduced in the hearts of transgenic mice subjected to pressure overload.
(C) Quantification of the expression of the p-MEK1/2 and p-ERK1/2 proteins shown in (B) at 30 min after commencement of PE treatment.
To determine whether MK-STYX induces neurites in PC12 cells through the ERK/MAPK pathway, MEK, which is necessary for ERK/MAPK activation 
However, our studies with the MEK inhibitor provide evidence that MK-STYX does not function through Ras-ERK/MAPK, but further downstream or by another pathway.
Multiple studies have shown the important role of autophagy in NMTC pathogenesis, representing one of the most prominent downstream pathways of the often aberrantly regulated RAS/RAF/MEK/ERK and PI3K/Akt/mTOR pathways in NMTC, leading to inactivation of the autophagy machinery 
To address this question, we infected rat hepatocytes with Ad/PIMT and/or Ad/Med1 and cultured them in presence of UO126, a MEK1/ERK inhibitor.
Upon infection with either Ad/PIMT or Ad/Med1 the glucose output was increased compare to that of Ad/LacZ infection, which was completely abolished in the presence of the MEK/ERK inhibitor (
We also observed that the pro-gluconeogenic action of PIMT or Med1 requires the intact MEK1/ERK signaling.
PIMT or Med1 dependent increase in hepatic glucose output was inhibited upon the pharmacological blockade of signaling through MEK1/ERK pathway.
To determine whether the difference in ERK activation contributes to the effect associated with PrP knockdown, we used MEK inhibitor PD98059 to block ERK1/2 phosphorylation.
Binding of growth factors to their cognate receptors leads to the activation of the RAS-RAF-MEK-ERK mitogen activated protein kinase (MAPK) cascade and is involved in regulation of many aspects of cellular growth and differentiation 
Inhibition of either MEK/ERK (U0126) or SFK (SU6656) signalling resulted in a complete loss of neurite outgrowth from the cells consistent with evidence in the literature that has implicated SFKs and ERK as critical processes for neurite extension.
First, we searched the names of important pathways which were widely discussed in literatures; and then we used IPA to pick up the pathway topological structure of those pathways, including the estrogen signaling pathway, EGFR signaling, TNFR signaling, PI3K/AKT pathway, MEK/ERK pathway, JNK/p53/p21 pathway, p38 MAPK pathway, and HDAC1 pathway (
The involvement of MEK/ERK, p38MAPK, PI3K, and PKC in the pathway mediating the effect of mucosal leptin on glucose absorption was studied.
In addition, PMA (100 nM dissolved in DMSO), an activator of PKC was also administered either alone or in the individual presence of inhibitors of MEK/ERK (PD98059), or p38MAPK (SB202190) or PI3K (wortmannin). 
Effect of leptin (10 nM) on glucose absorption by Caco-2 cells in presence and absence of (a) PD98059, inhibitor of MEK/ERK, (b) SB202190, an inhibitor of p38MAPK, (c) Wortmannin, an inhibitor of PI3K, (d) Calphostin C, an inhibitor of PKC.
 When Caco-2 cells were pretreated with PD98059, SB202190, wortmannin, or calphostin C, respective inhibitors of MEK/ERK, p38MAP kinase, PI3-kinase and PKC, the inhibitory effect of leptin on glucose absorption disappeared completely and went back to control values (
Effect of leptin (10 nM) on glucose absorption by Caco-2 cells in presence and absence of (a) Calphostin C + SB202190, inhibitors of PKC and p38MAPK respectively, (b) Calphostin C + Wortmannin, respective inhibitors of PKC and PI3K, (c) PD98059 + Wortmannin, inhibitors of MEK/ERK and PI3K respectively, (d) PD98059 + SB202190 + Wortmannin, respective inhibitors of MEK/ERK, p38MAPK and PI3K.
Leptin could not exert its effect on glucose absorption in the simultaneous inhibition of MEK/ERK and PI3K, or the simultaneous inhibition of MEK/ERK, p38MAPK and PI3K (
The leptin-induced increase in the phosphorylated forms of Akt and p38MAPK still appeared when MEK/ERK was inhibited (
ERK is one of the key factors in the Ras/Raf/MEK/ERK signaling pathway.
The MEK/ERK pathway is known to regulate signal-responsive APP processing 
Previous figures showed the MEK-ERK pathway is linked to CXCR4 expression, we want to explore further downstream the possible link between NFAT3 pathways in CXCR4 regulation based on the significant increase in NFAT3 mRNA in 3D spheroids by using chemicals to inhibit or activate the NFAT3 pathway.
The increase in phospho-ERK levels may directly or indirectly inhibit NFAT3 activity but when phospho-ERK levels were decreased through 3D spheroid culturing or treatment with MEK inhibitor U0126, activated NFAT3 transcriptional factor localized to the nucleus and occupied the CXCR4 promoter to activate CXCR4 expression.
The Ras/Raf/MEK/ERK kinase cascade is involved in the control of cell proliferation, cell survival and invasion in CRC cancer cells [
The role of matrix metalloproteinase-2/9 and the Ras/MEK/ERK signaling pathways were used to evaluate the effect of PIPO on VSMC migration.
A series of experiments were performed to measure effects of PIPO on levels of the candidate signaling proteins matrix metalloproteinase-2/9, Ras, MEK, p-MEK, ERK and p-ERK in PDGF-BB-stimulated VSMCs.
PIPO significantly decreased the expression levels of Ras, MEK, p-ERK, MMP-2, and MMP-9.
Tumor cell detachment in response to HAMLET is accompanied by disruption of cytoskeletal structure and reduced focal adhesion kinase (FAK) phosphorylation and MAPK/ERK kinase (MEK)/extracellular-signal regulated kinase 1/2 (ERK1/2) signaling.
Maintaining the balance between the proliferative MEK/ERK1/2 pathway and the apoptosis-promoting p38 and JNK pathways is essential to control cell survival 
ERKs (p44/42 MAPK or ERK1/2) are phosphorylated by the sequential activation of RAF1 and MEK1/2 in response to growth factors and mitogens and induce either proliferation or differentiation 
Legend: RTK, receptor tyrosine kinase; RAS, synaptic Ras-GTPase-activating protein; RAF (known as MAPK3), mitogen-activated protein kinase (MAPK); MEK (known as MAPK2); MAPK kinase; ERK1/2, extracellular signal-regulated kinase; Keap1, Kelch-like ECH-associated protein 1; Nrf2, NF-E2-related factor 2; ARE, antioxidant response element; HO-1, heme oxygenase-1; Znpp-IX, zinc protoporphyrin-IX.
To study the specific role of ERK1/2 pathway in the downregulation of MMP-13 and KGFR expression, we used adenoviral gene delivery (RAdMEK1CA) of constitutively active MEK1 (the upstream kinase of ERK1/2) to obtain specific activation of ERK1/2 (
While this notion is well supported by studies of the RAF/MEK/ERK pathway 
Western blot results show inhibition of TMEM16A led to a decrease in phospho-MEK, phospho-ERK1/2 and cyclin D1.
Knockdown of TMEM16A leads to attenuated activation of MEK and ERK1/2 and dysregulation of cyclin D1.
A) Inhibition of ERK and Akt phosphorylation by suppression of MAPK and PI3K/Akt pathways using the MEK-specific inhibitor U0126 and the Akt-specific inhibitor Akti IV, respectively.
This pathway is activated by the upstream input signal Ras protein, and comprises a set of three protein kinases, namely Raf, MEK and ERK, with a highly conserved molecular architecture that acts sequentially 
(Blue-line: Raf; green-line: MEK, red-line: ERK.
(A, B, C) Simulated Raf, MEK and ERK activities at 10 min when the MAP kinase module was stimulated by different signal inputs and inhibited by phosphatase PP2A with different concentrations.
We used the proteomic data of the ARaf1 protein, the dual specificity mitogen-activated protein kinase kinase 2 (MEK) and the mitogen-activated protein kinase 1 (ERK) in 
While changes in the phosphorylation status of MEK and ERK were not observed in HRasV12-expressing cells following Cdc42 loss, reduction in the levels of p-Akt was evident, suggesting that Cdc42 depletion may compromise the activation of PI3K signaling downstream of activated Ras.
Emerging studies have begun to explore the therapeutic values of various targeting strategies outside the canonical Ras effector pathway, Raf-MEK-ERK, and emphasize the significance of identifying additional pathways either directly involved in Ras signaling or functioning as key modifiers that are required for oncogenic Ras-driven tumorigenesis 
Previous work in our laboratory showed that kinase suppressor of Ras 1 (KSR1), a scaffold protein for Raf, MEK and ERK 
As MEK inhibition affected T cell proliferation 48 hours after stimulation, we wanted to confirm whether the decreased mTORC1 activity in UO126-treated T cells was due to an impaired activation of mTORC1 by ERK, and not to some indirect effect of decreased proliferation.
MEK and ERK activation are impaired during T cell activation in cells deficient for the scaffold molecule KSR1 
Inhibition of the ERK signaling pathway with a MEK inhibitor, or the absence of KSR1 did not affect the early activation of mTOR, but only its sustained activation 48 hours after T cell activation.
Several studies have shown that PAKs are involved in the ERK-signaling cascade by phosphorylating the ERK upstream molecules, c-Raf and MEK1 
A, Western blots of MEK1/2, ERK1/2, p38, and JNK phosphorylation and their total protein levels 28 days after surgery in WT and KO mice.
Raf kinase inhibitory protein (RKIP; also known as PEBP1, for phosphatidylethanolamine-binding protein1), as indicated by the name, was first identified as the endogenous inhibitor of the RAF/MEK/ERK pathway, inhibiting Raf-1 activation 
RKIP action was first described as an inhibitor of the RAF-1- MEK interaction, thereby preventing the activation of RAF/MEK/ERK signal transduction 
Inhibition of nicotinamide adenine dinucleotide phosphate (NADPH) oxidase activity and MEK-ERK signaling prevents NET release in response to these antibodies.
Thus, SIRL-1 engagement can dampen spontaneous and anti-neutrophil antibody-induced NET formation in SLE, likely by suppressing NAPDH oxidase and MEK-ERK activity.
As we previously showed that engagement of SIRL-1 abrogates signaling of the MEK-ERK pathway and suppresses the formation of ROS in neutrophils [
Crucial roles for MEK-ERK signaling, NE and ROS in the molecular events leading to the release of NETs have been proposed.
(B) Elevation of the phosphorylation levels of MEK and ERK by DA-Raf knockdown.
Therefore, strong and sustained activation of MEK and ERK negatively regulates EMT in RLE cells.
However, intrinsic DA-Raf is not sufficient to prevent the high levels of MEK and ERK activities that are induced by FGF2 stimulation or the expression of constitutively active H-Ras, B-Raf, or MEK, to bring about EMT.
In other words, the high levels of MEK and ERK activities are beyond the limit that intrinsic DA-Raf can suppress.
U0126 (MEK1/2 inhibitors), antibodies against SRC, ERK1/2, P38 MAPK, and phosphorylation-dependent antibodies against SRC, ERK1/2, P38 MAPK were purchased from Cell Signaling Technology (Beverly, MA, USA).
PI3K/Akt and Ras/Raf/MEK/ERK are the most well-known cell-survival promoting pathways engaged in mediating FAK/Src signaling by integrins 
PD98059 is an inhibitor of MAPK/ERK kinase (MEK), thereby inhibiting the phosphorylation and the activation of MAPK.
The treatment with PLX4720 in SK-MEL-2 cells resulted in an increase in the phosphorylation of MEK and ERK.
RAS proteins are membrane-bound small G proteins, whereas RAF, MEK, and ERK are cytosolic protein kinases that form a tiered protein kinase cascade downstream of RAS 
Blocking with specific kinase inhibitors suggested that that activation of MEK/ERK and PI3-kinase/Akt pathways are involved in trypsin-eveoked induction of VEGF.
In the absence of YopM ERK1/2 and RSK obviously become rapidly and thoroughly dephosphorylated and thereby inactivated when upstream MEK signalling was inhibited indicating tight regulation of the MEK-ERK-RSK pathway by phosphatases.
In this cascade, flotillin-1 forms a molecular complex with EGFR, but also with CRAF, MEK1, ERK1/2 and KSR1, thus putatively working as a novel MAPK scaffolder 
MAPK inhibitors, including MEK1/2 inhibitor U0126, which inhibits extracellular signal-regulated kinases 1 and 2 (ERK1/2) activation, p38 inhibitor SB203580, and c-Jun/SAPK N-terminal kinases (JNK) inhibitor SP600125, were purchased from Calbiochem (La Jolla, CA, USA).
reported the AMPK-MEK/ERK-TSC-mTOR pathway regulation of Beclin 1 represented different thresholds responsible for a protective or destructive autophagy 
Signaling of PDGFRA or other RTKs results in activation of Ras-Raf-MEK-ERK pathway in gliomas 
PDGFRA activation triggers the activation of Ras-Raf-MEK-ERK and PI3K-AKT pathways.
Both Ras-Raf-MEK-ERK and PI3K-AKT pathways are highly active in gliomas 
To investigate the pathway involved in U0126-dependent reduction of surface PDGFRA expression on glioma cells, we focused on the ERK pathway since a series of studies reported that U0126 inhibits the phosphorylation of ERK by MEK 
Both the variations in the extent of surface expression of PDGFRA in glioma cells from different patients, as well as its regulation by MEK-ERK activity following U0126 treatment suggest that the PDGFRA spatial distribution could be regulated by cell signaling.
Previous reports have indicated the role of PDGFRA signaling in the activation of Ras-Raf-MEK-ERK pathway 
MEK might regulate PDGFRA surface expression via the activation of ERK molecules, which in turn translocate to the nucleus to activate RTK related transcriptional programs; surface expression of PDGFRA could be a consequence of the activated transcriptional programs 
The initiating signal for autophagy formation is poorly understood, whereas it has been established that several molecules and signaling pathways are implicated in regulating autophagy, such as PI3K-AKT-mTOR (phosphatidylinositol 3-kinase/protein kinase B/mammalian target of rapamycin), MAPKs, Raf-1-MEK1/2-ERK1/2 and PTEN (phosphatase and tensin homologue) pathways 
Globally, after ligand binding IGF1R can signal directly from the membrane (IGF1R signaling internalization-independent), with a major degree of IRS1/PI3K/AKT signaling activation and a smaller enhancement of the Ras/Raf/MEK/ERK signaling pathway, or, when internalized either by clathrin and/or caveolin-dependent mechanisms, it can signal from vesicles.
Through protein-protein interaction, clathrin and AP2 also bind several proteins of the endocytic machinery, such as dynamin, which regulates the fission of the CCPs with the consequent formation of CCVs, and GRB2, which recruits and binds the SOS protein and the IGF1R-phosphorylated protein Shc, activating the RAS/RAF/MEK/ERK and p38MAPK signaling pathways.
Pre-treatment of endothelial cells with MEK inhibitor U0126 that inhibits the activity of ERK1/2, prevented the Tat and cocaine mediated down-regulation of tight junction protein ZO-1 at the cell periphery, suggesting the role of ERK MAP kinase in ZO-1 disruption.
EGF-regulated gene expression is dependent on the activation of downstream effectors of EGFR, such as the PI3/Akt, MEK/ERK, and JAK/STAT signaling pathways.
Statins could induce apoptosis by regulating several signaling pathways, including the MEK and ERK pathways [
As activation of and crosstalk between the RAS/Raf/MEK/ERK and Jak/STAT signaling pathways play a role in the survival advantage of leukemic cells driven by mutant FLT3, we were interested in comparing the expression levels and activity of relevant signaling components in drug-sensitive and drug-resistant cells.
reported activation of the Ras/MEK/MAPK signaling pathway in association with CEP-5214 and CEP-701 resistance, and we similarly observed elevated phospho-ERK1/ERK2 and phospho-MEK in MOLM13-R-PKC412 cells, consistent with elevated FLT3 protein levels.
We hypothesize that the reduction in phospho-STAT5 in resistant cells might be a drug-dependent compensatory homeostatic mechanism, as resistant cells over-expressing FLT3 and characterized by elevated phospho-ERK1/ERK2 and phospho-MEK may not be able to tolerate overactive FLT3 signaling.
ERK1 and ERK2, the output of the cascade, are phosphorylated by MEK1 and MEK2, and MEK1/2 are activated upstream by Raf-1, and B-Raf 
Both agents non-competitively target MEK, and therefore MEK's only substrate ERK, and are more specific than other kinase inhibitors because they do not compete with ATP binding 
Once activated, RAF stimulates a signaling cascade involving the MEK/ERK pathway.
Recent reports suggested that ER stress, in particular the downstream activation of MEK/ERK and PI3K/Akt signaling pathways, may be involved in the regulation of Mcl-1 and other Bcl-2 family of proteins 
OxLDL-dependent EGR-1 expression is mediated by the MEK-ERK1/2 MAP kinase pathway.
Altered ERK1/2 signaling is found in several genetic diseases with skeletal phenotypes, including Noonan syndrome, Neurofibromatosis type 1, and Cardio-facio-cutaneous syndrome, suggesting that MEK-ERK signals regulate human skeletal development.
Since ERK1 and ERK2 are classically activated through MEK1 and MEK2-mediated phosphorylation of ERK's activation loop residues Thr202/Tyr204 on ERK1 and Thr185/Tyr187 on ERK2 
It has been reported that endothelial cell ERK1/2 functions in leukocyte TEM since pretreatment of endothelial cells with a MEK1/2 inhibitor, PD98059, attenuates eosinophil transmigration across primary cultures of HUVECs that express several adhesion molecules 
Equal protein loading was verified by stripping the membrane with Restore Western Blot Stripping Buffer (Pierce, Rockford, IL) for 15 minutes and then labeling with rabbit anti-total ERK1/2 or MEK1/2 where indicated.
Given that the MEK/ERK pathway also depends on the constitutive activity of the PDK1 kinase, we asked if inhibition of PDK1 might alter contraction of SM.
These observations suggest that in MDA-MD-435 cancer cells, E-cadherin expression induces a downregulation of Ras/Raf/MEK/ERK downstream pathway through the significant decreased activity of the IR/IGF-IR signaling. 
Inhibition of MEK5/ERK5, a major downstream effector of G-CSF signaling, also ablated neuroprotective effect of G-CSF.
The MEK5/ERK5 pathway is a major downstream effector of G-CSF signaling.
Since Akt is an important component of the mTOR signaling cascade, we next determined if the p38 and/or MEK/ERK pathways are involved in the regulation of Akt
The IGF-1R mediates two signaling pathways, namely the Raf-MEK-ERK pathway, inducing proliferation and the PI3K-Akt pathway, supporting differentiation 
The silencing of RHAMM in mouse and human cells has been shown to directly alter MEK1/ERK1/2 and AURKA signal transduction pathways [
That is, we find that the loss of RHAMM augments MEK/ERK1/2 activity and the inhibition of this activity is sufficient to restore pluripotency.
Conditioned media from OPC cultures increased the level of ERK1/2 phosphorylation, which was blocked by co-treatment with SB431542 or the MEK/ERK inhibitor U0126 (
An alternate strategy to counteract mutant K-RAS is to inhibit its downstream effectors, for example, the RAF-MEK-ERK (MAPK) pathway.
To test the second part of this hypothesis directly, we measured the activation state of MEK and ERK in cells that were treated with BAY61-3606.
We found that inhibition of RAF with AZ-628 suppressed MEK and ERK phosphorylation, but that BAY61-3606 was unable to do so (
Indeed, recent studies show that during transendothelial migration monocytes activate the HRas/Raf/MEK/ERK signaling cascade which induces MLC phosphorylation followed by Src-mediated phosphorylation of VE-cadherin 
Mutations in the components of the RAS/RAF/MEK/ERK and RAS/PI3K/PTEN/AKT/mTOR signaling cascades have been detected in many types of human cancer 
MEK phosphorylates and activates a mitogen-activated protein kinase (MAPK/ERK), a serine/threonine-selective protein kinase.
In order to obtain further insight of the mechanism by which treatment with KU63794 induces over-activation of ERK we also determined the effect of this active-site mTOR inhibitor on the activation of MEK, the upstream kinase that phosphorylates ERK.
The differential effects of metformin, KU63794 and rapamycin on the activation of PI3K/Akt and MEK/ERK in PDAC cells, prompted us to determine the effects of these agents on the proliferation of these cells.
We also previously demonstrated, that HSP20 inhibits the activation of AKT and ERK via MEK, the upstream kinase of ERK, in human HCC tissues 
Regulatory cascades targeting PPAR-gamma through upstream kinases and phosphatases, such as M3/6, JNK1, MEKK2, MKP3, MEK2, or ERK2, of which M3/6, MEKK2, and MFP-3 were induced during carcinogenesis, suggest additional possibilities for drug development.
MyoD, an important regulator of myoblast differentiation, is expressed in low- and high-serum media, whereas it is inactive in high-serum media because of its interaction with an excess of CD1-cdk4, which is positively regulated by the MEK- ERK 1, 2 kinase pathway.
To examine the signaling pathway involved in enrichment of SP phenotype, B16-WT cells were either treated with PI3 kinase inhibitor (wortmannin) or MEK/ERK inhibitor (U0126) for 24 h, stained with Hoechst and analyzed by flow cytometry.
ERK1/2 is activated by the upstream Ras/Raf/MEK signaling cascade via phosphorylation on residues threonine 202 and tyrosine 204.
Inhibition of ERK1/2 phosphorylation by U0126, a specific MEK inhibitor, significantly decreased this decidualization process.
ERK1/2 is activated via dual phosphorylation on specific tyrosine (Tyr204) and threonine (Thr202) residues by mitogen-activated or extracellular signal-regulated protein kinase kinase (MEK) [
To examine whether activation of ERK1/2 is required for human endometrial stromal cell decidualization, we inhibited phosphorylation of ERK1/2 using a known MEK inhibitor, U0126, during 
ERK1/2 is stimulated by EGFR activation, through the GRB2-SOS complex and the Ras-Raf-MEK signaling cascade [
Previous reports have shown that sustained signaling through the MEK/ERK pathway promotes MMP-9 expression [
Primary antibodies against cleaved caspase-7, cleaved caspase-9, cleaved PARP, Ras, phosphorylated MEK, MEK, phosphorylated ERK1/2, ERK1/2, XIAP, cIAP1, survivin, P-gp and GAPDH and secondary antibodies were purchased from Cell Signaling Technology.
Whole-cell lysates were generated and immunoblotted with antibodies against Ras, phosphorylated MEK (P-MEK), MEK, phosphorylated ERK (P-ERK1/2), ERK1/2 and GAPDH.
Taken together, our data indicate that EVO is proapoptotic, reverses drug resistance and acts synergistically with DOX by inhibiting both IAPs and the Ras/MEK/ERK cascade without inhibiting P-gp.
The specific PI3K/AKT inhibitor LY294002 and the MEK/ERK inhibitor PD98059 were used to study the involvement of these two signaling pathways in the transduction of the angiogenic effects of EPC-CM.
The EPC-CM-induced activities were significantly reduced by the blockage of the PI3K/AKT and MEK/ERK signaling pathways.
Similarly to the outcome of the rBCEC4 experiments, inhibition of the PI3K/AKT and MEK/ERK pathways significantly interfered with capillary sprouting induced by EPC-CM.
In addition, our findings identified the PI3K/AKT and MEK/ERK pathways to play a central role in mediating these effects.
In endothelial cells PI3K/AKT and MEK/ERK signaling pathways play a primary role in the transduction of mitotic and pro-survival signals of many growth factors and cytokines (for review see 
In the present study we have investigated whether EPC-CM induces an angiogenic response in brain microvascular endothelial cells and assessed whether these effects might be mediated by PI3K/AKT and MEK/ERK pathways.
We next reasoned whether the factors present in EPC-CM could induce PI3K/AKT and MEK/ERK pathways activation in brain microvascular endothelial cells.
We have conducted preliminary experiments in order to assess whether the treatments with the PI3K/AKT or MEK/ERK inhibitors would affect the basal functions of rBCEC4 under control conditions (
In order to assess whether the effect on rBCEC4 viability is mediated by AKT and/or ERK pathway, EPC-CM incubation was carried out in absence or presence of the PI3K/AKT or MEK/ERK inhibitors.
These EPC-CM-dependent morphogenic properties were clearly diminished by inhibition of the PI3K/AKT and the MEK/ERK pathway (
Based on the outcome of the PI3K/AKT and MEK/ERK pathway inhibition experiments using the rBCEC4 cell line we reasoned whether similar effects could be reproduced on tissue explants.
Hence, we used the well established aortic ring assay to monitor the involvement of the PI3K/AKT and MEK/ERK pathways on EPC-CM induced angiogenesis.
In particular, appropriate early neurogenesis requires receptor tyrosine kinase (RTK)-mediated activation of the MEK-ERK-C/EBP pathway [
For example, the Ras/Raf/MEK/ERK pathway was theoretically proposed to negatively feedback into the apoptotic machinery, and hence prevents apoptosis triggered by a self-feeding E2F1 
Collectively, our data firstly demonstrate the capacity of CDH17 to regulate the activity of Ras/Raf/MEK/ERK pathway for cell proliferation in GC, and suggest that CDH17 can serve as an attractive therapeutic target for future research.
The Ras/Raf/MEK/ERK mitogen-activated protein kinase (MAPK) cascade is a key intracellular signaling pathway that regulates diverse cellular functions including proliferation, survival, apoptosis, motility, transcription, metabolism and differentiation 
The Ras/Raf/MEK/ERK pathway is activated by diverse mechanisms.
This schematic diagram demonstrates the inducing effect of CDH17 on Ras/Raf/MEK/ERK signaling pathway and illustrates the hypothetic involvement of integrins in GC.
The up-regulation of cadherin-integrin signaling activates the Ras/Raf/MEK/ERK pathway.
In conclusion, the present study identifies that CDH17 is an actual oncogene and plays a major role in cell proliferation and tumor growth in GC through integrin-Ras/Raf/MEK/ERK signaling.
The MEK inhibitor U0126 was used to block ERK1/2 activation, whereas SB203580 was used to inhibit p38 activity.
Addition of Mefunidone (0.18mM) or PD98059, a highly selective inhibitor of MEK1 activation and the MAP kinase cascade, significantly decreased phosphorylation of ERK1/2 (
To dissect the molecular mechanisms underlying the restrained migration and invasion induced by loss of MCT4, we examined intracellular signaling by measuring the expression levels of key molecules, such as integrins, FAK, SRC, and those of the MEK-ERK axis, that are involved in the regulation of adhesion, motility, and invasion, as well as growth and survival.
The MEK/ERK pathways are critical for controlling cell proliferation and differentiation.
In this study, we show that the MEK5/ERK5 pathway participates in osteoclast differentiation.
Inhibition of MEK5 by BIX02189 or inhibition of ERK5 by XMD 8-92 blocked osteoclast differentiation.
Inhibition of the MEK5/ERK5 pathway by the inhibitors also blocked the differentiation of RAW264.7D cells into osteoclasts.
Moreover, expression of the transcription factor c-Fos, which is indispensable for osteoclast differentiation, was inhibited by treatment with MEK5 or ERK5 inhibitors.
Taken together, the present results show that activation of the MEK5/ERK5 pathway with M-CSF is required for osteoclast differentiation, which may induce differentiation through the induction of c-Fos.
We tested the effects of the MEK5/ERK5 pathway inhibitors BIX02189 and XMD8-92 on osteoclast differentiation using 4B12 cells.
The behavior of the RAW264.7D clone cells was examined during MEK5/ERK5 pathway inhibition.
Finally, we examined the effect of inhibition of the MEK5/ERK5 pathway on the differentiation of M-BMMs into osteoclasts.
MEK5 and ERK5 inhibitors blocked the formation of TRAP (+) MNCs, respectively (Fig 
Since this protein is one of most important members involved in the RAF/MEK/ERK signaling pathway, MAPK14 is associated with sorafenib, which is a drug used for the treatment of advanced renal cell carcinoma (primary kidney cancer) and advanced hepatocellular carcinoma (primary liver cancer).
To confirm GDNF, EGR-1, Ras, cRaf, MEK and ERK mRNA expression differing significantly between hyperglycemic and normoglycemic fetal kidney tissues observed using microarray analysis, we performed quantitative RT-PCR and compared expression patterns, as shown in 
Measurement of serial GDNF, EGR-1, Ras, Raf, MEK and ERK gene expression by quantitative renal time PCR (qPCR) on cDNA from E11 to E15 of fetal renal tissue, either in hyperglycemic or normoglycemic state.
We further examined mRNA expression patterns of cRaf, MEK and ERK.
Expression of cRaf, MEK and ERK genes was elevated in hyperglycemic fetal kidney tissues about 85, 95 and 1020 fold, respectively, higher than in normoglycemic kidneys at E12.
Within the MAPK signaling cascade, MAPK kinase (MEK)-1 is a key protein that mediates signaling cascade from MAPK kinase kinase (MAPKKK) to both components of MAPK, ERK-1 and -2.
Activation of ERK facilitates its translocation into nuclei, where it phosphorylates transcription activators like cRaf, MEK and ERK, all activated by GDNF (
Phosphorylated cRaf, MEK and ERK significantly increased after co-treatment with high glucose and GDNF, the latter downregulated by pretreated with ERK inhibitor, PD98059 for 1 hour.
Treatment of HRPTE cells with high glucose concentration (20 mM) and GDNF (100 ng/ml) resulted in enhanced GDNF-dependent phosphorylation of cRaf, MEK and ERK.
It was interesting to note that serine phosphorylation of cRaf was abolished by pretreating cells with protein-tyrosine kinase inhibitor (PD98059); tyrosine-threorine phosphorylation of MEK and ERK was also down-regulated by the same protein-tyrosine inhibitor (PD98059) (
We further analyzed EGR-1 contribution to hyperglycemia down-regulating GDNF-induced migration to HRPTE cells and GDNF-dependent phosphorylation of cRaf, MEK and ERK by small interfering RNA (siRNA) of EGR-1-mediated experiments.
EGR-1 siRNA also reduced 70% of GDNF/EGR-1-induced cRaf/MEK/ERK phosphorylation. 
The classical MAPK pathway consists of RAS, RAF, MEK and ERK, where RAS triggers the formation of a RAF/MEK/ERK kinase complex which then drives transcription of key regulators through protein phosphorylation.
For example, the RAF kinase family consists of three members: ARAF, BRAF and CRAF each of which can activate MEK/ERK signaling 
There are several potential targets for therapeutic intervention in this pathway including BRAF, MEK, ERK and Hsp90.
Drugs targeting BRAF, MEK, and Hsp90 (but not ERK) are in development, and clinical trials are ongoing to evaluate their efficacy in melanoma.
Previous report showed that inhibition of MEK-ERK pathway alone was insufficient to abolish NGF induced P-Ser-STAT3 in PC12 cells 
We sought to investigate the relative efficacy of allosteric versus catalytic mTOR inhibition, evaluate the crosstalk between the mTOR and MEK/ERK pathways, as well as the therapeutic potential of dual mTOR and MEK inhibition in RCC.
However, recent reports have demonstrated that inhibitors of mTOR are capable of increasing MEK/ERK activation and its associated proliferation and survival signaling in cancer cells 
However, we also observe that catalytic mTOR inhibition is more robust at initiating compensatory MEK/ERK signaling in RCC.
Recent reports have demonstrated cross-talk between the mTOR and MEK/ERK signaling pathways 
The observation of increased MEK/ERK signaling in the context of mTOR inhibition led us to hypothesize that attenuation of this compensatory signal may decrease cellular proliferation and induce apoptosis.
We saw that 10 nM of the MEK inhibitor GSK1120212 (hereafter called GSK212) was sufficient to fully inhibit MEK activity as assessed by pERK 
MEK/ERK).
Nonetheless, compensatory upregulation of MEK/ERK signaling can be co-targeted with enhanced therapeutic effectiveness.
In aggregate, our data suggests that catalytic mTOR inhibition should be investigated in RCC and that the compensatory upregulation of MEK/ERK signaling may actually be a potential synthetic vulnerability in RCC.
IGF-1R silencing also induces apoptosis and blocks cell proliferation via inhibition of PI3K/AKT, MEK/ERK, MAPK and JAK/STAT signaling.
Signal transduction cascades downstream of both IGF-1R and IR were effectively inhibited by IGF-1R knockdown, including PI3K/AKT, MEK/ERK and JAK/STAT pathways.
To demonstrate that ERK1/2 activation is necessary to the development of apelin-induced inotropic response, we used U0126, which is a potent selective inhibitor of MAPK kinases 1 and 2 (MEK1/2), the upstream regulator of ERK1/2.
Scheme showing the new perspective of the redistribution of MEK and ERK inside the cell.
As mitochondria are the source of ATP, MEK and ERK would go to the mitochondrial surroundings where phosphorylation might occur and afterwards ERK would translocate into the nuclei.
Both MEK and ERK have a role on mitochondrial metabolism regulation.
We thank Dr. Diane Lidke for the hERK1-GFP construct, Philippe Stork for DsRed-MEK1 and Francisca Bronfman for p75-YFP.
The investigation of MEK and ERK in mitochondria of MEF 
As MEK/ERK [
To further understand the effect of MEK/ERK and AKT pathways in PCI-24781-induced apoptosis, we treated cells with PCI-24781 in combination with PD98059 (MEK inhibitor) or LY294002 (PI3K inhibitor) for 48 hr.
Taken together these findings indicate that one of the mechanisms through which Ang II decreases insulin sensitivity in skeletal muscle is the inhibition of Akt through at least two RNS-dependent pathways: first, through the transient activation of the MEK-ERK1/2 pathway which inhibits IRS1/2-dependent signaling and second through direct nitration of Akt.
Together with the finding that the MEK inhibitor U0126 alleviates Ang II-mediated Akt inhibition, these observations clearly indicate that the ERK pathway contributes to the inhibition of Akt in this model.
In order to understand the mechanisms involved in the transition from hormone-dependent to hormone-independent mammary tumors, we have focused our study on the role of PI3K and of MEK induced signaling, as deduced by assessment of AKT and ERK1/2 phosphorylation after exposure to PI3K and MEK inhibitors, respectively.
Raf kinases are well-known as key regulators of the MEK/ERK cascade, and up-regulated signaling through the Raf/MEK/ERK pathway has an important role in various cancers 
For western blot analysis, samples were transferred to a polyvinyldine diflouride membrane by semi-wet electrophoresis and incubated with indicated primary antibody p-c-Raf (Ser259), c-Raf, p-MEK1/2 (Ser217/221), MEK1/2, p-ERK1/2 (Thr202/Tyr204), ERK1/2).
We confirmed the effect of HLC-080 on key mediators in the Ras/Raf/MEK/ERK signaling pathway.
The further analysis unveils that such effects might be induced by blocking the Raf/MEK/ERK signaling pathways.
RAF phosphorylates and activates MEK1 and MEK2 that in turn phosphorylate and activate ERK1 and ERK2 kinases.
Among the three mammalian Raf isoforms, B-RAF is the strongest MEK-ERK activator expressed in neuronal tissues and testis 
The global inactivation of B-RAF causes a shutdown of MEK1/2 kinases as exclusive substrates and the resulting depletion of ERK/MAPK signaling leads to embryonic lethality 
In matters of emotional behavior, the acute pharmacological inhibition of the ERK/MAPK signaling using the MEK inhibitor PD184161 leads to depression-like behavior in mice 
These results are similar to those found in hepatocytes where the MEK/ERK pathway either blocks proliferation after sustained activation, or allows multiple cell cycles, improving survival after transient activation 
RASSF1C activates the MEK-ERK1/2 pathway (12), which controls a wide variety of genes that promote cell division and proliferation.
Treatment of H1299 lung cancer cells with the MEK-ERK1/2 pathway inhibitor CI1040 resulted in down-regulation of Piwil1 mRNA levels (12).
Wort: Wortmannin, an inhibitor of PI3 K/Akt pathway; U0126: an inhibitor of the MEK1/2-ERK1/2 pathway; AG490: an inhibitor of the JAK/STAT pathway.
Recent data from our group identified MK3 as a regulator of the PRC1 target gene ATF3-expression via a negative feedback mechanisms on MEK1 and ERK1/2 in the context of mitognic stimulation.
FGFR-1 is known to act via two pathways on neurite outgrowth, MEK/ERK and PI3K/Akt.
(C) The levels of EGFR, phospho-MEK1/2 and phospho-ERK1/2 expressions in cells were quantitated by ImageJ.
A gradual increase in EGFR and its downstream signaling, the phospho-MEK1/2 and phospho-ERK1/2, could be observed during immortalization of NP446Bmi-1/hTert and NP550Bmi-1/hTert.
The p38 inhibitors (SB203580 and SB202190), ERK1/2 inhibitor (FR180204) and the MEK inhibitor (U0126) were purchased from Tocris Bioscience (Bristol, UK).
We pre-incubated the cells with either a MEK-inhibitor (U0126; inhibits upstream of ERK1/2), a specific ERK1/2 inhibitor (FR180204; inhibits ERK1 and 2) or a specific inhibitor of p38 (SB203580) and then assessed the effects of 1-MeA on GJIC.
Inhibition of P38 prevented the dysregulation of GJIC by 1-MeA, while inhibition of the MEK pathway using U0126 and ERK1/2 using FR180204, had no effect on the dysregulation of GJIC elicited by 1-MeA (
In our experiments we were able to confirm that MEK/ERK signaling is involved in transcriptional regulation of MMP-9, which has been demonstrated previously in macrophages 
Western blot analyses showed that LT produced time- and concentration-dependent cleavage of MEK proteins (MEK-1, -2, and -4) and corresponding decreases in the phosphorylation of ERK1/2, JNK1/2, and p38 (
This synthesis was completely inhibited by PD98059 and U0126 that prevent activation of MEK1/2 upstream activator of ERK1/2, whereas the selective p38 inhibitor SB203580 had no effect.
Sorafenib, a multi- kinase inhibitor (TKI), blocks cancer progression through inhibiting RAS-RAF-MEK-ERK-MAPK pathway, which relates to the proliferation, migration and angiogenesis of cancer cells by targeting vascular endothelial growth factor receptor (VEGFR), platelet-derived growth factor receptor (PDGFR), c-kit and a receptor tyrosine kinase called rearranged during transfection (RET) 
Relative to baseline in normal HASM cells, constitutively heightened baseline PDE activity in asthmatic HASM cells is suppressed to near normal levels at 2 hr following treatment with either the c-Src inhibitor, SU6656, or the MEK-ERK1/2 inhibitor, U0126, whereas treatment with inhibitors of either p38 MAPK (SB202190), PI3K (LY294002), or PKA (H89) had no significant effect.
One such pathway consists of RAF-MEK-ERK 
To determine whether impaired ERK signaling might underlie the erythroid defects associated with aconitase inhibition, FA and the MEK inhibitor U0126 were compared for their effects on erythropoiesis as in 
Primary antibodies against microtubule-associated protein 1 light chain 3 (LC3), Atg5, Atg7, Beclin-1, caspase 3, caspase 9, PARP, GAPDH, non-phospho- or phospho-MEK1/2 and ERK1/2 were from Cell Signaling Technology, Inc..
(A) Western blots demonstrating H-Ras expression as well as phosphorylation of two downstream proteins (MEK1/2 and ERK1/2) in a clone containing vector only, and in two H-Ras
(A) Representative western blot demonstrating H-Ras expression as well as phosphorylation of MEK1/2 and ERK1/2 in a clone containing vector only, and in two H-Ras
Pokemon knockdown inhibited the PI3K/Akt and c-Raf/MEK/ERK pathways and modulated the expression of various cell cycle regulators in HepG2 and Huh-7 cells.
Therefore, we aimed to determine whether Pokemon also regulates components of the (PI3K)/Akt and Raf/MEK/ERK pathways during the development of hepatocellular carcinoma.
In addition, we showed that PTEN, which is a negative regulator of Akt, and c-Raf, which is an upstream regulator of MEK and ERK, were affected by Pokemon knockdown.
We propose that Pokemon may regulate the PI3K/Akt and MEK/ERK pathways by affecting PTEN and c-Raf.
Previous studies have shown that the PI3K/Akt and MEK/ERK pathways mediate cell proliferation, migration and cell cycle progression 
On the other hand, interruption of the MEK1/2/ERK1/2 pathway by PD184352 is known to up-regulate Bim through a post-translational mechanism 
We also showed for the first time that the enhanced ET-1 and 5-HT evoked receptor mediated cerebrovascular contractility, presumably involved in delayed cerebral hypoperfusion after global cerebral ischemia, can be prevented by treatment with an inhibitor of MEK/ERK1/2 signaling.
LPA also increased ERK activity and the MEK inhibitor U0126 could block LPA-induced ERK activity and cell migration.
To determine whether LPA stimulated migration of breast cancer cells depended on ERK activation, we investigated the effect of MEK inhibitor U0126 on cell migration using wound closure assay.
Previous studies demonstrated that Ras-Raf-MEK-ERK and PI3K-Akt signaling pathways can crosstalk, and reported that activation of Raf-MEK-ERK pathway by downregulated Akt in some cell types 
RAF kinases are serine/threonine kinases that regulate the highly conserved RAS-RAF-MEK-ERK signaling cascade involved in transducing the signals from extracellular growth factors to the nucleus.
Experiments in ex vivo cultures of otic vesicle explants demonstrate that the influence of IGF-I on proliferation but not survival depends on RAF kinase activating the MEK-ERK phosphorylation cascade.
Bcl-2 family members are targets of the RAF-MEK-ERK pathway 
The RAF-MEK-ERK phosphorylation cascade can be specifically inhibited by Sorafenib, an inhibitor of RAF kinase activity developed to treat B-RAF-associated cancer 
To confirm that the effects observed were a consequence of the inhibition of the RAF-MEK-ERK cascade a MEK inhibitor 
These results show that inhibition of the RAF-MEK-ERK cascade caused a reduction in the rate of cell proliferation and an increase in the number of caspase-dependent apoptotic cells, without affecting Akt activity, thereby leading to a decrease in the number of neural progenitor cells.
To further explore the regulation by IGF-I and the role of the RAF-MEK-ERK cascade in otic neurogenesis, the expression of the neuroblast markers Islet-1 and TuJ1 was analyzed in cultured otic vesicles treated with Sorafenib in the presence or absence of IGF-I [
IGF-I activates the Akt pathway even in the presence of Sorafenib and the total inactivation of the RAF-MEK-ERK cascade (
Such RAF-MEK-ERK signaling is required for neuroepithelial cell proliferation and survival in this structure, although IGF-I can restore cell survival by activating the PI3K/Akt kinase pathway when RAF-MEK-ERK is inhibited by Sorafenib.
Due to the established role of RAF kinases in cancer, the search for inhibitors of RAF-MEK-ERK signaling has been intense 
The inactivation of the RAF pathway with Sorafenib also produced a dramatic decrease in cell proliferation since the RAF-MEK-ERK cascade plays a fundamental role in the G1/S transition, where its signaling induces cyclin D1 and down-regulates many other antiproliferative genes 
In summary, we show here that B-RAF and C-RAF are expressed during chicken inner ear development in specific spatiotemporal patterns, and that RAF-MEK-ERK signaling is required for neuroepithelial cell proliferation and otic neuronal differentiation.
Growth factor EGF can activate RAS-RAF-MEK-ERK as well as PI3K pathways 
Inhibition of MEK/ERK pathway by AZD6244 increases DPEP1 level in Panc1 cells.
Activity of IGFR and downstream signaling pathways, including the PI3K/AKT and MEK/ERK pathways, was measured by Western blot analysis.
The PI3K/AKT and the MEK/ERK pathways are the most extensively studied.
U0126 inhibits MEK, preventing phosphorylation of downstream targets ERK1/2, Mnk1 and eIF4E.
Treatment of hAoSMC with the MEK inhibitor U0126 significantly inhibited ERK activation, but surprisingly increased pAkt and pFoxO3a, with a corresponding increase in the expression of VSMC marker genes compared to vehicle control (
Ras-dependent Cyclin D1 expression relies on sustained RAF/MEK/ERK activation, and correspondingly affects G1 to S phase transition [
The small GTP-binding protein Ras regulates activation of several signaling pathways including Raf/MEK/ERK 
Ras/Rac1/MEK/ERK signaling pathway seems to be regulated by and regulates superoxide anion production during melan-a anchorage blockade and its activation could be responsible for the high Dnmt1 protein level and changes in global DNA methylation during the loss of cell adhesion.
Although it has potent activity against the Raf/MEK/ERK pathway, the therapeutic efficacy for HCC may involve other pathways.
Both basal and ligand-induced migration and invasiveness of SUM149 cells were drastically reduced in the presence of MEK inhibitor U0126, implicating that the phosphorylation of ERK1/2 by MEK is involved in the observed motility and invasiveness of IBC cells.
Taking together the MEK2 requirement in both of these non-apoptotic cell death paradigms, and the role of NR4A1 as an ERK2-specific substrate, we hypothesized that the death signaling cascades mediated by NK
One of the side effects of doxorubicin treatment is the induction of reactive oxygen species which in turn can activate the Raf/MEK/ERK and PI3K/PTEN/Akt/mTOR pathways 
Targeting this signaling axis by MEK/ERK or FOXM1 inhibitors could obtain promising effect on the signal transduction-based therapy for this disease.
This significant finding might imply that some other unknown druggable targets may still be responsible for KRAS-mutant CRC treatment in addition to the traditional RAS/RAF/MEK/ERK pathway.
The Ras-Raf-MEK-ERK and PI3K-Akt signaling pathways in macrophages are the most commonly studied intracellular transduction cascades.
In the Ras-Raf-MEK-ERK pathway, activated Ras (a single-subunit small GTPase) activates RAF kinase, which phosphorylates and directly leads to MEK (MEK1 and MEK2) activation; then, MEK phosphorylates and activates ERK [
Pretreatment of MEK inhibitor, but not PI3K inhibitor, inhibited Ang II-induced ERK phosphorylation as well as cell proliferation.
The majority (>85%) of UM express mutations in the G-alpha proteins, that drive the MEK-ERK1/2 pathway.
MEKi, but not METi treatment results in markedly reduced ERK1/2 phosphorylation.
We have previously demonstrated the capacity of the small molecule MEK inhibitor (AZD6244) to decrease ERK1/2 phosphorylation in uveal melanoma cell lines at low nanomolar concentrations 
When activated, these G-alpha proteins clearly signal through the MEK-ERK1/2 pathway.
Furthermore, in vitro cellular studies demonstrated that LPS (lipopolysaccharide) activation of mTORC1-S6K still occurs in the presence of PI3K-Akt inhibition alone, but can be suppressed by concurrent inhibition of PI3K-Akt and MEK-ERK pathways.
Only the combined Inhibition of MEK1/2-ERK and PI3K-Akt significantly suppressed mTORC1-S6K activation by LPS, as indicated by pS6 levels.
Furthermore, LPS can activate mTORC1-S6K with suppressed PI3K-Akt, via alternative MEK-ERK pathway.
ERK phosphorylation was inhibited using the MEK1 inhibitor PD98059 (Cell Signaling Technology, Beverly MA, USA).
To analyze the mechanisms underlying the effects of TRTS on these cells, we examined changes in intracellular signaling using the following: tropomyosin-related kinase A inhibitor GW441756; p38 mitogen-activated protein kinase (MAPK) inhibitor SB203580; and MAPK/extracellular signal-regulated kinase (ERK) kinase (MEK) inhibitor U0126 with its inactive analog, U0124, as a control.
Previous work has shown that activation of both the ERK1/2 and the p38 MAPK signaling pathways play a role in neuritogenesis induction in PC12 cells, and that the ERK1/2 and p38 MAPK activation and neurite outgrowth induced by certain neurotrophic factors, such as NGF and BMPs, are blocked by the MEK1/2 inhibitor U0126 or the p38 MAPK inhibitor SB203580 [
The MEK-ERK1/2 and p38 MAPK signaling pathways that mediated TRTS-induced neuritogenesis in this study are considered to be classic signaling cascades often used by other general neurotrophic factors for stimulating the acquisition of neuronal phenotypes in chromaffin-like (undifferentiated) PC12 cells [
Specifically, a non-cytotoxic TRTS treatment can induce neuritogenesis without supplementation of other neurotrophic factors, and requires participation of MEK-ERK1/2 and p38 MAPK signaling, similar to BMP4.
On the other hand, Mitogen-activated protein kinase kinase kinase 2 (MEKK2) is a member of the MAPK signaling pathway which is able to activate c-Jun N-terminal kinase (JNK) and ERK5 
MEK1/2, as well as extracellular signal-regulated kinases 1 and 2 (ERK1/2), are known to be a key kinase in the MAPK signaling pathway 
In OECs, it has been shown that changes in peripheral lamellipodia are a result of activation of the enzyme MEK1 (ERK kinases pathway) after stimulation with GDNF 
The MEK/ERK pathway plays essential roles in cell survival, differentiation, apoptosis, proliferation, migration and invasion 
bFGF is known to act through a number of signaling pathways including the ras/raf/MEK/ERK/MAPK cascade, the PIP2/IP3 cascade, and a pathway involving PI3K, PKC, and Rac 
Since both the MEK/ERK and PI3K/Akt/mTOR pathway lie downstream of S1P receptors 
5T4KO MEF did not respond to CXCL12 stimulation, and this lack of response was specifically related to CXCR4 function and not due to a generalized disruption of MAPK/ERK signaling as both WT and KO MEF exhibited an increase in ERK1/2 phosphorylation in response to PMA stimulation, which was blocked by MEK1 inhibition but independent of both CXCR4 and PI3K activity.
Suppression of ERK activation by a chemical inhibitor reduced palladin phosphorylation, and expression of active MEK alone was sufficient for phosphorylation.
The specific MAPK/ERK kinase-1/2 (MEK1/2) inhibitor U0126, p38 inhibitor SB203580, JNK inhibitor SP600125 and NADPH oxidase inhibitor apocynin were obtained from Calbiochem (San Diego, CA, USA).
Consistent with the MEK-ERK pathway being a major target of EGFR signaling, activation of the MEK-ERK pathway contributed to EGFR-facilitated PCSC propagation.
Inhibition of ERK activation through multiple approaches, including treatment with the MEK inhibitor U0126, ectopic expression of dominant-negative MEK1(K97M), and knockdown of either ERK1 or ERK2 resulted in a robust reduction in PCSC propagation.
Collectively, the present study provides evidence that EGFR signaling promotes PCSC self-renewal, in part, by activating the MEK-ERK pathway.
Furthermore, inhibition of ERK activation through the use of a MEK inhibitor, ectopic expression of dominant-negative MEK1(K97M), and knockdown of endogenous ERK1 or ERK2, collectively reduced the propagation of DU145 PCSCs.
Taken together, these results highlight a contribution of MEK-ERK signaling for EGFR-mediated PCSCs self-renewal.
Inhibition of EGFR and MEK1 kinase activity (as determined by EGFR and ERK1/2 phosphorylation status, respectively) was verified by Western blot analysis.
EGFR signaling is well known to initiate signaling events involving the activation of the PI3K-AKT and Raf-MEK-ERK (mitogen activated protein kinases; MAPK) pathways 
To investigate the effect of a MAPK/ERK kinases (MEK) inhibitor on the induction of ERK1/2 phosphorylation by E
Note that U0126 inhibits the ERK pathway by inhibiting ERK1-activating kinases MEK1 and MEK2.
For example, estrogen-induced activation of the Raf-MEK-ERK-p90RSK cascade was already shown to mediate protection of neurons against apoptosis via stabilization of Bad phosphorylation 
Similarly to observations reported in colon cancer cells, we found inhibition of the MAPK/ERK signalling pathway by MEK1/2-specific inhibitor U0126 to reduce SP, possibly through altering ABCG2 expression or localisation 
At the same time vitamin D analogs induced cathelicidin through activation of the vitamin D receptor and MEK/ERK signaling.
MEK/ERK signaling is critically involved in the regulation of cathelicidin by 1,25D3 in human keratinocytes 
In parallel to cathelicidin induction, MEK/ERK inhibition by the specific MEK1 inhibitor PD98059 significantly diminished the effect of IL-17A on HBD2 and HBD3 (
Inhibition of MEK/ERK significantly blocked HBD2 and HBD3 induction by IL-17A.
The Ras/Raf/MEK/ERK pathway is required for EC function during angiogenesis.
Of the array of signaling events activated in response to VEGF and cell adhesion, the Ras/Raf/MEK/ERK1/2 pathway is known to play a prominent role in EC function 
REDD1 and MEK protein levels and phosphorylation of ERK, and S6K (Thr 389) were evaluated by Western blots.
As expected, expression of a CA-MEK enhanced ERK phosphorylation (
Insulin promotes a rapid and transient REDD1 augmentation in a MEK/ERK dependent pathway.
Through a mechanism that remains to be resolved, MEK/ERK pathway seems to control REDD1 degradation.
We propose that insulin through the activation of MEK/ERK pathway inhibits REDD1 protein degradation.
To reduce ERK activity, we inhibited its upstream activator, ERK kinase MEK, with U0126.
The most important finding in this research was that the dasatinib/VPA-activated apoptotic signal follows differentiation pathways, such as those of MEK/ERK and p38 MAPK (
While being able to predict variations of ERK activation induced by KSR and MP1 knockout, our simulation also reveals that KSR synergistically enhances signaling via the conventional EGFR-Ras-Raf-MEK-ERK pathway.
EGF-induced ERK activation are collectively regulated at two different compartments (subpathways): near the plasma membrane (the conventional EGFR-Ras-Raf-MEK-ERK module and KSR-mediated signaling), and at late endosomes (MP1-mediated signaling).
In an attempt to decipher the mechanisms involved in the AP-1 activation we used specific kinases inhibitors to map signal transduction pathways involved, The primary kinases involved in PMA inducible activity of AP-1 appear to be PKC and MEK/ERK, and to a lesser degree, PKA (
A recent study provided evidence for GLI3 and GLI1 as novel substrates of MAP-kinases (MAPKs) including the MEK substrate ERK2 
Interestingly, MEK inhibitor abrogated its nuclear translocation suggesting role of ERK in basal and radiation induced Nrf-2 activation in tumor cells.
MEK1 regulates activation of extracellular signal-regulated kinase (ERK) 
To determine which signal transduction pathway was affected by sorafenib in the freshly isolated NK cells, we added specific signaling inhibitors for Raf/MEK/ERK, PI3K/AKT, or JAK/STAT3 to the NK and K562 coculture.
Knock-down of BRAFV600E in these melanoma cells elevates basal pAKT and downstream signals, whereas knock-down of CRAF, MEK1/2 or ERK1/2 or treatment with a BRAF inhibitor have no impact on pAKT.
Taken together, our findings suggest that in a subset of BRAFV600E melanoma cells, BRAFV600E negatively regulates AKT pathway in a rictor-dependent, MEK/ERK and BRAF kinase-independent manner.
(A) Western blot analysis of AKT, MEK, and ERK phosphorylation in the isogenic pair of NIH3T3 clones 4 hours post treatment with MEK inhibitor RG7167 at indicated concentration.
The left panel - MEK inhibitor induces pAKT by suppressing ERK-dependent negative feedback loop in control NIH3T3 cells.
In CHL1 melanoma cell line with wild-type BRAF, MEK inhibitor suppressed ERK phosphorylation and induced pAKT (
Western blot analysis of the phosphorylation of AKT, ERK and S6 ribosome proteins in melanoma cell lines 4 hours after treatment with MEK inhibitor RG7167 or rapamycin.
In these cell lines, treatment with either MEK inhibitor or rapamycin did not further enhance pAKT, even though phosphorylation of ERK and S6 ribosome protein were respectively suppressed, suggesting that PTEN mutation not only dominates MEK inhibitor or rapamycin induced feedback activation, but also overrides the BRAFV600E-mediated negative impact on AKT signaling (
(D) Western blot analysis of AKT, MEK, and ERK phosphorylation in CHL1 melanoma cell line 24 hours after transient transfection (wild-type BRAF or BRAFV600E) and treated with RG7167 for 4 hours.
Expression of BRAFV600E, but not wild type BRAF, activated pMEK and pERK in CHL1 cells.
MEK inhibitor RG7167 inhibited pERK and induced feedback elevation of pMEK in CHL1 cells expressing either exogenous wild type or mutant BRAF.
(A) Western blot analysis of AKT phosphorylation and PTEN in A375 melanoma cell line 24 hours after knock-down of BRAF, MEK1/2, ERK1/2, rictor, raptor, or combined knock-down.
Importantly, we show that this regulation is through a direct interaction between BRAFV600E and rictor (mTORC2) complex and independent of BRAF kinase activity and downstream MEK and ERK signals.
One example is ASK1, which was shown to be suppressed by CRAF independent of MEK-ERK pathway 
Top left panel: Western blot analysis of MEK and ERK phosphorylation in NIH3T3 isogenic pair.
The RTK-RAS-RAF-MEK-ERK axis of the MAPK pathway plays important roles in normal T-cell development and function that include signaling through the T-cell receptor (TCR), regulating thymocyte positive selection, and T-cell homeostasis 
Given the facts that the IGF-1-phosphoinositide 3-kinase (PI3K)-Akt pathway and MEK1-ERK1/2 pathway are mainly advocated to mediate physiological cardiac growth,
KRAS is part of the RAF-KRAS-MEK pathway, which finally influences ERK that plays an important role in cell differentiation and proliferation [
This pathway involves Raf, MEK (MAPK/ERK kinase), and ERK (extracellular signal-regulated kinase) and is considered to be centrally involved in cellular decision making processes where small quantitative differences often lead to major phenotypic changes 
The primary antibodies included antibodies specific for p-MEK1/2 (Cell Signaling Technology, 9154), T-MEK1/2 (Cell Signaling Technology, 9122), p-ERK1/2 (Cell Signaling Technology, 4370), T-ERK1/2 (Cell Signaling Technology, 4695), p-P38 (Cell Signaling Technology, 4511), T-P38 (Cell Signaling Technology, 9212), p-JNK (Cell Signaling Technology, 4668), T-JNK (Cell Signaling Technology, 9258), p-p90RSK(Cell Signaling Technology, 9335), T-p90RSK (Cell Signaling Technology, 9347), p-AKT (Cell Signaling Technology, 4060), T-AKT (Cell Signaling Technology, 4691), GAPDH (Cell Signaling Technology, 2118), and ATF3 (Santa Cruz Biotechnology, sc-188).
Our data indicated that MEK-ERK1/2, JNK and p38 were significantly activated in AB mice and that ATF3 deficiency enhanced the phosphorylation of MEK-ERK1/2 and JNK.
Previous studies have implicated MEK1/2-ERK1/2 and p38 MAPK-MSK pathways, separately and in combination in MNK activation in some cell systems 
In NCI-H716 cells ERK, AKT and S6RP phosphorylation requires FGFR2, and we next used selective allosteric inhibitors of MEK, AKT, and mTor to define the role of these pathways in NCI-H716 growth.
However, because rapamycin blocks S6RP phosphorylation but did not inhibit growth, it is likely that multiple ERK targets must be inhibited in combination to reproduce the phenotype of MEK inhibition.
A549 (A) and H460 (B) cells were treated with CCL21 (100 ng/mL) for 24, 48, or 72 h after PD98059, a selective inhibitor of MEK that disrupts activation of downstream ERK, was applied for 1 h. Cell vitality was estimated using the CCK-8 assay.
A549 (A) and H460 (B) cells were treated with CCL21 (100 ng/mL) for 24 h after PD98059, a selective inhibitor of MEK that disrupts activation of downstream ERK, was applied for 1 h. The expression levels of these components were estimated using Western blot.
A549 and H460 cells were treated with CCL21 (100 ng/mL) for 24 h after PD98059, a selective inhibitor of MEK that disrupts activation of downstream ERK, was used for 1 h. After treatment, cell cycle distribution was estimated using flow cytometry.
On the other hand, CCN2 also promoted FAK, MEK, and ERK survival signaling pathways to enhance tumor survival during cisplatin treatment.
To investigate the possible mechanisms by which Nar affects NSCs, the ERK-CREB signaling pathway was monitored using PD98059, an inhibitor of mitogen-activated protein kinase kinase 1 (MEK1).
Western blot was used to detect the expression of p-ERK1/2 and p-CREB in NSCs after treatment with Nar for 3 d. We found that Nar could promote the expression of p-ERK1/2 (A) and p-CREB (B), which was inhibited partly by PD98059, an inhibitor of mitogen-activated protein kinase kinase 1 (MEK1).
Our results indicate that Golgi apparatus and GM1 polarization are controlled by distinct intracellular cascades involving the Ras/Raf/MEK/ERK and the PI3K/Akt/mTOR pathways, respectively.
Analysis of cell migration and invasion suggest that MEK/ERK activation is crucial for two dimensional migration, while PI3K activation drives three dimensional invasion, and no cumulative effect is observed from blocking both simultaneously.
The independent biochemical control of GM1 polarity by PI3K and Golgi apparatus polarity by MEK/ERK may act synergistically to regulate and reinforce directional selection in cell migration.
The decoupling of Golgi apparatus and plasma membrane polarization appears to be the result of separate intracellular pathways controlled by Ras/Raf/MEK/ERK and PI3K/Akt/mTOR, respectively.
We have described the acute effects of blocking Golgi apparatus and GM1 polarization via inhibition of the MEK/ERK and PI3K/AKT pathways, but we also wanted to explore the longer term consequences of inhibiting these pathways on cell migration.
The MEK/ERK pathway seems to contribute more to the longer timescales of two-dimensional migration while the PI3K/AKT pathway contributes more to shorter timescales of three-dimensional matrix invasion.
Both the MEK/ERK and PI3K/AKT pathways are downstream of Cdc42, the master regulator of both cell migration and cell division 
Studies of the genetic destabilization found in cancer provide examples of inappropriate activation of the MEK/ERK and PI3K/AKT pathways.
Both the Ras/Raf/MEK/ERK and the PI3K/AKT pathway are frequently mutated to constitutively active forms in many types of human cancers, and convey invasive properties 
In human and mouse epidermis, the single disruption of MEK1 or MEK2 have no effect, whereas double mutants abolish ERK1/2 phosphorylation, leading to hypo-proliferation and apoptosis, effects that can be rescued overexpressing ERK1/2 
TRIB1, as other members of tribbles family, is a pseudokinase and is thought to act as an adaptor protein in the MEK/ERK signaling pathways [
Upon further characterization, we found that the responses to BRD0418 are MEK-dependent, as they are blocked by treatment with U0126, and that BRD0418 stimulates ERK1/2 phosphorylation.
Interestingly, TRIB1 itself has been shown to directly interact with MEK1 and to enhance ERK signaling [
The model has been applied to the RAF-MEK-ERK pathway and scaffolding protein KSR1 using computer simulations and in-vitro experiments.
In the presence of an electric field and the measure pH gradient, the simulations predict that RAF (with an isoelectric point [IEP] of about 9.2) is localized to the cytoplasm adjacent to the cell membrane while MEK and ERK (IEP 6.1 and 6.2 respectively) are localized to the cytoplasm closer to the nuclear membrane.
Interactions with MEK and ERK which are present in much higher concentration than RAF allows signal amplification.
We focus on movement and interactions of the 3 proteins that carry the signal from the CM to the N following ligand binding to epidermal growth factor receptor (EGFR): RAF, MEK, and ERK (
In the initial state, RAF is clustered around the CM and MEK and ERK around the NM.
As it reaches the perinuclear region, pRAF encounters and phosphorylates several MEK proteins which, in turn, phosphorylate several ERK proteins.
The rapid, direct movement of pRAF provides spatial and temporal information while the interactions with MEK and ERK amplify the signal at the NM.
RAF with an IEP of 9.2 is highly concentrated around the CM while MEK and ERK (IEPs of 6.1 and 6.2 respectively) cluster near the NM.
After phosphorylation, pRAF moves rapidly (about 0.1 second) and directly from the CM the perinuclear cytoplasm where it encounters multiple MEK proteins which in turn multiple ERK proteins which then strike the nuclear membrane.
However, interactions with MEK and ERK allow signal amplification without loss of positional information.
Top panel represents the physical characteristics of RAF, MEK and ERK both free and bound to KSR1 used in the computer simulations.
Lower panels represent predicted steady state distribution of RAF, MEK, and ERK in normal cells assuming continuous presence of ligand at the cell membrane and assuming the presence of scaffolding protein KSR1.
In this way the RAF, MEK, and ERK, would all be pushed to the cell wall, breaking down the organization and efficiency.
When we assumed movement governed by only random walk, the distribution of pRAF, pMEK, and pERK reflected a concentration gradient from the CM which was the starting point in the cascade to the NM.
The distribution of RAF, MEK and ERK represented a roughly opposite distribution.
Distribution RAF, pRAF, MEK, pMEK, ERK and pERK were determined in HMEC cells grown on CYTOO chips with a triangular micro pattern of fibronectin so that several thousand identically shaped and isolated cells were present on each chip.
The promotion requires activation of MEK-ERK and is dependent on the axis of S1P/S1PR1.
Activation of MEK-ERK pathways by S1P is required for S1P-stimulated invasion, and it is dependent of S1P/S1PR1 axis activation.
The levels of the phosphorylated forms of MAPK kinase 1 and 2 (MEK1/2) were markedly increased 10 minutes after S1P treatment and decreased after 30 minutes; The level of the phosphorylated forms of extracellular signal-regulated kinases 1 and 2 (ERK1/2) were increased 10 minutes after S1P treatment and maintained until 30 minutes, then decreased after 60 minutes (
The level of phosphorylated MEK1/2, ERK1/2 were determined by western blot using phospho-specific antibodies (p-MEK1/2, pERK1/2 respectively).
Treatment with U0126 (an inhibitor of MEK1/2) effectively inhibited the activation of ERK1/2 (
(F) The levels of activated MEK1/2, ERK1/2 were determined by western blot using phospho-specific antibodies (p-MEK1/2, p-ERK1/2, respectively).
Further studies revealed that activation of MEK-ERK signaling pathways is essential for the induction of invasion by S1P, and it is S1P/S1PR1 axis dependent.
Our study was the first to show that S1P promotes invasion of EVT cells via S1PR1 involving activation of MEK-ERK signaling pathway and elevated expression of MMP-2.
Signaling inhibitors for PI3K (LY-294002), MEK/ERK (U0126), p38MAPK (SB-203580) and JAK (DBI) were obtained from Calbiochem.
Anti-CD3 or phorbol myristate acetate (PMA)-mediated MAPK activation involves the activation of Ras, leading to the activation of Raf-1 and the subsequent activation of MEK (MAPK or ERK kinase) 
Activation of endogenous p38 by RAdMKK3bE or ERK1/2 by RAdMEK1CA alone was not sufficient to induce TIMP-3 expression, but combined activation of both ERK1/2 and p38 resulted in potent induction in the expression of TIMP-3 mRNA (
Although the precise molecular pathway leading from the activated oncogenes to the final growth arrest is not known, it involves activation of the RAF-MEK-ERK kinase pathway that results in transcriptional activation of the 
Four kinases: syk, Raf-1, MEK-1/2 and ERK-1/2 exhibit reduced (A), whereas the other four kinases: lyn, PI3-K, MKK-3/6 and p38MAPK exhibited enhanced phosphorylation (B), upon increase in dose strength.
In the figures, V1, k3, (k5, k6), (k9, k10), V13, k15, (k17, 18,), (k21, k22) are syk, Raf-1, (MEK-1/2), (ERK-1/2), lyn, PI3-K, (MKK-3/6), (p38MAPK) phosphorylation rates, respectively.
Activation of MEK-1/2, MKK-1/2, ERK-1/2 and p38MAPK requires double phosphorylation 
To determine whether MEK-ERK1/2 and PI3K-AKT signaling pathways are required for BDNF-induced neurite outgrowth, specific inhibitors were used to block either one of these pathways.
The MEK inhibitor, U0126, inhibited BDNF-induced pERK1/2 in both cell lines (
This pathway does not appear to be p38 MAPK (data not shown), PI3K/Akt or MEK1/2 of the ERK pathway, as inhibition of these pathways had no effect on nuclear export of tRNA and NTF2, or nuclear import of Ran.
It has been shown that MEK/ERK signaling pathway regulates the expression of the adipogenic transcription factors during the early phase of adipogenesis 
While the list of the confirmed binding partners of IQGAP2 remains relatively short, its extensively studied homolog IQGAP1 binds ERK1/2 through its WW domain and MEK1/2 and Akt through the IQ motifs [
BRAF is a proto-oncogene that promotes cell growth and proliferation by transducing signals from growth factor receptors as part of the MAP kinase pathway via MEK and ERK.
We demonstrate that a MEK inhibitor or the combination of c-Met and RAF inhibitors suppresses phosphorylation of ERK and reduces the proliferation of the resistant clones 
Treatment with RAFi increased ERK phosphorylation two fold in GTL16 as RAF inhibitors can transactivate homo/heterodimers of RAF isoforms to increase MEK signaling 
Single agent MEKi was able to completely inhibit ERK phosphorylation in all cells.
BRAF promotes cell growth and proliferation by transducing signals from growth factor receptors as part of the MAP kinase pathway via MEK and ERK.
Highly expressed SND1-BRAF fusion protein signals through the MEK/ERK pathway and short-circuits c-Met inhibition.
Membranes were probed with individual antibodies against NRF2, EGFR, pEGFR, AKT, pAKT, MEK1/2, pMEK1/2, ERK1/2 or pERK1/2 as described above.
To further address whether the EGFR-PI3K-AKT/MEK1/2-ERK1/2 signaling pathway act as the upstream activator that induces NRF2-ARE-mediated transcriptional response to PCN, we examined the nuclear translocation of NRF2 in A549 cells in the presence or absence of the EGFR specific inhibitor AG1478, PI3K-specific inhibitor LY294002, ERK1/2 inhibitor 3-(2-Aminoethyl)-5-((4-ethoxyphenyl)methylene)-2,4-thiazolidinedione, and AKT Inhibitor VIII trifluoroacetate salt hydrate.
Several recent reports support a role for the EGFR-PI3K-AKT/MEK1/2-ERK1/2 pathway in regulating nuclear accumulation of NRF2 in response to oxidative stress.
Subsequently, EGFR activates PI3K, which phosphorylates AKT and MEK1/2-ERK1/2, respectively.
Activated AKT and MEK1/2-ERK1/2 phosphorylate NRF2, causing the dissociation of NRF2:Keap1 complex in the cytoplasm, ultimately leading to the translocation of NRF2 to the nucleus, where it activates the transcription of ARE-containing genes that encode antioxidative and detoxification enzymes.
(A) The MEK-ERK pathway was activated in MCF-7/paclitaxel cells compared with MCF-7 cells.
MAPK/ERK reactivation induced by a recombinant lentiviral vector, Lv-MEK, was able to rescue the inhibitory effect of OA on migration and invasion of glioma cells.
To confirm the importance of MAPK/ERK pathway inactivation for OA to inhibit migration and invasion potentials of glioma cells, we overexpressed MEK1 protein by infecting a recombinant lentivirus.
MEK1 is a dual specificity kinase that phosphorylates and activates ERK-1 and ERK-2 
MEK1 is a dual specificity kinase that phosphorylates and activates ERK1/2 by phosphorylating threonine and tyrosine residues 
We hypothesized that this might be related to up-regulation of the Raf/MEK/ERK signaling cascade or persistent pS6 signaling.
Combination of ruxolitinib with U0126, erlotinib or sunitinib effectively inhibited signaling to STAT3, AKT, ERK and S6, indicating that the JAK2, PI3K, MEK and mTOR pathways can be inhibited together using combinatorial drug treatment (
To investigate the regulatory role of hSulf-1 in heparin-binding growth factor signaling in human cancers, the previous studies identified that hSulf-1 expression can diminish the cascade phosphorylation of a series of kinases including epidermal growth factor receptor (EGFR), extracellular signal-regulated kinase (ERK), mitogen-activated protein kinase kinase (MEK), serine/threonine kinase (AKT) after treatment with exogenously added growth factors, and followed by inactivation of downstream signaling pathways 
Transgenic (flk:GFP) zebrafish embryos were treated with SB203580 (p38 MAPK inhibitor, Calbiochem, Billerica, MA), PD98059 (p42/44 MAPK inhibitor, Calbiochem) and U0126 (MEK/ERK inhibitor, Cell Signaling Technology) that were diluted in dimethyl sulfoxide (DMSO).
To investigate the effect of the ERK1/2 inhibitor on migration of Gas6 induced HRMECs, the cells were pretreated with a MEK/ERK kinase inhibitor (U0126) and Gas6 for 6 h. For quantitating relative migration, the number of cells migrating in a field was counted.
To further investigate the effect of signaling molecule expression on phenotypic changes in angiogenic processes, we treated with SB203580 (p38 MAPK inhibitor), PD98059 (ERK inhibitor), or U0126 (MEK/ERK inhibitor), and injected EX5-MO and EX7-MO into flk:GFP transgenic zebrafish embryos using previously described methods.
The specificity of the MEK/ERK inhibitor has already been reported 
The effects of selective inhibitors of different kinases [PD98059 (MEK1), U0126 (ERK1/2), SB203580 (p38
Regarding vascular responsiveness, physical exercise is considered a potent stimulus for NO production by activating mechanosensors present in endothelial cells that are coupled to complex biochemical signaling pathways including activation of Ras/MEK/ERK, c-Src, and PI3K/Akt pathways. 
However, because the increased JNK and ERK activation caused by MEKK1 overexpression may interfere with the response to cytoskeletal disruption, we sought to first establish a low-level expression system using the pBabe retroviral vector, which would not significantly increase JNK or ERK activation in resting cells.
Because MEKK1 can degrade ERK via the activity of the PHD under conditions of osmotic stress, and ERK activation is generally linked to survival signals, ERK levels and its activation were also analyzed after cytoskeletal disruption 
By expressing each mutation at levels that do not increase JNK or ERK activation in resting cells, we were able to clarify which domains of MEKK1 are actually involved in carrying out apoptosis after cytoskeletal disruption.
have shown that the PHD is required for MEKK1 to ubiquitinate and degrade ERK and c-Jun under conditions of osmotic stress 
Primary antibodies used were specific against ERK1/2, phospho(T202/Y204)-ERK1/2, MEK1/2, phospho(T217/221)-MEK1/2, Raf1, phospho(S259)-Raf1, phospho(S289/296/301)-Raf1, Lyn, Fgr, Slp76, pan-phospho(Y416)SFK, Vav1, GAPDH (Cell Signaling, Danvers, MA), c-Cbl (Santa Cruz Biotechnology), and phospho(S621)-Raf1 (Thermo Scientific).
Sustained activation of the Raf/MEK/ERK proteins is a long-known feature of RA-treated HL60, and direct inhibition of MEK (and subsequently ERK as well as c-Raf) using PD98095 has been shown to abolish RA-induced differentiation of HL60 
A: There was no change in total ERK or MEK levels for any cell line.
RA induced MEK and ERK phosphorylation in all three cell lines.
We investigated the Raf/MEK/ERK cascade and expression of CD38 binding partners after 48 h of PP2 and PP2+RA treatment in both RA-resistant HL60 cell lines.
Intriguingly, the presence of PP2 grossly cripples the phosphorylation of ERK and MEK in the RA-resistant cells, with no change in total MEK or ERK levels (
However, PP2-induced c-Raf phosphorylation, despite a decrease in MEK and ERK phosphorylation, is consistent in that c-Raf has defined ERK-independent functions 
In addition, recent studies have shown that GLP-1 secretagogues are stimulated by the protein kinase C (PKC) or mitogen-activated or extracellular signal-regulated protein kinase (MEK)-extracellular signal-regulated kinase (ERK) pathways [
Oncolytic influenza A viruses with deleted NS1 gene (delNS1) replicate selectively in tumour cells with defective interferon response and/or activated Ras/Raf/MEK/ERK signalling pathway.
Interference with MEK/ERK signalling by RNAi-mediated depletion or the MEK inhibitor U0126 did not affect the oncolytic effects of the delNS1 viruses.
Signal transduction pathways like the Ras/Raf/MEK/ERK signalling pathway or the PI3K/AKT signalling pathway may be stimulated by Influenza A infection and may play a role in virus replication and tumour cell survival 
Activation of the Ras/Raf/MEK/ERK signalling pathway during influenza infection seems to be important for the succesful replication of influenza A viruses in host cells 
To investigate a possible involvement of ERK signaling in the NELL2 action during the aggregation of P19 cells, the P19 cells permanently expressing NELL2 were treated with a MEK inhibitor, U0126, from day 0 to day 4 of aggregation (see 
I show that SSRBC MEK-dependent ERK1/2 inactivation with MEK inhibitors significantly decreased SSRBC adhesion to both non-activated and activated microvascular ECs 
In summary, anomalous MEK-dependent ERK1/2 activation in SSRBCs can contribute to the pathogenesis of SCD by potentially activating at least two significant cellular players of vasoocclusive events, SSRBC adhesion and SSRBC-induced activation of leukocytes.
Inhibitors specific to JNK (SP600125), MEK/ERK (PD98059), p38 MAPK (SB203580), caspases (z-VAD-fmk) and ER stress (Salubrinal) were purchased from Calbiochem (San Diego, CA).
 How EPAC controls differentiation is not known as we have found no clear evidence that EPAC activity directly induces or modulates the activation of ErbB, MEK-ERK or Akt in SCs [
Modulation of EGFR signalling through the RAF-MEK-ERK pathway has been shown to regulate cell adhesion, formation of cell aggregates and cellular motility 
Both the Akt/mTOR and MEK/ERK signaling pathways have been reported to regulate various aspects of cell physiology, including autophagy[
(C) Western blotting of MEK/ERK signaling.
Moreover, we demonstrate that CA16 modulates autophagy, in part, by inhibiting the Akt/mTOR/p70S6k signaling pathway and activating the MEK/ERK signaling pathway.
We demonstrated that inhibition of the Akt/mTOR/p70S6k signaling pathway and activation of the MEK/ERK signaling pathway are critical for autophagy induction.
Non-phospho- or phospho-MEK1/2, non-phospho-ERK1, phospho-ERK1/2
In addition, gene profile results gave us a broader view supporting the functional involvement of miR-126&126* in some key pathways of the oncogenic transformation, above all PI3K/AKT and RAS/RAF/MEK/ERK.
In the MAPK pathway, ERK phosphorylation is a sign of ERK activation by MEK 
The MEK/ERK pathway plays key roles in controlling cell survival and cell cycle progression, and its deregulation is often implicated in developing drug resistance and cancer progression.
This study provides the first evidence that MEK/ERK pathway mediates BTZ resistance and suggests that MEK/ERK inhibitors could be successfully used in conjunction with BTZ to overcome drug resistance in MDS.
MEK/ERK pathway is activated in aggressive CKS1B-overexpressing plasma cell myeloma cells 
The cytotoxic effects of BTZ appeared to depend, at least in part, on the inhibition of the MEK/ERK pathway.
Since it has been reported that ischemic preconditioning activates the MEK/ERK and PI3K/AKT signaling pathway [
Although the detailed mechanisms via which LIPC confers the cellular protection remains unclarified, it has been suggested that LIPC activated the MEK/ERK in liver cells [
This is to be expected, since apart from disparities in Raf/MEK/ERK activity 
Surprisingly, ERK activity persisted in LeTx-treated cells expressing MEK2cr but not MEK1cr.
ERK1 and ERK2 are the only identified enzymatic substrates of MEK1 and MEK2.
To evaluate the sufficiency of MEK1 and MEK2 to phosphorylate ERK in SK-MEL-28 cells, we examined the status of ERK phosphorylation when these cells had only MEK1 or MEK2 (
In these experiments we found that simultaneous knockdown of both MEK1 and MEK2 was required to inhibit ERK activation and to block cell cycle progression.
To more stringently test the involvement of the ERK/MAPK pathway in blue light-induced, D-box mediated gene expression, we used a genetic approach based on either a dominant negative form of ERK or dominant active forms of ERK and MEK kinases (see 
All dominant active and dominant negative ERK/MEK expression constructs were based on the CMV promoter driven expression vector pcDNA3.1 (Invitrogen) and have been described elsewhere 
Phospho-ERK, ERK and MEK antibodies were purchased from Cell Signaling.
These coexistent mutations suggest that combined targeting of MEK/ERK and PI3K/AKT for treatment of this tumor would be more effective than targeting just one of the two mutations.
The activation of Met by HGF binding is linked to cell growth and survival, through activation of both the PI3-kinase/PDK/Akt and the Ras/Raf/MEK/ERK pathways, and to cell mobility and cytoskeletal organization via activation of the Rho-GTPases, Rho, Rac and CDC42.
We found that a constitutively active MEK5 mutant phosphorylated ERK5 at the TEY motif, resulting in the sequential autophosphorylation of multiple C-terminal residues, including Thr732 and Ser769/773/775.
Upon phosphorylation of the ERK5 TEY activation motif by MEK5, multiple serine and threonine residues in the ERK5 C-terminal are autophosphorylated.
It has been shown that ERK1/2 forms homodimers upon phosphorylation by the upstream kinase MEK1/2 [
MEK 1/2 is the upstream activator of ERK1/2.
Thus, we used the MEK1/2 inhibitor, U0126, to determine if the METH-induced changes in pERK1/2 were related to the METH-induced protection against 6-OHDA.
We observed that pMEK1/2, like pERK1/2, was decreased by pretreatment with a low concentration of METH (0.5 mM) (
The levels of pERK are determined by the opposing effects of two phosphoproteins, pMEK, which increases pERK, and PP2A, which decreases it.
Paradoxically, METH pre-conditioning reduced basal levels of pERK1/2 as well as pMEK1/2, a direct ERK1/2 upstream component.
Whereas plasma membrane targeting of Raf-1 activates the classical MEK>ERK (MAPK) cascade but does not protect cells, mitochondrial targeting of Raf-1 protects cells 
To examine this possibility we used SL237, an inhibitor of mitogen-activated protein kinase/ERK kinase (MEK) which blocks the phosphorylation/activation of ERK.
We further demonstrate that it regulates cell survival via a signaling mechanism involving MEK-ERK via TLR4 and CD11B/CD18.
We further show that the S100 A8/9 complex is a primary regulatory molecule regulating cell survival via CD11b/CD18 and TLR4, and through a signaling mechanism involving MEK-ERK.
Our results also show a role for the MEK/ERK pathway following activation by S100A8/9.
Activated Ras (GTP-bound state) activates downstream effectors including the Raf/mitogen-activated protein (MAP)/extracellular signal-regulated kinase (MEK/ERK), phosphatidylinositol-3-OH kinase/AKT, and RalA pathways to induce a range of cellular responses including proliferation, migration and transformation.
In order to examine how ERK1/2 activity is regulated by Brd2 in 3T3-L1 preadipocytes, the activation state of the upstream MEK regulators, the Raf family members, was evaluated in cells with Brd2 silencing or overexpression.
In order to examine this hypothesis we induced adipocyte differentiation in the presence of the MEK inhibitor UO126 that blocks the phosphorylation and activity of ERK1/2.
Our study has revealed a novel role of autophagy in PARP-1 degradation in response to GEM, and the different impacts of MEK/ERK signaling pathway on autophagy between GEM-sensitive and -resistant PC cells.
The MEK/ERK signaling pathway showed a different effect on autophagy and GEM-induced PARP-1 degradation between KLM1 and KLM1-R cells.
The MEK inhibitor U0126 shows different effects on the level of autophagy and PARP-1 degradation in response to GEM between KLM1 and KLM1-R cells, indicating that possibly limitations exist on the therapeutic strategy for targeting the EGFR/Ras/ERK pathway in PC.
Further investigating the correlation between ERK activation and Cdc25C hyper-phosphorylation of cells under LBH589 treatment, the Cdc25C hyper-phosphorylation induced by LBH589 was blocked by MEK inhibitors U0126 and PD98059 in LNCaP cells.
To investigate the involvement of ERK activation, LNCaP cells were treated with the MEK inhibitor, U0126, to inhibit ERK activity in the presence of LBH589.
ERK activation is controlled by the upstream Ras/Raf/MEK pathway [
(c) indicates significant differences from MEK/ERK inhibitor (P<0.05).
KSR1 is a molecular scaffold of the Raf/MEK/ERK MAP kinase cascade that regulates the intensity and duration of ERK activation.
KSR2, like KSR1, is able to regulate the Raf/MEK/ERK MAP kinase pathway 
To further delineate the mechanisms underlying guggulsterone-induced ERK1/2 phosphorylation we examined the actions of inhibitors of EGFR, MEK (the kinase immediately upstream of ERK) and Src kinase.
We also found that bFGF activates the mitogen-activated protein kinase kinase/extracellular-signal regulated kinase (MEK/ERK) signaling.
In ERK signaling cascades, extracellular signals are transmitted by MEK1/2 
Although bFGF stimulates MEK/ERK signaling and induces the proliferation of PGCs, MEK/ERK alone was not enough to prevent PGCs from losing their unique potential because bFGF withdrawal did not significantly alter marker expression or migrational activity.
In addition to MEK/ERK signaling, other signaling pathways may play important roles in maintaining PGC characteristics.
While mitogen activated protein kinases (MAPKs) are known to promote ligand-independent cell growth, the role of the MEK5-ERK5 pathway in the progression of clinical breast carcinoma remains poorly understood.
Both MEK5 and ERK5 are structurally and functionally distinct from other MAPKs 
The purpose of this study is to elucidate the role of MEK-ERK5 signaling in the progression of breast cancer.
While total MEK5 and ERK5 protein expressions in patients has been reported at 50% and 20% respectively, the prevalence of phospho-ERK5 in clinical breast cancer has not yet been investigated by immuno-histochemistry.
To confirm a role for the MEK5-ERK5 signaling pathway in the hormone independent phenotype of MEK5 overexpressing cells, shRNA ERK5 or vector constructs were stably transfected into MCF-7-MEK5 cells.
Significant downregulation of ERK5 was observed in MCF-7-MEK5-ERK5-shRNA transfected cells compared to empty-shRNA vector (
MCF-7-MEK5 cells were transfected with empty vector or ERK5 shRNA.
While recent evidence indicates a role for MAPK signaling in cancer oncogenesis and metastasis, the role of the MEK5-ERK5 pathway in breast cancer progression remains poorly understood.
Currently, there is little data on the activation status of the MEK5-ERK5 pathway among breast cancer patients 
We further elucidated the relationship between MEK5-ERK5 signaling and the ER regulated pathways.
We and others have reported increased expression of MEK5-ERK5 in mesenchymal breast cancer cells, however, the mechanism of this correlation has yet to be determined 
Our data demonstrate a critical role for MEK5-ERK5 signaling in the progression to a hormone independent and EMT phenotype of breast carcinoma.
Further studies are needed to better our understanding of the potential activators of MEK5-ERK5 and subsequent downstream signaling.
However, our findings demonstrate the clinical relevance and therapeutic potential of targeting the MEK5-ERK5 pathway in the treatment of endocrine resistant breast cancer.
Legend: RTK, receptor tyrosine kinase; RAS, synaptic Ras-GTPase-activating protein; RAF (also known as MAPK3), mitogen-activated protein kinase (MAPK) kinase kinase; MEK (also known as MAPK2), MAPK kinase; ERK1/2, extracellular signal-regulated kinase; ERE, estrogen response element; ER, endoplasmic reticulum.
Analyses of intracellular FGFR3 signaling disclosed that meclozine downregulates phosphorylation of ERK but not of MEK in FGF2-treated RCS cells.
Similarly, meclozine enhanced proliferation of RCS cells expressing constitutively active mutants of MEK and RAF but not of ERK, which suggests that meclozine downregulates the FGFR3 signaling by possibly attenuating ERK phosphorylation.
RCS cells were pretreated with meclozine for 30 minutes before adding FGF2, and the phosphorylation levels of ERK and MEK were determined by Western blotting.
The FGF2-mediated ERK1/2 phosphorylation was attenuated by meclozine, while MEK1/2 phosphorylation remained unchanged (
MAPK signaling includes sequential stimulation of a signaling cascade involving RAS, RAF, MEK, and ERK.
To explore the molecular mechanism, PI3K/Akt, MEK/ERK and Notch signaling pathways were investigated.
To investigate the molecular mechanism of Sal B on promoting proliferation of NSPCs, we checked the PI3K/Akt, MEK/ERK and Notch signaling pathways, which were closely related to the proliferation and differentiation of NSPCs 
Notch, MEK/ERK and PI3K/Akt pathways are the most frequently ones that associated with regulation of cell growth, survival, and differentiation 
PI3K/AKT signal pathway inhibitor LY294002 and MAPK/ERK1/2 signal pathway kinase (MEK1/2) inhibitor U0126 were purchased from Cell Signal Technology.
The levels of some MAPK kinases, such as MEK1, ERK and JNK as well as phosphorylated ERK and JNK, and their downstream effector molecules, including c-MYC and c-JUN, were confirmed by Western blotting.
Levels of MEK1, ERK, JNK, phosphorylated ERK, phosphorylated JNK, c-MYC and c-JUN were inhibited by LPLUNC1.
The levels of MEK1, ERK, JNK, phosphorylated ERK and JNK, and c-JUN were increased after LPS stimulation.
PD98059, an inhibitor of MEK, which phosphorylates and activates the ERK1/2 MAP kinases, suppressed nuclear translocation of TRX-1 and neuron survival [
(A) The Ras-Raf-MEK-ERK 1/2 signaling pathway is activated in HeLa wild-type cells after exposure to 0.5 mM SNAP or 0.5 mM H
eGFP-ERK2 (pAS4176) and pcDNA3-MEK (pAS4177) have been described previously (kindly provided by Rony Seger [
uPAR can interact with different types of Integrins and participates in the activation of the MEK/ERK and Rac pathways, both leading to mesenchymal migration.
The activation of the PI3K/Akt/mTORC1 and MEK/ERK pathways plays a pivotal role in stimulating DNA synthesis, cell cycle progression and proliferation of PDAC cells and are negatively regulated by AMPK 
Given the pivotal importance of the RAS/MEK/ERK pathway in PDAC development and maintenance, we also analyzed the effect of increasing concentrations of berberine on ERK activation by detecting ERK phosphorylated on Thr
Here, we show that the effects of MG132 treatment on ERK signaling are more widespread, leading to a reduction in activation of the upstream kinase MEK.
A semi-mechanistic model of ERK phosphorylation was developed to estimate the fold-upregulation of ERK phosphatase activity in MG132-treated cells, using the time course of MEK phosphorylation as an input.
Given that MEK phosphorylation is also perturbed by MG132 treatment, our strategy was to independently fit each time course of MEK phosphorylation to a phenomenological function; then, assuming those phosphorylated MEK kinetics, ERK phosphorylation kinetics were globally fit to a modified Michaelis-Menten model (
The kinetics of MEK and ERK phosphorylation on activating sites (
Based on the suggestion that MEK activation is reduced in combination with increased ERK dephosphorylation activity in MG132-treated cells, we sought to parse these two effects quantitatively.
Our computational analysis supports a hypothetical model whereby MG132 treatment reduces ERK phosphorylation by both reducing MEK activation and enhancing ERK dephosphorylation.
Although MKP1 and MKP3 are upregulated in MG132-treated cells, to an extent that can explain the apparent decrease in MEK-catalyzed ERK phosphorylation, we previously found no correlation between the expression levels of these particular DUSPs and the kinetics of growth factor-stimulated ERK phosphorylation 
To partially test the generality of the results reported here, we evaluated the effects of MG132 treatment on PDGF-stimulated MEK and ERK phosphorylation in NIH 3T3 fibroblasts as before, alongside parallel measurements for primary mouse embryonic fibroblasts (MEFs) and HT-1080 human fibrosarcoma cells (
MEK and ERK participate in a well-characterized phosphorelay signaling system within the MAP kinase pathway [
Our analysis of the MEK-ERK phosphorelay is shown in 
(C) Transfer function of pMEK versus ppERK.
The positive slope is indicative of ERK activation by MEK.
Model 1 corresponds to the hypothesis that MEK regulate ERK.
Alternatively, model 2 assumes that ERK regulates MEK.
Convergent activation of ERK by regulators other than MEK was ruled-out by complete absence of ERK activation given pre-treatment with MEK inhibitor.
Cells were then labeled with a combination of anti-ppERK, and anti-pMEK primary antibodies for 30 min at room temperature, followed by a combination of secondary antibodies and anti-CD45 for 30 minutes at room temperature.
Sorafenib is a multikinase inhibitor that acts on a number of kinases including Raf Kinases, MEK, ERK signaling as well as on vascular endothelial growth factor receptor 2 (VEGFR2), platelet derived growth factor receptor (PDGFR), FLT3, Ret and c-Kit [
Western blot (WB) analysis was done to observe for cell death (PARP cleavage and caspase 8), pERK, pMEK, Stat3PY and Stat3PS.
WB analysis was performed to analyze the expression of pERK, pMEK and Stat3PS.
The following antibodies were used: Caspase 8, PARP, cyclin D1, cyclin D2, Stat3-PY, Stat3-PY, Stat3, pERK, pMEK, ERK, MEK, Mcl-1, Jak-2, pJAK2, SOCS, PIAS (Cell Signaling Technology, Beverly, MA); Ran, XIAP (BD Pharmingen, San Diego, CA).
Treatment with MEK 1/2 inhibitor U0126 reduces phosphorylation of ERK 1/2 but does not influence FHOD1 expression.
It has been reported that activation of the MEK/ERK pathway can also inhibit expression of PEPCK and G6Pase genes, most likely through a mechanism independent of insulin.
Signaling through key proliferative pathways such as MEK/ERK and PI3K/AKT can also increase PD-L1 expression. 
In the nongenomic action, Src/MEK/ERK1/2 signaling was rapidly activated by estrogen in hormone sensitive cells 
MEK is a dual-specificity kinase that specifically activates ERK such that when MEK is inhibited, ERK phosphorylation is disrupted [
(A) The involvement of JAK/STAT3, ERK1/2, MEK, and inhibition and activation resulted in prominent cell growth attenuation.
It has been shown that Ras/Raf/MEK/ERK signaling cascade plays a central role in promoting entry into S-phase by indirect regulation of the expression of cyclins and the activities of cyclin-dependent kinases during the cell cycle.
Previously, we found that proliferation of SMC in response to obstructive stimuli including damaged matrix is associated with several signaling pathways, including MEK/ERK 
A classical downstream effector of MEK1 is ERK1/2.
Western Blot analysis showed increased phosphorylation of ERK1/2 after MEK1 activation.
Moreover, addition of U0126 inhibited MEK1 induced phosphorylation of ERK1/2 (
As indicated by Western Blot, co-transfection of MKP1 led to dephosphorylation of ERK1/2 even in the presence of activated MEK1 (
(a) Western blot analysis using anti-phosphorylated ERK1/2 (p-ERK1/2) antibody on lysates of NkL-Tag cells transiently transfected with MEK1 and MKP1, indicating decreased activation of ERK1/2 after co-expression of MKP1.
(g) Western blot analysis using anti-phosphorylated ERK1/2 (p-ERK1/2) antibody on lysates of indicated heart samples, demonstrating enhanced MEK1-ERK1/2 activity following exercise-induced cardiac hypertrophy.
(b) Western blot analysis using anti-phosphorylated ERK1/2 (p-ERK1/2) antibody on lysates of heart samples of indicated experimental procedure, showing reduced MEK1-ERK1/2 activity of exercised mice treated with U0126.
Consisting of three major branches of sequentially signaling pathways, the MEK1 signaling pathway, which culminates in ERK1/2 activation, is hypothesized to regulate the growth and adaptation of the heart to both physiological and pathological stimuli 
We found that treatment of Lem2-silenced C2C12 cells with a MEK inhibitor to reduce activated ERK1/2 had no effect on AKT activation, whereas treatment with a PI3 kinase inhibitor to inhibit AKT caused a time-dependent oscillation in the levels of activated ERK1/2 (unpublished data).
Activation of receptor tyrosine kinases by growth factors and cytokines promotes cell proliferation, survival, and migration through activation of the Ras-Raf-MEK-ERK cascade 
It is known that ROS activate MEK and ERK1/2 through the inhibition of tyrosine phosphatases 
The MEK/ERK signaling pathway positively regulates replication of many RNA viruses.
In this study, we took advantage of two well-characterized MEK/ERK inhibitors and MEK/ERK dominant negative mutants and investigated the roles of the MEK/ERK signaling pathway in HCV gene expression and replication.
We showed that inhibition of MEK/ERK signaling enhanced HCV gene expression, plus- and minus-strand RNA synthesis, and virus production.
Furthermore, we showed that only MEK and ERK-2 but not ERK-1 was involved in HCV replication, likely through regulation of HCV RNA translation.
Taken together, these results demonstrate a negative regulatory role of the MEK/ERK signaling pathway in HCV replication and suggest a potential risk in targeting this signaling pathway to treat and prevent neoplastic transformation of HCV-infected liver cells.
The MEK/ERK signaling pathway plays an important role in their replication.
Activation of the MEK/ERK signaling cascade enhances replication of viruses such as human immunodeficiency virus 
To determine the relationship between MEK/ERK signaling and HCV replication, we took advantage of two well-characterized and widely used MEK inhibitors (U0126 and PD98059).
The above experiments were conducted with cells that were cultured in the medium containing 10% FBS, which likely activated the basal MEK/ERK signaling.
Thus, we then determined whether the basal level of the MEK/ERK activity was sufficient for the MEK inhibitors-enhanced HCV replication.
To ensure that MEK inhibitors-enhanced HCV replication was not due to a non-specific off-target effect of these drugs and to test whether the responsible effectors were downstream of MEK, we took advantage of the dominant negative strategy to inactivate the constitutive MEK-1, ERK-1, and ERK-2 activity and determined their effects on HCV replication.
HCV RLuc replicon cells were transfected with dominant negative MEK-1, ERK-1, ERK-2 constructs 
HCV RLuc replicon cells were transfected with dominant negative MEK-1 (A), ERK-1 or ERK-2 (B), or the empty vector.
Besides regulating targets gene expression by phosphorylating downstream transcription factors, the MEK/ERK signaling cascade is also involved in the translational control of gene expression through direct phosphorylation of translation factors 
In this study, we took advantage of MEK inhibitors and dominant negatives and demonstrated the involvement of MEK-1 and ERK-2 but not ERK-1 in HCV replication in both HCV subgenomic and genomic systems.
We found that blockage of MEK/ERK signaling by MEK inhibitors increased HCV gene expression and plus-strand RNA synthesis, which is consistent with previous studies 
The MEK/ERK signaling pathway may regulate HCV replication through direct or indirect phosphorylation of viral and/or cellular proteins.
The MEK/ERK signaling pathway is involved in cell growth and proliferation and has been a major target for anti-cancer drugs development.
The MEK/ERK signaling pathway regulates target gene expression at both the transcriptional and translational levels by direct phosphorylation of translation factors 
Not surprisingly, the phosphorylation of ERK was inhibited by the treatment of MEK inhibitor U0126.
In NIM-1 cells harboring BRAF mutation, TGFA stimulated proliferation, contributing to PI3K/AKT activation independent of MEK/ERK signaling.
To validate this in silico analysis, functional experiments in thyroid cancer cell lines demonstrated the presence of a functional TGFA/EGFR autocrine signaling loop, which sustained the proliferation of PTC cells and contributed to the activation of the PI3K/AKT pathway independent of MEK/ERK pathway.
To define the signaling pathway activated by TGFA/EGFR loop when the MEK/ERK pathway was blocked, Western blot analysis was performed on total cell lysates from 24-h-starved NIM-1 cells stimulated for 24 h with TGFA alone or together with UO126.
Since activation of the Raf/MEK/ERK pathway is linked to both surface membrane translocation of the newly synthesized HA and apoptosis induction 
Both the Ras/Raf/MEK/ERK pathway and the PI3K/AKT pathway mediate signals from various growth factor receptors, and these two pathways regulate several common downstream molecules that are critical in cell survival and cell cycle progression such as forkhead transcription factors 
PAR2 is known to couple to Gi, and both ERK and MEK are signal transducers in the Gi signaling cascade.
THP-1 cells were stimulated with S100A9 protein for 30 min and activation of MEK/ERK and PI3K signaling pathways were measured by using Phospho(Thr202/Tyr204; Thr185/Tyr187)/Total ERK1/2 whole cell lysate kit and Phospho(Ser473)/Total AKT whole lysate kit (Meso Scale Discovery Inc, Gaithersburg, MD).
Previous data has indicated that engagement of RAGE by its ligands can trigger the activation of a broad range of signaling pathways including Ras/MEK/ERK 1/2 dependent NFkB activation, CDC42/Rac/MAPKK dependent p38 activation, SAPK/Jnk MAP kinases dependent AP-1 activation as well as the phosphatidylinositol 3-kinase (PI3K)/AKT activation [
Roberts and Der (2007) used an EGFR-Ras-Raf-MEK-ERK pathway to explain that 10% of NSCLC arise from EGFR mutations and that 30% of NSCLC arise from mutations in Ras 
Meanwhile, AMPK was demonstrated to be the upstream activator of the extracellular-regulated kinase (ERK) in Jurkat T cells, and inhibition of MEK attenuated AIA in Jurkat T/OECM-1/CE81T/VGH cells.
Collectively, our studies indicate that Beclin-1 and Atg5 but not AMPK are commonly required for AIA, and MEK/ERK pathway is involved in AIA.
The biological effects of Ras family proteins are mediated through several different mechanisms in addition to the PI3K-dependent pathway; prominent among these is the Ras/Raf/MEK/ERK MAP kinase signalling pathway [
The ability of the MEK1/2 inhibitor, PD98059, to prevent ERK1/2 phosphorylation and abolish the negative effect of H-Ras on the amiloride-sensitive current, however, indicates that activation of ERK1/2 is required for the regulation of ENaC by H-Ras.
EGF conjugated to Alexa fluor 647 streptavidin (EGF-Alexa647) and human Transferrin conjugated to Texas Red (Tfr-TR) were purchased from Molecular Probes (Eugene, OR); antibodies to EGFR, RAF-1, MEK1/2, ERK1/2, phospho-ERK1/2, phospho-MEK1/2, GAPDH were from Cell Signaling Technology; clathrin heavy chain antibodies (TD1) were from the American Type Culture Collection (ATCC); Shoc2 antibodies were from Abcam (USA); HA antibodies were from Covance.
Insulin stimulates ERK1/2 though activation of the RAS, Raf, MEK cascade.
MEK is an immediate upstream activator of ERK1/2.
The MEK inhibitor, U0126, not only decreases phosphorylation of ERK1/2 but also impairs insulin-stimulated glucose uptake in adipocytes 
Most interestingly, we found that activation of the MEK/ERK pathway promotes HES1 expression.
Inhibition of the gamma-secretase complex prevented the MEK/ERK-induced HES1 expression suggesting a NOTCH-dependent mechanism.
Finally, higher levels of NIC1 were found associated with its transcriptional partners [CBF1, Su(H) and LAG-1] (CSL) and MASTERMIND-LIKE 1 (MAML1) upon MEK/ERK activation providing a potential mechanism whereby the MEK/ERK pathway promotes expression of NOTCH target genes.
For the first time, our data exposed a signalling pathway, namely the MEK/ERK pathway that positively impacts on NOTCH nuclear outcome. 
Most interestingly, we found that activation of the MEK/ERK pathway promotes HES1 expression through NOTCH-dependent mechanisms. 
Interestingly, we observed higher molecular weight forms of an exogenous NIC1 when cells were co-transfected with a constitutive active form of MEK1 (MEK1 CA) that lead to ERK1/2 activation (
We next addressed whether the MEK/ERK pathway could influence NOTCH signalling particularly in our pancreatic cancer cell model MIA PaCa-2, which displays basal NOTCH1 activation/NIC1 expression but inducible NOTCH1 activation (see 
Moreover, luteolin-induced CREB activation, miR-132 expression and neurite outgrowth were inhibited by adenylate cyclase, protein kinase A (PKA) and MAPK/ERK kinase 1/2 (MEK1/2) inhibitors but not by protein kinase C (PKC) or calcium/calmodulin-dependent protein kinase II (CaMK II) inhibitors.
Next, we tested whether arrestin binding affects ERK2 phosphorylation by MEK1.
Purified inactive (unphosphorylated) ERK2 and purified constitutively active MEK1 (which phosphorylates ERK2) were used to reconstruct this module of c-Raf1-MEK1-ERK1/2 cascade 
The first report on the role of arrestins in the activation of c-Raf1-MEK1-ERK1/2 cascade suggested that only receptor-bound arrestins interact with c-Raf1 and ERK1/2, whereas MEK1 does not bind arrestins directly, but is recruited via c-Raf1 and ERK to the complex 
Although non-visual arrestins were proposed to act as scaffolds for the c-Raf1-MEK1-ERK1/2 cascade, their direct interactions with any of these kinases were never experimentally demonstrated.
To summarize, here we demonstrated for the first time that arrestins directly binds ERK2, determined the conformations of arrestin-2 and -3 preferred by c-Raf1 and ERK2, and showed that MEK1 similarly interacts with arrestins in all conformational states.
The authors are grateful to Dr. Robert J. Lefkowitz (Duke University) for arrestin-2/3 double knockout mouse embryonic fibroblasts and HA-tagged c-Raf1, MEK1, and ERK2 constructs, and Dr. M.G.
Besides, PD98059, a selective inhibitor of MEK that disrupts the activation of downstream ERK, significantly abolished these effects of CCL21/CCR7.
A549 (A) and H460 (B) cells were treated with CCL21 (100 ng/mL) for 24 h after exposure to PD98059, a selective inhibitor of MEK that disrupts activation of downstream ERK, for 1 h. After treatment, apoptosis was estimated using the Annexin V staining.
A549 (A) and H460 (B) cells were treated with CCL21 (100 ng/mL) for 24 h after exposure to PD98059, a selective inhibitor of MEK that disrupts activation of downstream ERK, for 1 h. After treatment, the expression levels of these components were estimated using western blot.
Although PAR2 shares some aspects of its signal transduction with PAR1, such as activation of the MEK-ERK pathway 
Phosphorylation of the downstream Ras pathway molecules Akt, MEK, and ERK was dramatically increased in cells transfected with pT2/HrasG12V compared to cells transfected with pT2/EGFP, confirming the constitutive activation of Ras signaling by HrasG12V (
(A) Activation of Ras signaling by HrasG12V was confirmed by increased phosphorylation of Akt, ERK, and MEK.
For instance, by inhibiting the action of a single molecule such as BRAF (B-Raf proto-oncogene, serine/threonine kinase), the entire RAF/MEK/ERK (Raf-1 proto-oncogene, serine/threonine kinase, mitogen-activated protein kinase kinase 1, mitogen-activated protein kinase 1) pathway will be tuned down, and as a consequence, collateral pathways including PI3K (phosphatidylinositol-4,5-bisphosphate 3-kinase) and RALA (v-ral simian leukemia viral oncogene homolog A (ras related)) will also be affected.
UO126 (a MEK1/2 inhibitor upstream of ERK1/2) and PP2 (SRC inhibitor) reduced the invasion capacity of SW480 and SW48 cells.
Y1068 and Y1173, sites of autophosphorylation coupled to the activation of Ras, MEK and ERK1/2, were evaluated in the following experiments with specific phosphotyrosine mAbs.
Anti-ERK-1/2 (9102), anti-SAPK/JNK (9252), anti-Akt (9272), anti-p38 (9212), anti-Src (32G6), anti-phospho-ERK-1/2 (9101), anti-phospho-SAPK/JNK (9251), anti-phospho-Akt (9271), anti-phospho-p38 (9211), HRP-conjugated anti-rabbit (7074) and specific MEK-1/2 inhibitor U0126 (9903) were from Cell Signaling Technology (distributed by Ozyme, Saint Quentin Yvelines, France).
Regulation of the ERK signaling cascade can occur at multiple levels and can involve Raf dephosphorylation, MEK1,2 phosphorylation, and also MEK1,2 dephosphorylation 
Many reports have demonstrated that the threshold of apoptosis in cancer cells can be controlled by the activities of multiple signal transduction pathways, one of which is Raf-MEK1/2-ERK1/2 pathway 
The results of the present study revealed a novel and important finding which sheds light on the involvement of a signaling cascade in the simultaneous activation of MEK1/2-ERK and dephosphorylation of p38 signaling in human B cells.
The signaling cascade involved in simultaneous activation of MEK1/2-ERK and dephosphorylation of p38 signaling in human B cells.
We therefore assessed cholesterol-mediated changes in activation of the JAK/STAT, MEK/ERK, and p38-MAPK pathways by quantifying the phosphorylated (activated) state of representative signaling proteins from each pathway after cholesterol deposition or depletion.
Selective, cholesterol-dependent sensitivity of the MEK/ERK pathway in response to IL-5 contrasts cholesterol-independent JAK/STAT signaling, and is consistent with the study by Lei et al demonstrating the localization of IL-5Rs to membrane microdomains defines which intracellular signaling proteins are bound to the receptor 
VEGFR tyrosine kinase inhibitor II (VRI), FGFR inhibitor (SU5402), EGFR inhibitor (PD 153035), non-selective eNOS inhibitor (L-NAME), Src inhibitor (PP2), P38 MAP kinase Inhibitor III (P38i), Raf kinase inhibitor IV (Rafi), MEK1/2 inhibitor (MEK1/2i), ERK1/2 inhibitor (ERK1/2i), PI3K inhibitor (LY 294002), HIF-1 inhibitor (HIFi) and three subclasses of Akt inhibitor (Akti) were purchased from Calbiochem (Merck, Germany), and each compound was dissolved in their recommended solvent, as per manufacturers.
Previous studies suggested that PI3K, P38 and Raf/MEK/ERK are crucial downstream signaling targets that are involved in VEGF and FGF-induced angiogenesis 
The inhibition of PI3K/AKT and MEK/ERK pathways induced FOXO transcriptional activity and apoptosis.
Furthermore, resveratrol, which simultaneously inhibits the activation of PI3K/AKT and MEK/ERK pathways (resulting in activation of FOXO), could be an attractive candidate for the management of pancreatic cancer.
Since inhibition of PI3K/AKT and MEK/ERK pathways together induce apoptosis in an additive or synergistic manner, we sought to examine whether these pathways act together to regulate resveratrol-induced apoptosis.
The activations of AKT and MEK/ERK were inhibited by AKT Inh-IV and PD98059, respectively.
Inhibition of PI3K/AKT and MEK/ERK pathways activates FOXO transcription factors.
Since inhibition of PI3K/AKT and MEK/ERK pathways synergistically induces apoptosis in pancreatic cancer cells, we next sought to examine whether inhibition of these two pathways act together to regulate FOXO activity.
Inhibition of PI3K/AKT and MEK/ERK pathways acts together to enhance the activation of FOXO transcriptional activity, and phosphorylation deficient triple mutants of FOXO further enhance resveratrol-induced FOXO activity and apoptosis.
Pharmacological and genetic inhibitions of PI3K/AKT and MEK/ERK pathways can have synergistic effects on the activation of FOXO transcription factors through dephosphorylation and nuclear retention, resulting in regulation of FOXO-target genes.
These scaffolds bring in closer proximity Raf isoforms, which phosphorylate MEK within the scaffold, which in turn phosphorylates and activates ERK1/2 [
A. ERK1/2 regulates MEKK3both positively as well as negatively in wild type condition.
In the MKP3 knockout condition the regulation of MEKK3 by ERK1/2 is only positive; similarly the effect of the ERK1/2 on IKK (B), p38MAPK (C), Akt (D) and CAMKII (E), in wild type and MKP3 knockout condition is shown.
As mentioned above, RAF/MEK/ERK and PI3K/AKT/mTOR pathways have a major role in the pathogenesis of HCC.
Next, to determine which MAPK pathways are involved in intermittent hypoxia-exposed cells-induced osteoclastogenesis, the effects of specific MAPKs inhibitors, U0126 (MEK/ERK inhibitor), SB203580 (p38 MAPK inhibitor), and SP600125 (JNK inhibitor), were evaluated.
ERK1/2 is activated by threonine and tyrosine phosphorylation by the dual specificity kinase MEK, which, in turn, is activated by Raf.
However, pull-down experiments focusing on the small GTPase RAS, RAC, CDC42, and RHO revealed a reduced level of growth and migration signal transduction, such as the lack of stimulation of the mitogen pathway, in the SOD3 over-expressing cells, which was confirmed by MEK1/2 and ERK1/2 Western blotting analysis.
Pro-inflammatory cytokines activate MAPK signalling (p38, JNK and MEK/ERK).
Positive correlated compounds include Hypothemycin, a drug known to target MAPK/ERK kinases (MEKs) 
For example, in the proof-of-concept studies the inhibitors of Raf/MEK/ERK mitogenic kinase cascade and the IKK/NF-kB module reduce influenza virus titer in the lungs of infected mice after local aerosol administration into the trachea 
For this purpose, we chose to test the inhibitors of p38 (SB203580), JNK (JNK Inhibitor II) and ERK1/2 (MEK1/2 Inhibitor III) in cells infected with RVFV MP-12.
To the best of our knowledge, this study represents the first of its kind to show that a) endogenous dopamine release and subsequent D1 receptor activation is prerequisite for long-term potentiation of glutamatergic input onto BLA principal neurons from cortical afferents, b) that endogenous release of dopamine, zinc, and BDNF results in a synergistic activation of D1 and TrkB receptors, which together function to lower the threshold for LTP induction, and that c) convergent activation of the MEK-ERK signaling cascade may play a critical role in lowering the threshold for LTP induction.
To test this proposition we assessed the effect of U0126, a selective inhibitor of the MEK-ERK signalling cascade, upon both glucose- and amino acid-induced ERK activation and insulin secretion. 
Our findings indicate that activation of ERK signalling is important for supporting efficient GSIS/AASIS based on sensitivity to the MEK inhibitor, U0126.
Polyclonal goat anti-apolipoprotein B antibody, monoclonal rat anti-F4/80 (clone CI:A3-1) antibody, polyclonal rabbit antibody to PCNA (proliferating cell nuclear antigen), polyclonal rabbit antibody to phospho-MEK1/2 (MAP2K1/2 pSer217/221), polyclonal rabbit antibody to phospho-ERK1/2 (p44/42 MAPK pThr202) and polyclonal rabbit antibody to phospho-p90RSK1 (RPS6KA1 pThr348) for immunohistochemistry were purchased from Acris Antibodies GmbH (Herford, Germany).
Quantitative results of phosphorylated MEK1/2, ERK1/2, p90RSK, p38 MAPK and SAPK/JNK were normalized for the levels of total MEK1/2, ERK1/2, RSK1/2/3, p38 MAPK and SAPK/JNK.
To explain the effect of MCSF and/or oxLDL on MAPK activation in macrophages from GPx-1 deficient mice, we determined the levels of MEK1/2, ERK1/2, p90RSK, p38 MAPK and SAPK/JNK phosphorylation in MCSF- and/or oxLDL-induced peritoneal macrophages by Western blot analysis.
In accordance with the inhibition experiments, a significant short-term phosphorylation of both MEK1/2 and ERK1/2 was detected as early as five minutes after stimulation with MCSF in GPx-1 deficient macrophages.
Since ERK1/2 are activated by MEK1/2 and p90RSK is an important downstream substrate of ERK1/2, our results corroborate the susceptibility of the p44/42 MAPK (ERK1/2) signaling pathway to oxidative stress caused by GPx-1 deficiency.
Here we report a novel effect of dasatinib on inducing the differentiation of acute myeloid leukemia (AML) cells through MEK/ERK-dependent activation of signal transducer and activator of transcription 1 (STAT1).
We further found that dasatinib-induced activation of STAT1 was regulated by the MEK/ERK kinases.
The phosporylation of MEK and ERK occurred rapidly upon dasatinib treatment and increased progressively as differentiation was induced.
MEK inhibitors PD98059 and U0216 not only inhibited the phosphorylation of STAT1, but also abrogated dasatinib-induced myeloid differentiation, suggesting that MEK/ERK dependent phosphorylation of STAT1 might be indispensable for the differentiating effect of dasatinib in AML cells.
Taken together, our study suggests that STAT1 is an important mediator in dasatinib-induced differentiation of AML cells, whose activation requires the activation of MEK/ERK cascades.
We further found that dasatinib-induced STAT1 activation was MEK/ERK cascade dependent since MEK inhibitors not only inhibited dasatinib-triggered phosphorylation of STAT1, but also abrogated dasatinib-induced differentiation of AML cells.
The membranes were blocked with 5% nonfat dry milk and incubated with the respective primary antibodies: AKT, p-AKT, c-Myc, ERK, JNK, MEK, p38, and GAPDH obtained from Santa Cruz Biotechnology Inc. (Santa Cruz, CA) as well as p21, p27, p-ERK, p-JNK, p-MEK, p-p38, p-STAT1(Y701), p-STAT1(S727), STAT1, p-STAT3(Y705), p-STAT3(S727), STAT3, p-STAT5(Y694) and STAT5 purchased from Cell Signaling Technology (Danvers, MA).
Given that STAT1 is phosphorylated at tyrosine 701 by the Janus kinase (JAK) family members and at serine 727 by MAPK cascades including MEK, ERKs, p38 and JNKs 
*** P<.001 (B) The expression of p-MEK, p-ERK, p-STAT1(Y701) and p-STAT1(S727) as well as their total proteins were analyzed by Western blotting.
The expressions of phosphorylated MEK, ERK, p38, JNK and AKT as well as their total proteins were analyzed by Western blotting.
To determine whether the phosphorylation of MEK/ERK cascade was indispensible for dasatinib-induced AML differentiation, HL60 and NB4 cells were treated with dasatinib in the presence of MEK inhibitor PD98059 and then analyzed for CD11b expression.
(C) and (D) The expression of p-MEK, p-ERK, p-STAT1(Y701) and p-STAT1(S727) as well as their total proteins in HL60 and NB4 cells were analyzed by Western blotting.
Notably, we found that the biological function of dasatinib on inducing AML differentiation was mediated by MEK/ERK dependent activation of STAT1.
SFKs have been reported to activate the Ras/Raf/MEK/ERK pathway via recruitment of Shc and Shp2 proteins 
In summary, the present results demonstrated for the first time that the differentiation-induction effect of dasatinib required the activation of STAT1, which depended on MEK/ERK cascades activation.
To test this hypothesis, we administered U0126, an inhibitor of the ERK-MAPK pathway that blocks the kinase activity of MAP Kinase Kinase (MAPKK or MEK 1/2), 1 hour prior to LPS administration.
First, because U0126 inhibits MEK1 and MEK2 with negligible effects on other protein kinases, such as ERK, p38, and JNK 
Phosphopeptides derived from proteins specific to the PI3K/Akt/mTor and the Raf/MEK/ERK pathways were significantly increased in neuroblastoma cells.
Phosphopeptides derived from downstream mediators of the Raf/MEK/ERK signaling pathway were more abundant in the NB10 cell line (
The major downstream targets of both IGF-1R/IR and Ret are the PI3K/Akt/mTor and Raf/MEK/ERK intracellular signaling pathways [
Specifically, our work suggests that combined inhibition of both the PI3K/Akt/mTor and Raf/MEK/ERK pathways may significantly alter neuroblastoma cell viability.
PTEN levels are higher in this group and relatively increased Ras activity is evidenced by elevated total and phosphorylated MEK and ERK.
After intrathecal administration of the MEK1 inhibitor PD98059 in ION-CCI rats, the number of pERK-IR cells after noxious stimulation and the enhanced thermal nocifensive behavior but not the mechanical nocifensive behavior were significantly reduced in ION-CCI rats.
injection of MEK1 inhibitor in ION-CCI rats, suggesting that ERK phosphorylation in Vc WDR neurons may contribute to thermal but not mechanical hypersensitivity in the face following trigeminal nerve injury.
(C) Phosphorylations of MEK1/2 and ERK1/2 were detected using antibodies of p-MEK1/2 and p-ERK1/2.
We attempted multiple times to express CSTA in keratinocytes using different expression plasmids (His or HA tag) but were unsuccessful possibly due to CSTA being negatively regulated by the Ras/Raf-1/MEK1/ERK pathway [
Using C2C12 and primary myoblasts as a model we have shown that in LD myoblast cultures low S100B engages RAGE thereby simultaneously stimulating proliferation via MEK-ERK/2 and activating the myogenic program via p38 MAPK.
This conclusion is supported by the finding that, as investigated by co-immunoprecipitation assay and in situ PLA, increasing the S100B dose to 100 nM makes S100B capable of recruiting RAGE and bFGF/FGFR1 into a complex in LD in myoblasts at early differentiation stages resulting in stimulation of MEK-ERK1/2 and proliferation and inhibition of p38 MAPK and differentiation.
The phosphatidylinositol 3-kinase (PI3K)/Akt and RAS/RAF/mitogen-activated protein kinase (MEK)/extracellular signal-regulated kinase (ERK) pathways, mediate proliferation and survival in human lung cancer cells and share several downstream molecules, such as FOXO3a 
Extracellular regulated kinase kinase (MEK) acts upstream of ERK1/2 and could phosphorylate and activate ERK1/2 
PKA can inhibit c-Raf activity, an upstream MAP3K to MEK1/2, which activates ERK 
Previous studies demonstrated that PKA inhibits Ras/c-Raf activation of MEK/ERK MAPK signaling 
THP-1 cells activated with a TLR2 agonist activated the MEK/ERK MAPK signaling cascade to induce production of TNF.
In addition, MEKs are upstream enzymes that can phosphorylate downstream MAPKs, including ERK1/2, JNK1/2, and p38MAPK [
Active Raf in turn phosphorylates and activates MEK 1/2 (Mitogen activated Protein Kinase-/Extracellular Signal Regulated Kinase-Kinase) which in turn phosphorylate and activate ERK1/2 (for a recent review see 
Control experiments were performed to ensure that BXB-ER does indeed activate MEK which then results in activation of ERK1/2 in our system just as shown before 
The reversibility of Raf/ERK induced chromatin remodeling was tested in time course experiments with the MEK inhibitor PD098059 
Consistent with the results of MEK5 transfection, siRNA for ERK5 clearly repressed c-Myc expression (
Moreover, BisGMA could induce the phosphorylation of ERK1/2 pathway (MEK1/2, ERK1/2, and Elk), p38 pathway (MEK3/6, p38, and MAPKAPK2), and JNK pathway (MEK4, JNK, and c-Jun) in a dose- and time-dependent manner (p<0.05).
Antibodies for COX-2, non-phosphorylation types of p38, cPLA2, MEK1/2, ERK1/2, Elk, MEK3/6, MAPKAPK2, MEK4, JNK, cJUN, phosphorylation types of cPLA2 (Ser505), MEK1/2 (Ser218/Ser222), ERK1/2 (Tyr204), Elk (Ser383), MEK3/6 (Ser189/Ser207), MAPKAPK2 (Thr222), MEK4 (Ser80), JNK (Thr183/Tyr185), cJUN (Ser63/73), and arachidonyl trifluoromethyl ketone (AACOCF3) were obtained from Santa Cruz Biotechnology (Santa Cruz, CA, USA).
To investigate the expression of COX2, phosphorylation and non-phosphorylation types of cPLA2, cells were treated with BisGMA for 2 h. To evaluate the phosphorylation and non-phosphorlation types of MEK1/2, ERK1/2, Elk, MEK3/6, p38, MAPKAPK2, MEK4, JNK, and cJUN, cells were treated with BisGMA for 15 min.
The membranes were blocked with 5% (w/v) nonfat dried milk for 1 h at room temperature to reduce nonspecific binding, washed with PBS containing 0.1% Tween-20 (PBST), then probed with antibodies including COX-2, phosphorylation and non-phosphorylation of cPLA2, MEK1/2, ERK1/2, Elk, MEK3/6, p38, MAPKAPK2, MEK4, JNK, and cJUN.
Cells were harvested and protein extracts were subjected to SDS-PAGE Western blot analysis using antibodies against the phosphorylated and total MEK1/2, ERK1/2, and Elk.
The compounds selected as hits do not induce osteogenesis via the same signaling pathways, however, most of them are somehow involved in either the Raf-MEK-ERK or the cAMP signaling pathway.
To demonstrate whether the suppression of the MMP-2 expression by kaempferol occurred mainly by inhibiting the ERK1/2 signaling pathway, SCC4 cells were treated with U0126, a MEK inhibitor.
Results showed that TPA treatment significantly promoted the motility of ESCC cells, and MEK/ERK1/2 inhibitor U0126 completely reversed this change (
MAPK cascades, including the MEK-ERK1/2 pathway, are reportedly involved in PTC migration and proliferation.
EGFR is the receptor of EGF, which can activate the MEK-ERK-1/2 pathway.
Previous studies have shown that phosphorylation of ERK-1/2 by MEK was elevated in PTCs from patients with DN and associated with EMT.
As a result, we found that both the MEK/ERK and JNK/c-Jun pathways were activated in all three migrating cell lines.
This calcium effect was found to occur upstream of MEKK2, which is the MAP3K of the ERK5 cascade.
Co-immunoprecipitation revealed that EGF increases MEKK2 binding to the adaptor protein Lad1, and this interaction was reduced by the intracellular calcium modifiers, indicating that a proper calcium concentration is required for the interactions and transmission of EGF signals to ERK5.
In addition, we found that changes in calcium levels affect the EGF-induced nuclear translocation of MEKK2 and thereby its effect on the nuclear ERK5 activity.
Taken together, these findings suggest that calcium is required for EGF-induced ERK5 activation, and this effect is probably mediated by securing proper interaction of MEKK2 with the upstream adaptor protein Lad1.
The extracellular signal-regulated kinase5 (ERK5) signaling cascade is composed of MEKK2/3 at the MAP3K tier 
Anti general ERK5, MEK5, HA, tubulin and GFP antibodies (Abs) were purchased from Sigma Israel (Rehovot, Israel).
MEK5(K/A) was generated by replacing Lys194 to Ala. HA-ERK5 was a gift from Dr. J.S.
Another possible mechanism for inhibition of ERK5 phosphorylation is a direct interference with MEK5-ERK5 interactions.
Next, we undertook to examine whether the inhibition of ERK5 phosphorylation by BAPTA-AM and ionomycin occurs at the level of MEKK2.
Lad1 was identified as an adaptor protein that associates with MEKK2, and thereby regulates the ERK5 activation by EGF 
These results are in a good correlation with the effect of calcium modulation on MEKK2-ERK5 phosphorylation (
We have previously shown that ERK5 and MEK5 are localized to the nuclei of resting, as well as EGF-stimulated cells, whereas MEKK2 is distributed all over resting cells and accumulates in the nucleus upon EGF stimulation 
Our results clearly show that ERK5 phosphorylation by MEK5 is not affected by the calcium changes in vitro (
Taken together, these findings suggest that calcium is required for EGF-induced ERK5 activation by securing the proper interaction of the MEKK2 at the MAP3K level of this cascade with the upstream adaptor protein Lad1.
ERK contains two phosphorylable sites, Thr188 and Tyr190, for MEK kinase.
Since MEK1 is the known dual specificity kinase which phosphorylates the threonine and tyrosine residues in the activation loopes of ERK1 and ERK2 in order to activate them 
MEK1/2 is the only known upstream kinase which can activate ERK1/2 
It is known that treatment of monocytes with LPS induces a strong inflammatory
                    response involving the NF-kB and the MEK-ERK1/2 pathways and leading to the
                    production of pro-inflammatory cytokines such as TNF-alpha 
To confirm the potential involvement of PI3K-Akt and MEK-ERK pathways in the regulation of PDCD4, Specific PI3K inhibitor LY294002, and MEK inhibitor U0126 were introduced to the starved cells together with serum and incubated for 2 h and 4 h after 48 hours' starvation treatment.
The PI3K/AKT and Raf/MEK/ERK are two classical cell signaling pathways and plays a key role in the regulation of cell gene expression, growth survival.
Abnormal PI3K/AKT and Raf/MEK/ERK signaling may lead to increased or uncontrolled cell proliferation, resistance to apoptosis and to chemotherapy, radiotherapy, and targeting therapies in tumors.
The activation of HIF-1 protein could be facilitated by PI3K/AKT and Raf/MEK/ERK signaling.
The PI3K/AKT and Raf/MEK/ERK signaling plays an important role in regulating tumor cell proliferation and survival.
To determine whether the BBR-mediated cell growth inhibition is also through the inactivation of the PI3K/AKT and Raf/MEK/ERK signaling pathway, we analyzed the effect of BBR on the phosphorylation of Akt and ERK in A549 cells by Western blot.
The PI3K/AKT and Raf/MEK/ERK signaling play a key role in the regulation of cell gene expression, growth survival.
The relationship of Raf/MEK/ERK and PI3K/AKT to lung cancer is still an intense research area nowadays [
RKIP is a small evolutionary conserved protein that was first identified as a physiological inhibitor of the Raf-MEK-ERK pathway 
Much of our focus has been on the PI3K/Akt and Raf/MEK/ERK pathways due to known implications in CLL cell survival and resistance to apoptosis.
Retinoylation of CRM1 disrupts MEK1 nuclear egress and bisects the MEK1- ERK signaling cascade.
To further elucidate the role of CYLD in IL-8 levels, we used the specific MEK inhibitor, PD98059, to examine the involvement of the ERK pathway in CYLD-mediated suppression of IL-8.
As indicated, CYLD negatively regulates NTHi-induced IL-8 expression through MEK/ERK signaling pathway by upregulating phosphatase MKP-1.
Antibodies against phospho-ERK1/2 (Thr-202/Tyr-204), total ERK1/2, phospho-MEK1/2 (Ser-217/Ser-221) and total MEK1/2 were purchased from Cell Signaling Technology.
An example of its use is provided for the EGFR-ERBB2 pathway gene variant data and the identification of correlated EGFR, ERBB2, MTOR, BRAF, MEK and ERK inhibitors.
To test that modulation of ERK2 activity inside virus particles produced from cells expressing PAP altered virus infectivity, cells co-expressing PAP and HIV-1 (pNL4-3) were treated with MEK inhibitor (PD98059) 18 hours following transfection.
This same amount of transfected PAP DNA increased phosphorylation levels of MEK and ERK1/2 to a minor extent above those of negative control cells, indicating that even modest modulation of cellular proteins can have substantial effect on stages of the virus life cycle.
293 T cells used to determine MEK and ERK1/2 levels and activity were maintained in the same manner as described above until 24 hours prior to transfection.
Polyclonal antibodies specific for MEK (catalog # 9122), phospho-MEK (catalog # 9154), ERK1/2 (catalog # 9102) and phospho-ERK1/2 (catalog # 4377) were purchased from Cell Signaling.
H-Ras.GTP nanoclusters are the sites to which cytosolic effectors such as Raf are recruited and activated to relay robust signals via the Raf-MEK-ERK pathway 
Primary antibodies, including anti-extracellular signal-regulated kinase (ERK, 9102), anti-phospho (p)-ERK (9101), anti-MAPK kinase (MEK, 9122), anti-p-MEK (91221), anti-stress-activated protein kinase (SAPK)/c-Jun N-terminal kinase (JNK, 9252), anti-p-SAPK/JNK (9251), anti-p38 (9212), anti-p-p38 (9211), anti-Akt (9272), anti-p-Akt (9271), and anti-Bax (2772), were obtained from Cell Signaling Technology (Danvers, MA, USA).
The MEK/ERK inhibitor PD98059 has been shown to partially inhibit craniosynostosis in cultures of calvarial tissues from AS mice carrying the P253R mutation 
The inhibitors LY294002 (PI3K inhibitor) and PD98059 (an inhibitor of MEKI which is directly upstream of ERK 1/2) were added 30 minutes before initiation of the phagocytosis assay.
The MEK-1/ERK inhibitor PD98059 was from Cell Signaling Technology (Beverly, MA), the PI3K inhibitor LY29004 was from Millipore and the AMPK activator AICAR was purchased from Enzo Life Sciences.
A two step series MAPK enzymatic cascade that appears in Ras/MEK/ERK MAPK cascade 
Note that the total concentration of MEK and ERK in the Ras/MEK/ERK has been experimentally measured for several systems (see 
Mutant KRAS constitutively activates MEK/ERK and PI3K/AKT signaling pathways, both of which are pivotal to the survival and proliferation of tumor cells [
In NSCLC, the RAS-RAF-MEK-ERK signaling pathway is frequently hyperactivated [
To test this, we subjected mouse skeletal muscles to mechanical stimulation in the presence or absence of a MEK/ERK inhibitor, and then measured several commonly used markers of mTOR signaling.
It is likely that the location of ERK phosphorylation is controlled by the subcellular localization of its upstream activators such as MEK.
We examined the subcellular location of pMEK, a direct ERK activator, in response to location-specific EGFR activation by both subcellular fractionation (
The spatio-temporal dynamic of pMEK further indicates that PM activation of EGFR leads the phosphorylation of ERK at or near the PM, and EN activation of EGFR results in the phosphorylation of ERK at or near EN in the perinuclear region.
To confirm the increased MEK/ERK activity in MYL-R cells in response to BAY 65-1942, we treated cells with MEK and IKK inhibitors for 24 hours and analyzed cell lysates by immunoblotting.
Since activation of MEK/ERK has been reported to increase IL-6 production 
The IKK and MEK/ERK pathways are both frequently dysregulated in cancer 
Both Raf/MEK/ERK and PI3K/Akt/mTOR pathways are frequently activated in leukemia and other hematopoietic disorders caused by genetic mechanisms, playing an important role in the regulation of cell survival and proliferation 
These results suggest that inhibition of IGF-1R activity may be one mechanism downstream of MEK/ERK inhibition by which selumetinib inhibits AZD8055-induced, rebound AKT phosphorylation.
We inhibited ERK1/2 phosphorylation, using PD98059, a MEK inhibitor.
PDGF stimulates both the Ras/Raf/MEK/ERK and the phosphatidylinositol 3-kinase (PI3K)/Akt mitogenic signaling pathways to induce vascular smooth muscle cell (VSMC) proliferation [
In MA-10 cells, a mitochondrial module includes MEK (Mitogen-activated protein kinase kinase), ERK and cholesterol with a direct physical association between StAR and ERK 
E2 effect on Akt-pS473 downregulation by rapamycin was independent of ERK as shown by sequential mTOR and MEK-inhibition.
First we tested the viability of cells treated with ouabain, or the MEK-ERK inhibitor U0126, or the p38 inhibitor SB202190.
The MAPK/ERK (MEK) complexes are components of the Ras/Raf signaling axis.
The MEK/ERK pathway is another downstream target of Ras, which is involved in regulation of cell survival and proliferation.
However, the role of the MEK/ERK pathway in the pathogenesis of MDS/MPN remains unclear.
Our results clearly demonstrate the proto-oncogenic property of the MEK/ERK pathway in hematopoietic cells, which manifest in MDS/MPN development.
However, the role of Ras in transformation events is unclear because it is located upstream of several pathways, including MEK/ERK, PI3K/Akt, and Ral-GEF 
MEK/ERK are dual serine/threonine specific kinases that are part of the classical mitogen-activated protein kinase pathway (MAP kinase) 
Although activating MEK/ERK mutations have not been identified in any human samples or cancer cell lines, there is evidence suggesting a link between MEK/ERK and malignant transformation 
Therefore, we concluded that the MEK/ERK pathway could play a significant role in neoplastic transformation of hematopoietic cells.
To examine whether activation of the MEK/ERK pathway is sufficient to induce malignant transformation of blood cells, we purified c-Kit
MEK/ERK transformation potential has been demonstrated in various cell line systems; however, direct proof in primary hematopoietic cells was lacking 
MEK/ERK signaling has been implicated in a variety of cellular functions including proliferation, survival, and differentiation.
The results shown in this paper clearly demonstrate that active MEK can function as an oncogene in hematopoietic cells, suggesting that MEK/ERK signaling must be tightly regulated in this cell type.
Taken together, our findings provide new insight into the novel role of the MEK/ERK pathway in leukemogenesis.
It will be interesting to examine the interplay between the MEK/ERK and Notch pathways because both pathways have been shown to be important for differentiation.
The extracellular signal-regulated protein kinases (ERK) 1 and 2 (ERK1/2) signaling pathway is a cascade consisting of at least three families of protein kinases, including Raf (MAPKKK or MEKK), MAPKKs (MEK 1 and MEK 2), and MAPK (ERK 1 and ERK 2 or p42/p44 MAPKs).
To test if pAkt and pERK1/2 could influence the activity of PARP-1, both cell lines were pretreated with specific Akt (Akt inhibitor VIII) or MEK1/2 (UO126) inhibitors, and the corresponding cell lysates were probed with antibody to anti-PAR polymers (
PC12 cells were stimulated with various concentrations of NGF, and then analyzed by QIC with antibodies for phosphorylated MEK and phosphorylated ERK.
(B) The averages of phosphorylated MEK (magenta) and phosphorylated ERK (blue).
(C) The Pearson's correlation coefficient between logarithmically transformed phosphorylated MEK and ERK obtained by the QIC software (black) and the HCS software (gray).
(D) The standard deviations of logarithmically transformed phosphorylated MEK and ERK obtained by the QIC software (blue and magenta, respectively) and obtained by the HCS software (cyan and pink, respectively).
We observed the distributions of NGF-dependent MEK and ERK phosphorylation simultaneously with sampling intervals of 2 minutes, and calculated the averages, correlation coefficients and standard deviations for MEK and ERK phosphorylation for each time point (
In general, phosphorylation level is determined by a balance between specific kinases and phosphatases, and MEK is the only known kinase that directly phosphorylates the activation sites of ERK.
Thus, the initial transient phosphorylation of ERK was dominated by the amount of phosphorylated MEK, resulting in a high correlation coefficient.
In fact, the time series analysis of MEK and ERK phosphorylation in response to NGF in PC12 cells suggested that ERK phosphorylation-dependent ERK phosphatase induction regulates the cell-to-cell variation of the ERK phosphorylation level.
Mouse anti-phospho-ERK1/2 (Thr 202/Tyr 204) monoclonal antibody (mAb), rabbit anti-phospho-MEK1/2 (Ser217/Ser221) polyclonal antibody (pAb), rabbit anti-ERK1/2 pAb, rabbit anti-phospho-MEK1/2 (Ser221) mAb, rabbit anti-phopho-JNK (Thr183/Tyr185) mAb, and rabbit anti-c-Fos mAb were purchased from Cell Signaling Technology (Beverly, MA).
A role for the MAPK/ERK pathway in the berberine-mediated inhibition of glutamate release is suggested in this study, based on the following results: (1) the inhibitory effect of berberine on 4-AP-evoked glutamate release was prevented by the MEK (MAP kinase kinase) inhibitors PD98059 and PD198306; (2) the PKC and PKA inhibitor staurosporine did not have any effect on berberine action, which demonstrated some specificity for berberine action on the MAPK pathway; (3) berberine decreased the 4-AP-induced phosphorylation of ERK1/2 and synapsin I at MAPK-specific sites 4 and 5, this phenomenon was also prevented by the MEK inhibitor PD98059; and (4) the inhibition of glutamate release by berberine was strongly attenuated in mice lacking synapsin I.
It has been reported that in melanoma both the Ras/Raf/MEK/ERK (MAPK) and the PI3K/AKT (AKT) signalling pathways are constitutively activated through multiple mechanisms 
B) Scheme for screening protoberberine derivatives for inhibition of various MKKs (MKK4/MKK7, MKK3/MKK6, and MEK1/MEK2) and MAPKs (JNKs, p38, and ERKs).
A) Phylogenetic tree for human MKK4, MKK7, MKK3, MKK6, MEK1, p38, JNK, and ERK.
In order to further investigate whether the ERK signaling pathway regulates hepatocyte differentiation, cells were treated with an inhibitor of MEK1/2, U0126, at 5 or 10 uM from day 2 to day 10 during hepatocyte differentiation of hESC-derived progenitor cells.
It is known that activated MEK1/2 specifically catalyzes the phosphorylation of ERK1/2, and thus U0126 can block the activation of ERK.
The EGFR axis is considered to act primarily through activation of the MAPK (RAS/RAF/MEK/ERK) pathway.
Autocrine production of IL-6 in epithelial ovarian cancer cell lines is positively associated with activation of MEK/ERK 
Radiation-induced c-Jun phosphorylation is dependent on the canonical MEK-ERK signaling pathway and required for both ERK1 and ERK2 function.
Overall, our study reveals that the MEK-ERK1/2 signaling pathway, but not the JNK pathway, contributes to the c-Jun-dependent microglial inflammatory response following irradiation.
We discovered that the canonical MAPK MEK-ERK1/2 signaling cascade, but not JNK pathway, directly mediated c-Jun N-terminal phosphorylation.
Blockade of MEK-ERK1/2 signaling pathway compromised c-Jun activity, leading to a decreased expression of several proinflammatory genes regulated by c-Jun.
As the last downstream kinases in the Ras-Raf-MEK-ERK1/2 MAP kinase cascade, ERK1 and ERK2 are directly activated by MEK 
Antibodies for c-Jun (sc-45), phosphorylated c-Jun (Ser73, sc-7981), ERK1 (sc-94), phosphorylated ERK1/2 (Thr202/Thr204, sc-81492), phosphorylated MEK (sc-7995R), COX-2 (sc-1745) and HA (sc-7392) were purchased from Santa Cruz Biotechnology (Santa Cruz, CA).
In this study, murine cDNAs of c-Jun, ERK1, ERK2, and MEK1 were cloned into appropriate expression vectors, and the shRNA constructs were designed to target murine mRNA sequences.
It was reported by Freda Miller that astrocytes can promote the dendrite formation of NSCs by secreted NGF through MEK-ERK signaling pathway.
EGFR-MEK-ERK signaling pathway has an established role in promoting malignant growth and disease progression in human cancers.
Therefore identification of transcriptional targets mediating the oncogenic effects of the EGFR-MEK-ERK pathway would be highly relevant.
However, treatment of cancer cells with various signaling pathway inhibitors revealed that CIP2A mRNA expression was sensitive to inhibition of EGFR activity as well as inhibition or activation of MEK-ERK pathway.
Thus, ETS1 is probably mediating high CIP2A expression in human cancers with increased EGFR-MEK1/2-ERK pathway activity.
Epidermal growth factor receptor (EGFR)-mediated MEK1/2-ERK MAPK pathway activity has been shown to regulate virtually all aspects involved in tumourigenesis.
A recent systematic characterization of somatic mutations in 441 human tumors identified growth factor receptor signaling to MEK1/2-ERK pathway to be one of the most significantly altered pathways across human cancers 
GPCRs could activate MEK/ERK and Akt using an intricate signaling network 
Continuous lines identify the major pathway stimulated by INSL3 and culminating in MEK/ERK phosphorylation via AC/cAMP/PKA.
The quantitative evaluation of phosphorylations were performed with commercial ELISA form Cell Signal Technology (Akt1 - BK7170, pAkt1 S473 - BK7160, MEK1 - BK7165, pMEK1 - BK7175, ERK - BK7177, and pERK - BK7050) following manufacturer's instructions.
Ameloblastin expression was previously shown to be induced by NT-4 via ERK1/2 phosphorylation and was inhibited by the MEK inhibitor PD98059 [
Western blotting analyses of phosphorylated and non-phosphorylated PI3K, AKT, MEK1/2, ERK, FAK, SAPK/JNK, paxillin and p130Cas in (a) A549, (b) H3255, and (c) H1975 cell lines after a 24-h treatment with 100, 250 or 500 nM digoxin.
A recent study indicated that Src activation governs a variety of pathways, including survival, angiogenesis, proliferation, migration, and invasion, through a variety of proteins, including PI3K/AKT, STAT3, MEK/ERK and FAK/paxillin/p130CAS [
A growth factor initiates a cell signal by binding to its cell surface receptor, and this is followed by activation of ERK via phosphorylation by ERK kinase (MEK) at threonine and tyrosine residues in the TEY motif (pTpYERK) 
To determine what factors, other than MEK, might induce or maintain the intense and sustained activation of ERK following EGF treatment, we analysed the potential involvement of the B56 family of PP2A heterotrimers.
(B) The kinetics of ERK and MEK activities in Calu1 cells were examined by western blotting.
More specifically, proteins involved in the MEK/ERK pathway, oxidation and auto-immune targets were found to have altered expression in PolyI:C exposed mice, including dual specificity mitogen-activated protein kinase kinase 1 (MEK1), eukaryotic initiation factor (eIF) 4A-II, creatine kinase (CK)-B, L-lactate dehydrogenase (LDH)-B, WD repeat-containing protein and NADH dehydrogenase in the CPu (
Activation of STAT3 trigged by cytokines may be rapidly inhibited by MEK-ERK negative regulation 
Gq-coupled GPCRs signal through phospholipase-C (PLC) and phosphoinositide 3-kinase (PI3K), influencing local protein synthesis through both the Akt/mTOR and MEK/ERK pathways (reviewed in 
This treatment resulted in phosphorylation of MEK and ERK 
Rabbit polyclonal anti-human active Caspase-3, Caspase-9, Bid, ERK, MEK, p-ERK and p-MEK were from Cell Signaling Technology.
Reporter luciferase experiments carried out in pancreatic AR42J cells showed that intracellular cAMP up-regulates MRP4 through an Epac2- and Rap1- mediated mechanism whereas extracellular cAMP reduced MRP4 promoter activity by a MEK/ERK-mediated pathway.
While intracellular cAMP (i-cAMP) induces MRP4 expression through an Epac2/Rap1 mechanism, extracellular cAMP (e-cAMP) inhibits MRP4 promoter activity by a MEK/ERK pathway.
Knowing that MEK/ERK pathway mediates a negative regulation over MRP4 promoter activity, we evaluated ERK involvement in the effects evoked by e-cAMP.
We focused on determining the activation status of key kinases (ERK1/ERK2, ERK2, JNK, MEK1, p38MAPK and p90RSK) of this pathway and downstream effectors like the transcription factors (ATF2, cJUN) and the heath shock protein HSP27 in basal condition and after stimulation with RA.
The results are shown for the phosphorylation levels for the MEK1 (A), ERK1/ERK2 (B), ERK2 (C), p38MAPK (D), cJUN (E), ATF2 (F), JNK (G), HSP27 (H) and p90RSK kinases (I).
Now the activation state of MEK1, ERK1/ERK2 and p38MAPK in basal conditions was significantly reduced in SoS (
Third line of evidence is the trend of lower phosphorylation levels of MEK1, ERK1/ERK2, ERK2 in SoS in basal conditions and for MEK1 after stimulation with RA.
The BRAF-MEK-ERK (MAPK) pathway is a key regulator of melanoma cell invasion.
BRAF mutated melanoma cells were more sensitive to fisetin treatment, and this was associated with a decrease in the phosphorylation of MEK1/2 and ERK1/2.
(C) Increased
                            pERK in Sec10-KD cells is completely blocked by addition of the MEK
                            inhibitor U0126 and the src inhibitor PP2, while the cAMP-activated PKA
                            inhibitor H-89 reduces pERK levels to approximately normal levels.
Immunoblots to visualize the level of AKT and ERK phosphorylation in S2 cells treated with the MEK inhibitor U0126 (Promega) or in control cells.
Pharmacological inhibition of MEK by U0126 was effective, as visualized by anti-P-ERK.
PKR (double-stranded RNA-dependent protein kinase) and MSLN (mesothelin), two additional modifiers that upon inhibition significantly suppress mutant Htt toxicity, have functions related to RRAS/RAF/MEK/ERK signaling (
Decreased HD toxicity resulted from reductions in proteins that are positive effectors of RRAS/RAF/MEK/ERK signaling, suggesting the pathway is pathogenically activated in HD models.
Activated RAF1 phosphorylates MEK1/2, which in turn activate ERK1/2 
In addition to activating RAF1 and other downstream effectors such as MEK and ERK, RRAS is known to affect cell motility, and its activity is inhibited by semaphorin-plexin signaling 
Results with Additional Isoforms and Components of R-Ras/RAF/MEK/ERK Pathway.
Effects of siRNA knock-down of select R-Ras/RAF/MEK/ERK pathway components on caspase activation in ST
CDK4 phosphorylation is a central node integrating oncogenic signaling cascades, as its abrogation requires combined inhibition of the Ras/MEK/ERK and mTOR pathways 
Previously, heterozygous mutations affecting RAF/MEK/ERK kinase cascade components 
The results presented here further support our previous conclusion that excess neuronal Jeb/dAlk/Ras/MEK/ERK signaling is the root cause of the cAMP/PKA sensitive 
Interestingly, inhibition of cAMP synthesis by the knockout of the type 5 adenylyl cyclase (AC5) gene induced Raf/MEK/ERK-dependent stress resistance and lengthened life span in mice 
Because the molecular consequences of SHP2 depletion or ERK1/2 inactivation in chondrocytes are incompletely understood, we investigated the transcriptional response to either SHP2 depletion or MEK1/2 inhibition in chondrocyte pellet cultures by performing massively parallel mRNA sequencing (RNA-seq).
This suggests that MEK/ERK-dependent, YBX1-regulated target genes are involved in executing malignant properties.
By pathway interference using signaling kinase inhibitors, we identified subsets of target genes (signal-regulated transcriptional modules) responding to two of the major effector pathways downstream of RAS, the BRAF/MEK/ERK(MAPK) pathway and the phosphatidylinositol-3 kinase (PI3K) pathway as well as subsets of target genes not responding to either pathway 
To identify transcription factors downstream of the MEK/ERK pathway, we chose colorectal cancer cell lines as a model rather than generic cell lines transfected with 
Outline of the experimental design for exploring the effects of individual elements of the RTK/RAS/MEK/ERK signaling pathway on the global transcription pattern in colon carcinoma cells.
To assess the inhibitor effects on the signaling network, we determined the phosphorylation status of c-RAF, MEK1/2 and ERK 1/2.
The MEK inhibitor U0126 completely abolished the phosphorylation of ERK1/2 in all cell lines (
To elucidate the potential mechanisms underlying the coordinated expression of MEK/ERK pathway-regulated genes in colorectal cancer cells, we screened the predicted promoter regions (1,000 nucleotide sequences upstream of the transcriptional start site of each gene) of all 7,047 informative genes for 559 known transcription factor binding sites assembled in TRANSFAC.
We compared the number of predicted binding sites in the promoters of 776 MEK/ERK-dependent genes with their overall abundance in the entire promoter set.
To assess the global role of YBX1 as a transcriptional regulator of MEK/ERK-dependent target genes, we prepared YBX1:chromatin immune complexes from HCT116 cells and interrogated genome-wide promoter tiling arrays (NimbleGen Homo sapiens HG17 promoter microarray) using the precipitated DNA fragments as target.
After identifying target genes of MEK/ERK signaling and assessing the role of YBX1 in colorectal cancer cell lines, we analyzed the clinical relevance in colorectal carcinomas.
(A) Venn diagram showing the overlap between genes differentially expressed in primary colorectal tumors and MEK/ERK pathway-dependent, proliferation-associated target genes identified in colorectal cancer cell lines treated with the MEK inhibitor U0126.
The RTK/RAS/MEK/ERK pathway transduces mitogenic stimuli and transformed phenotypes through profound alterations of the transcriptional program.
These inhibitors interfere with RAS signaling, however, are not sufficient to block MEK/ERK during a period of 48 hrs.
In summary, we have combined signaling interference, transcriptomic profiling and computational analysis of cis-regulatory elements of target genes to identify YBX1 as a transcriptional regulator downstream of the mitogen-activated protein kinase (MEK/ERK) pathway.
(A) Western blot analysis of c-RAF phosphorylated at Ser256 (P-c-RAF), total c-RAF, P-MEK1/2 and P-ERK levels in colon carcinoma cells treated with the indicated inhibitors for 48 h. DMSO, solvent-only control.
Heterogeneous effects of inhibitors other than the MEK-inihibitor U0126: PD098059 showed a partial reduction of phosphorylated ERK1/2 after 48 h and the other inhibitors had no effect.
Correlation of MEK/ERK-dependent target gene and YBX1 expression in colorectal cancer.
The procedure for identifying transcription factor binding sites in the regulatory sequences of MEK/ERK pathway-regulated genes is described in Materials and 
Various studies have shown that RTK signaling can promote proliferation through MEK/ERK pathway 
(A) Baseline MAPK activity as measured by phosphorylation of ERK1/2 is dose-dependently inhibited by UO126 in 2 h. (B) Paxillin phosphorylation on serine 83 is slightly increased by addition of FBS but greatly reduced by inhibition of MEK1/2 function.
In metazoans, the protein Ras, Raf and MEK act sequentially to activate ERK [
Proteins were analyzed by SDS-PAGE, transferred to nitrocellulose membranes and probed with the following antibodies: AXL [4566], ARAF [4432], MEK1 [9124], CDK4 [2906], MCM2 [3619], PKMYT1 [4282], PLK1 [4513], SMAD4 [9515], FOXP1 [2005], RBBP4 [4633], AKT [9272], pAKT ser-473 [4051], ERK [4370], pERK [9107] from Cell Signaling; MET [sc-161], MCM5 [sc-165995], E2F1 [sc-251], E2F3 [sc-879], CHEK1 [sc-8408] from Santa Cruz; ACSM3 [SAB1400253], MAD2L2 [SAB1400387], AGBL5 [AV53752], CCNG2 [AV03032], PSMD5 [WH0005711M1] from Sigma; MCM4 [06-1296] from Millipore; and PI3KR [610045], BD Biosciences.
Activated PDGF receptors induce activation of MEK1/2-ERK1/2 (mitogen-activated protein kinase (MAPK)-extracellular signal regulated kinase (ERK)) pathways.
In the Ras/Raf/Mek/ERK (MAPK) cascade, Ras, Raf and, partially, MEK activation is localized to the plasma membrane, whereas MEK and ERK deactivation by phosphatases occurs in the cytoplasm.
In the model, standard total concentrations of Raf, MEK, and ERK are similar to estimates for neurons (
By time-resolved quantitative immunoblotting and by protein array we analyzed the phosphorylation of Akt, MEK1/2, ERK1/2 and p90RSK (
B) Total cellular lysate was used to detect phosphorylation of MEK1/2, ERK1/2 and Akt on serine 473 and total actin used as normalizer.
Quantification of the corresponding immunoblots is shown for pAkt, pMEK, pERK.
Total cellular lysate was used to detect MEK1/2 phosphorylation, total ERK, total MEK1/2 and total actin used as normalizer.
Units: ng/ml Met_ihn: Met inhibitor Mek_inh: MEK inhibitor Pdk_inh: PDK1 inhibitor ERK siRNA: siRNA targeting ERK1/2 Rasnew_au: active Ras measured by protein array.
Units: ng/ml Met_ihn: Met inhibitor Mek_inh: MEK inhibitor Pdk_inh: PDK1 inhibitor ERK siRNA: siRNA targeting ERK1/2 aRas_au: active Ras measured by immunoblot.
Units: ng/ml Met_ihn: Met inhibitor Mek_inh: MEK inhibitor Pdk_inh: PDK1 inhibitor ERK siRNA: siRNA targeting ERK1/2 pERK_au: sum of ERK1 and ERK2 phosphorylation measured by mass spectrometry.
Units: ng/ml Met_ihn: Met inhibitor Mek_inh: MEK inhibitor Pdk_inh: PDK1 inhibitor ERK siRNA: siRNA targeting ERK1/2 pAkt_rel_obs: Akt phosphorylation on serine 473 measured by mass spectrometry.
In the RAF/MEK/ERK pathway, the average network captures many of the known interactions that link the MAPK activity to Cyclin D1 levels and Rb phosphorylation 
Free EGF and Raf-, MEK-, and ERK-based species were treated as population species in the hybrid variant.
Each subfigure depicts the MFs and logic rules for the FL gates: (A) ERK,
                            (B) MK2, (C) JNK, (D) IKK, (E) MEK, (F) IRS(Y), (G) ProC3, (H) FKHR, (I)
                            Akt, (J) IRS(S), and (K) Casp8.
For example, the FL model suggested that MK2 and MEK are
                co-regulators of ERK.
A MAP kinase cascade consisting or RAF, MEK, and ERK is contained in the Hornberg EGFR pathway model.
The four reversible bimolecular reactions representing the phosphorylation of ERK by doubly phosphorylated MEK (MEKpp) and the de-phosphorylation by a phosphatase were used as the basis of a new model.
MEKpp is the system input; doubly phosphorylated ERK (ERKpp) is the output.
The signal is then transduced through a series of adaptor proteins SHC, GRB2, and SOS, which in turn activates the MAPK cascade RAF, MEK and ERK.
As a result, prolonged stimulation depletes these proteins and prevents the activation of RAF, MEK, and ERK.
MKK4 and MKK7 are the physiological (cognate) activators of JNK1-3, whereas the MAPK kinases MEK1/2 and MKK3/6 activate the ERK1/2 and p38 MAP kinases, respectively, and do not phosphorylate JNK1-3.
After RAS activation, ERK cascade can be recruited and activated on plasma membrane with the help of KRS1 scaffold protein (upper part of the figure); activated ERK is then released (in complex with MEK and KSR1) into the cytoplasm, where it can activate some of its cytoplasmic targets (e.g.
We first analysed the negative cross-talks from p38/JNK cascades towards ERK cascade, which involve MEK inhibition by AP1 and the phosphatase PPP2CA 
The subgraphs in the melanoma mutation network revealed featured pathways such as the Raf/MEK/ERK pathway and receptor signaling pathways (e.g., EGF/EGFR, FGF, PDGFR-beta signaling pathways).
This phosphorylation can lead to PI3K/Akt pathway activation through interactions with Gab-1 or IRS1 or Ras/MEK/ERK pathway activation through Grb2 or Gab1 
For example, in the P38 MAPK pathway, the cascade is composed of MAP or ERK kinase kinase 4 (MEKK4) and TGF-beta activated kinase 1 (TAK1) (a MAPK kinase kinase or MAPKKK), MKK3 and MKK6 (a MAP kinase kinase or MAPKK), and p38 MAPK 
Activated MEK1/2 is known to phosphorylate ERK1/2 in the TEY motif 
In normal human and mouse renal epithelial cells, cAMP has been shown to inhibit the Ras/Raf-1/MEK/ERK pathway at the level of Raf-1 and to inhibit cell proliferation.
When activated, these serine/threonine kinases activate MEK1 and MEK2 which phosphorylate ERK1 and ERK2.
The biological mechanism begins to become apparent, as it was observed that RANKL expression increased significantly in the distal periodontal ligament in the first week following unloading, and the OPN-induced involvement of the PI3K and MEK/ERK pathway was demonstrated in osteoclast activation following unloading-induced drifting of teeth [
It consists of the Raf protein (MAP3K) that phosphorylates MEK (MAP2K), which in turn phosphorylates ERK (MAPK), the latter influencing transcription of different target genes.
The mitogen-activated protein kinase kinase (MEK, also known as MAP2K) is downstream of BRAF in the RAS-RAF-MEK signaling cascade of the EGFR and uses extracellular signal-regulated kinase (ERK) as a substrate (see 
Mitogen-activated protein kinase kinase 2 (MAP2K2, also known as MEK2), along with MAP2K1 (MEK1) is the upstream kinase of ERK.
Post-translational regulation of BIM after gefitinib treatment involved rapid dephosphorylation and was a result of ERK1/2 inhibition, downstream of MEK shutdown.
The inhibitors used in this study were all purchased from Calbiochem (Darmstadt, Germany): GM6001 (MMPs), LY294002 (PI3K), UO126 (MEK [mitogen-activated protein kinase kinase]), 4-amino-5-(4-chlorophenyl)-7-(dimethylethyl)pyrazolo[3,4-d]pyrimidine (PP2) (src), SB203580 (4-(4-Fluorophenyl)-2-(4-methylsulfinylphenyl)-5-(4-pyridyl)1H-imidazole) and 2-(4-Chlorophenyl)-4-(4-fluorophenyl)-5-pyridin-4-yl-1,2-dihydropyrazol-3-one (p38), FR180204 (ERK1/2), Staurosporine (PKA/protein kinase C [PKC]), KT5720 (PKA), and Bisindolylmaleimide I (PKC).
KSR2 is a scaffold protein in the Raf/MEK/ERK signaling cascade, where it functions along with its paralog, KSR1, to coordinate the interaction of these molecules to facilitate signal transduction and regulate the intensity and duration of ERK signaling (Dougherty et al. 
The reduction in p38 phosphorylation observed upon treatment with the MEK inhibitor U0126 prompted us to study the effects of sts on ERK activation.
The MEK inhibitor U0126 inhibited p38 phosphorylation, suggesting that the ERK pathway works upstream of the p38 pathway.
Fgf4/MEK/ERK has been identified as the major signalling cascade that initiates ESC differentiation.
Genetic deletion of the secreted ligand Fgf4 or the MEK target ERK2 mimics MEK inhibition and impedes ESC differentiation along multiple lineages [
In the presence of active MEK/ERK and GSK3, the naive pluripotency factors are subject to coordinated attack at different levels: transcriptional repression, mRNA stability and translation, nuclear/cytoplasmic localization.
The fact that these actors are revealed upon 2i withdrawal but are mostly present in the naive state suggests that ESCs cultured in LIF/serum are likely to be continuously challenged owing to active MEK/ERK and GSK3 signalling induced by undefined serum components in addition to autocrine Fgf4.
Elucidation of regulatory mechanisms that redeploy Oct4 during the transition confirms that the central element of pluripotency drives developmental progression, and hence reliable capture of the naive state requires LIF reinforced by MEK/ERK and GSK3 inhibition [
Numerous soluble growth factors expressed at the fetal-maternal interface signal through receptor tyrosine kinases (RTK) and G-protein-coupled receptors (GPCR) to provoke activation of MEK/ERK, PI3K/AKT/mTOR and Rho/ROCK signaling.
To determine if ERK5 directly phosphorylates Neurog1, active ERK5 was immunoprecipitated using an anti-Flag antibody from HEK293 cells transfected with HA-tagged caMEK5 and Flag-tagged wtERK5.
This specific defect is linked to the activation of the MEK/ERK pathway.
Here we show that DC differentiated from monocytes of patients chronically infected by HCV present an altered TLR4-induced maturation resulting in a deficient Th1 function that can be restored by inhibition of the MEK-ERK signaling pathway.
The RAS/MEK/ERK pathway is involved in the regulation of differentiation in many cell types.
The importance of the Ras/Raf/MEK/ERK pathway in growth control is further supported by the fact that hyperactivation of this pathway is usually found associated with many human tumors such as gliomas.
We show that BRAF induces MITF transcription through the MEK/ERK cascade and the transcription factor BRN2.
One possibility is that in MMTV induced mammary tumors, the truncated Int-6 protein may act as an oncogene by altering MEK-ERK signaling.
To corroborate the functional alteration of the novel MEK1 p.D67N mutant identified in ES-2, transient transfection of HEK 293T cells with subsequent Western blot analysis demonstrated increased kinase activity as measured by ERK phosphorylation (
To corroborate this information, MEK1 p.D67N was transiently transfected into HEK 293T cells, and ERK phosphorylation was measured by Western blot analysis.
The MEK1 p.D67N mutant is activating as demonstrated by increased ERK phosphorylation as compared to empty vector and wildtype MEK1, two controls which do not activate ERK.
However, the level of ERK phosphorylation for p.D67N is less than the positive control CFC MEK1 p.Y130C mutant 
Expression levels of myc-MEK, total ERK and phosphorylated ERK were analyzed by Western blot.
(A) p-MEK1/2 and p-ERK1/2 were immunoprecipitated from mitochondrial or cytosolic extracts of H
To investigate whether modulation of MEK-ERK interaction in mitochondria affects shuttle to nuclei, cells were transfected with ERK2 and its mutants H230R or Y261N, both with restricted docking to MEK1/2 
4-vinylpyridine treatment resulted in a markedly reduced ERK-MEK interaction (
In order to assess the role of oxidizable cysteines on ERK activation and redistribution, ERK2 mutants C38A, C214A, and C214E were transfected onto LP07 cells to search for their interaction with MEK1/2.
Proteins separated by SDS-PAGE, were transferred onto PVDF membranes and immunoblotted with antibodies anti total and phosphorylated ERK1/2, p38, JNK1/2, MEK1/2, MKK3, MKK4 (Cell Signaling), cyclin D1 (Santa Cruz), complex I and IV (Molecular Probes) or Flag (Sigma), and then incubated with secondary antibodies conjugated with horseradish peroxidase (GE Health Care).
Moreover, intraperitoneal injection (100 ml/kg) of the specific inhibitor of the ERK kinase MEK1/2 (SL327, Tocris Bioscience, UK) before light exposure completely abolished pERK immunolabelling (
The corresponding protein molecules involved in those reactions include active Ras and Raf (RasGTP and Raf*), MEK, and ERK.
These are main reactions involved in phospho-/dephosphorylation of MEK and ERK by either kinases or phosphatases.
This is mediated by phosphorylation at Thr286 through the activity of the Ras/Raf/MEK/ERK cascade and the F-box protein FBXW8, which is an E3 ligase.
This study has shown that the Ras/Raf/MEK/ERK MAPK signaling cascade promotes cyclin D1 phosphorylation at Thr286, resulting in ubiquitination and degradation of cyclin D1 (
For example, U0126, a known inhibitor for MEK1/2 (which activates ERK1/2) significantly blocked 
Why is this approach preferable to direct blocking of ERK activity by MEK inhibitors, or to blocking of integrin activation by antagonists?
We pose that inhibiting ERK by disrupting uPAR/integrin interaction should be less toxic than direct blocking of ERK activity through MEK inhibitors or inactivation of integrins, both of which would have more broader targets.
The RAF kinases, members of the three-component MAP Kinase cascade, once activated by GTP-bound RAS, phosphorylate and activate dual-specificity kinases MEK1 and MEK2, which in-turn activate MAP Kinases ERK1 and ERK2.
Given the observed requirement for decrease in both pERK and pAKT downstream of mutant NRAS and the intense efforts to develop inhibitors targeting BRAF, MEK1/2 and PI3K in progress, we sought to understand if combined knock-down of RAF or MEK with PI3K would be an effective strategy for treatment of NRAS mutant melanomas.
However, inhibition of MEK1+2 alone in the NRAS mutant line was not equivalent to inhibiting BRAF and CRAF together, as assessed by pERK and pAKT, suggesting the presence of differential signaling and feedback effects that arise from perturbing different nodes along the RAS/RAF signaling cascade.
The implication of MAPK-ERK1/2 in the mediation of KGF-induced cell proliferation was determined by inactivation of this pathway, using the pharmacological inhibitor or antisense morpholino-oligonucleotides against MEK1.
Both in vitro and in vivo, its effect on cell proliferation was mediated through the activation of ERK1/2 as evidenced by the abolition of duct cell proliferation in the context of MEK/ERK inactivation.
We further explored the molecular mechanisms involved in these processes and showed that the effects of KGF on duct cell proliferation are mediated by the MEK-ERK1/2 pathway, while the KGF-induced cell differentiation is mediated by the PI3K/AKT pathway.
It induces proliferation of the pancreatic ductal cells via the activation of the MEK-ERK1/2 pathway and it triggers duct-to-beta cell differentiation directly by the induction of PDX1 expression in the neonatal ducts via the activation of PI3K/AKT pathway.
ERK1/2 pathway was inactivated by the inhibition of its specific upstream activator MEK1.
Western blot analysis was performed to study phospho- and total-ERK1/2, MEK1, cyclin D1 and cyclin D2 protein expression.
Our results from experiments with pharmacological MEK1 inhibitor clearly designate MEK1-ERK1/2 pathway as the main pathway involved in the transduction of KGF biological actions on cell proliferation.
Downregulation of MEK1 by specific antisense oligonucleotides blunted ERK1/2 phosphorylation (
We showed that the inhibition of MEK1/ERK pathway dramatically reduced the proliferation of ductal cells induced by KGF in 2-day-old STZ rats as compared to STZ/Std group.
In melanoma, the RAS/RAF/MEK/ERK signalling pathway is an area of great interest, because it regulates tumor cell proliferation and survival.
In the majority of melanomas, the RAS/RAF/MEK/ERK signalling pathway is constitutively activated either due to oncogenic mutations in B-RAF and N-RAS genes or through autocrine growth factor stimulation 
Until recently, it has been anticipated that B-RAF and N-RAS mutations result in an activation of the RAS/RAF/MEK/ERK signalling pathway, thus in a comparable cellular phenotype which would similarly influence the clinical outcome of melanoma patients.
PKA activity leads to the phosphorylation of a constitutive mitochondrial MEK1/2 pool with a lower effect in cytosolic MEKs, while EGF allows predominant cytosolic MEK activation and nuclear pERK1/2 localization.
The increase of mitochondrial pERK1/2 and pMEK1/2 due to cAMP action was abolished by treatment of the cells with the PKA inhibitor H89 (
Specific antibodies that recognize StAR protein, the catalytic subunit of PKA, pMEK1/2, pERK1/2 and total ERK1/2 were used.
In this study we have demonstrated that a) steroidogenesis in MA-10 Leydig cells depends on the specific temporal pattern of ERK1/2 activation in mitochondria; b) ERK1/2 phosphorylation is driven by mitochondrial PKA and constitutive MEK1/2 in the organelles; c) active ERK1/2 interacts with StAR and leads to its phosphorylation at Ser
It was confirmed here that pERK1/2 in mitochondria have a functional interaction with StAR, MEK1/2 and PKA, thus forming a mitochondrial multi-complex.
A-RAF induced ERK activation is required for this step by activating ARF6, as A-RAF depletion or inhibition of the A-RAF controlled MEK-ERK cascade blocks recycling.
Oncogenic RAS through RAF/MEK/ERK and PI3K-AKT have been implicated in controlling VEGF expression 
As 50% of human NSCLC carry mutations in genes that encode activators of the mitogenic cascade (RAS-RAF-MEK-ERK) 
The ERK1/2 system is constituted by a core component represented by the Raf-MEK and ERK1/2 kinases whose activation is controlled by the Ras class of small GTPases.
A) In vitro assay testing the capacity of the indicated ERK to be activated by MEK and to phosphorylate the downstream target MBP.
Indeed, it has been proposed that ERK1 functions as a partial agonist of ERK2 for MEK binding, thus partially attenuating ERK2 phosphorylation and its stimulus-dependent activation 
Since the upstream kinase of ERK, MEK, is mainly localised in the cytoplasm, the maintenance of a functional level of activated ERK in the nucleus depends on the inflow of phosphorylated ERK.
We speculated that the different efficacies of ERK1 and 2 might be due to the differences of their nuclear trafficking that result in a longer permanence and inactivation of ERK1 in the nucleus, as exemplified by the slow loss of nuclear accumulation following MEK blockage (
To evaluate the performance of the EKF for parameter estimation, we apply the EKF to a simulation dataset and two real datasets: JAK-STAT signal transduction pathway and Ras/Raf/MEK/ERK signaling transduction pathways datasets.
To evaluate its performance, the EKF will be applied to the real JAK-STAT and Ras/Raf/MEK/ERK signaling transduction pathway data.
The Ras/Raf/MEK(mitogen-activated protein kinase)/ERK (extracellular-signal-regulated kinase) pathway is a mitogen-activated protein kinase (MAPK) pathway, which is involved in proliferation, differentiation, survival and apoptosis processes 
Double phosphorylated MEK activates ERK and forms MEK-PP/ERK complex;
Dissociation of the complex MEK-PP/ERK and ERK phosphorylation;
To evaluate its performance for estimation of parameters in nonlinear state-space model of biochemical networks, the EKF was applied to simulation data, the real experimental data of the JAK-STAT pathway and Ras/Raf/MEK/ERK pathway.
The observed and predicted concentrations of Raf-1* in the Ras/Raf/MEK/ERK Pathway.
The observed and predicted concentrations of RKIP in the Ras/Raf/MEK/ERK Pathway.
(A) Effects of PI3K or MEK inhibition on phosphorylated Akt (Ser-473) and phosphorylated ERK1/2 expression in the presence or absence of H
We suppose that the status of rCMECs apoptosis is determined by the balance between the PI3K/Akt and PI3K/MEK/ERK pathways.
Since our experimental data revealed the presence of positive feedback by ERK on upstream pathways, it was estimated that the cross-talk/feedback pathway structure of the Raf-MEK-ERK cascade might affect ERK activation dynamics in our cell system.
Our experimental data showed that the inhibiting kinase activity of MEK (MAP kinase kinase) on ERK lowered the MEK response with EGF, indicating that there might exist positive feedback by ERK somewhere within upstream pathways.
We first experimentally investigated the presence of feedback regulation by ERK on upstream signal transduction pathways using the MEK inhibitor.
The MEK-mediated activation of ERK through phosphorylation of ERK threonine/tyrosine residues has been well established.
The inhibition of kinase activity of MEK on ERK and subsequent measurement of MEK phosphorylation represents one approach that could be used to evaluate the effect of ERK-mediated feedback on the upstream pathways.
U0126 is a selective inhibitor of MEK and can therefore be used to block the phosphorylation of ERK by MEK 
The inputs of the Raf-MEK-ERK cascade are the activated forms of Ras and Rap1, Ras-GTP and Rap1-GTP.
Since the Raf-MEK-ERK cascade is considered a core component of the signaling network, and Raf isoforms are key downstream targets of ErbB receptors 
Antibodies for detecting phospho-p44/42 ERK, ERK phospho-MEK and MEK were purchased from Cell Signaling Technology, Inc. (Beverly, MA).
The effect of MEK inhibitor U0126 on ERK phosphorylation in E1 and E1/4 cells.
Interestingly, inhibitors of mitogen-activated protein kinase kinases 1 and 2 (MEK1/2) and extracellular signal-regulated kinase ERK also blocked the BDNF-mediated induction of all tested BDNF-responsive genes.
These results show that the MEK/ERK pathway is a major mediator of neuronal plasticity and other important BDNF-dependent striatal functions that are fulfilled through the positive regulation of gene expression.
These results indicate gene-specific roles for PI3K, NOS, and CAMK in the modulation of striatal BDNF responses in concert with necessary activation of MEK and ERK.
Although the MEK inhibitors used for our study could potentially inhibit ERK5, the final conclusion that a MEK/ERK signaling pathway underlies BDNF's effects remains unchanged.
Moreover, the specific implication of MEK1/2 and ERK1/2 are further supported by the observation of the same effects using a selective ERK1/2 inhibitor.
These analyses indicate that MEK and ERK serve as gatekeepers for BDNF-induced gene expression in striatal cells.
Moreover, the evidence for a heavy reliance of BDNF-mediated gene expression responses on MEK/ERK and TRPC discloses important new aspects of the mechanisms underlying BDNF-associated neuronal plasticity.
Antibodies used for immunoblotting were rabbit anti-ERK (Sigma), mouse anti-dpERK (Sigma), rabbit anti-MEK (Cell Signaling), rabbit anti-pMEK (Cell Signaling), mouse anti-FLAG (Sigma), rabbit anti-SUMO 
Tissue culture studies with antisense molecules and knockout mice show cardiomyocyte injury with impaired MEK1/2-ERK1/2 kinase activities 
To confirm the involvement of ERK in the mechanism of alcohol inhibition of neuronal differentiation, we treated NSCs with U0126, a mitogen-activated ERK kinase (MEK) inhibitor.
MEK locates upstream of ERK in the MAP kinase cascade and its suppression by U0126 decreases ERK expression.
We further investigated upstream signaling that might mediate the induction of COX-2 and iNOS in RAW264.7 macrophages and found that MWCNTs increased the expression of COX-2 via an ERK1,2-dependent mechanism as demonstrated by blocking ERK activation with the MEK inhibitor U0126.
Immunohistochemical staining was used to quantify the expression of the EGFR, phosphorylated Tyrosine residues, MEK and ERK in the bronchial epithelium of archived biopsies from 15 healthy subjects following exposure to DE (PM
In addition, we investigated whether EGFR activation by diesel exposure could be mediated by Src activation and phosphorylation of Src Tyr 416 and leading to transactivation of EGFR at Tyr 845 and whether activation of EGFR would increase the downstream MEK-ERK pathway signalling, linked to proliferation and differentiation.
The expression of other EGFR tyrosine residues such as Tyr 845, Tyr 992, Tyr 1068 and Tyr 1110 and Src related tyrosine (Tyr416) and the ERK pathway (MEK and ERK) were not significantly altered after diesel exposure (Table 
We could not identify any effect on the MEK and ERK pathways, suggesting that at this 6 hour post exposure time point there was no proliferative/differentiating signalling in the bronchial epithelium.
Preclinical and clinical data indicate that mTORC1 inhibition (for example, with everolimus) derepresses negative feedback that results in the upregulation of growth factor receptor, PI3K/AKT, and MEK/ERK signaling.
Our results also indicate involvement of enhanced intracellular reactive oxygen species levels, down regulation of p38 and upregulation of ERK/MEK activation in autophagy-induction due to loss of caspase-2.
Inhibition of MEK/ERK with U0126 totally blocked the phosphorylation of STAT3 (Tyr705 and Ser727) but increased the phosphorylation of CREB/ATF1 (
To confirm such a role for the MEK/ERK pathway during B19V infection, we generated lentiviruses expressing shRNAs validated to specifically knock down the upstream regulators MEK1 and MEK2.
Since we observed that regulation of both STAT5A and MEK/ERK pathways did not affect each other in facilitating B19V infection (
The MEK/ERK pathway is critical to Epo stimulation-dependent erythroid cell proliferation and survival, which is mediated by the Grb2-Ras-Raf1 pathway 
The MEK/ERK pathway has been shown to be upregulated during infection by various viruses, and in the context of certain RNA and DNA viruses has been implicated as a positive regulator of both virus entry and intracellular trafficking during infection 
De novo infection with the gammaherpesvirus Rhesus monkey rhadinovirus (RRV), a close homolog of the human oncogenic pathogen, Kaposi's sarcoma-associated herpesvirus (KSHV), led to persistent activation of the MEK/ERK pathway and increasing nuclear accumulation of pERK2 complexed with the RRV protein, ORF45 (R45) and cellular RSK.
Our previous studies demonstrated that de novo RRV infection of rhesus fibroblasts (RhF) resulted in the activation of the MEK/ERK pathway and that this activation was necessary for early lytic gene expression and, thus, virus production 
If pRSK played a non-essential role in maintenance of pERK levels during RRV infection, we also predicted that the pERK half-life following the addition of the MEK inhibitor U0126, as we had measured previously (
Though our data are consistent with the KSHV-based model and suggest that R45 forms complexes that protect pERK2 from dephosphorylation, we also reasoned that since activation of the MEK/ERK pathway is essential during lytic RRV infection, other viral and cellular factors might also contribute to this process.
Similarly, RRV infection could, in addition, greatly stimulate MEK activity leading to the marked increases in pERK accumulation.
However, we found that pMEK levels increased only minimally (<1.4 fold) in RRV infected cells compared to uninfected controls and, thus, might contribute to but are unlikely to be the major driving force the elevations in pERK (
Finally, we show that abrogation of ERK-MAPK signalling using a dominant negative form of MEK1, the upstream kinase of ERK1/2, diminishes MSK activation and blocks CREB and histone H3 phosphorylation at the MIEP resulting in a substantial defect in IE gene expression.
Therefore, we infected differentiating monocytes 4 days post differentiation with adenoviruses expressing GFP or a dominant negative form of ERK kinase MEK1 (
Inhibition of MEK/ERK was achieved using U0126 (or inactive analogue U0124; both 5 uM), tpl2 (tpl2 kinase Inhibitor II; 1 uM), Raf (Raf Kinase Inhibitor IV; 500 nM), RSK (BI-D1870; 500 nM; Selleckchem, Houston, TX) and MSK (H-89; 10 uM; Sigma Aldrich, Poole, UK) inhibitors (all from Calbiochem, San Diego, CA unless otherwise stated).
Finally, to demonstrate that enhancement of Elk1 activation by hPIV3-C is completely dependent on ERK1/2 activation, HEK-293T cells were pre-treated with MEK1/2 inhibitor U0126 before stimulation with EGF.
This molecule targets MEK1/2 and totally abrogates downstream phosphorylation and activation of ERK1/2 
The EGFR kinase inhibitor AG1478, the MEK1/2 inhibitor U0126 and monoclonal antibodies directed against phosphorylated EGFR (Y1068, rabbit) and phosphorylated ERK (p44/42, mouse) were obtained from Cell Signaling.
In this paper, we reveal the role of MEK-ERK signaling in the regulation of malaria parasite development by an ingested blood-derived, mammalian cytokine in the mosquito host.
It was previously shown that the Raf/MEK/ERK MAPK pathway is necessary and sufficient for the Dar response: hyper activation of the pathway by the over expression of constitutively active forms of LIN-45 (Raf), MEK-2 (MEK), or MPK-1 (ERK) results in tail swelling in the absence of infection (as we have shown for constitutively active EGL-30* and RHO-1*), while mutations in 
Previously it has been shown that a conserved LIN-45 (Raf)/MEK-2 (MEK)/MPK-1 (ERK) MAPK pathway is required for the Dar response 
TDM-induced Mincle signaling was dependent on Src, Syk, MAPK/ERK kinases (MEK), and MAPK.
We, therefore, investigated the role of the MAPK (Ras/Raf/MEK/ERK) and PI3K pathways in upregulation of EphA2 during 
Further analysis revealed that the Raf/MEK/ERK/Ets-1 pathway mediates Ras-induced reactivation.
Further analysis revealed that the activation of the cellular Raf/MEK/ERK/Ets-1 pathway is shared by multiple upstream inducers to trigger reactivation.
To explore the mechanism by which the Ras/Raf/MEK/ERK pathway reactivates KSHV, reporter assays were conducted on the RTA promoter in 293T cells.
We further investigated whether the Raf/MEK/ERK pathway also contributes to KSHV spontaneous reactivation.
Ets family transcription factors are potential downstream effectors of Raf/MEK/ERK pathway.
To examine whether activation of the Raf/MEK/ERK pathway leads to endogenous Ets-1 activation in PEL cells, electrophoretic mobility shift assay (EMSA) was conducted with nuclear extracts from BC-3 cells.
The effectiveness of this genome-wide analysis was validated by revealing the critical role of the Ras/Raf/MEK/ERK/Ets-1 pathway in mediating signals from the cell surface to the viral genome in the nucleus to reactivate KSHV.
Among these, the MAP kinase signalling cascade (Ras-Raf-MEK-ERK) plays a pivotal role and is essential for a variety of processes such as growth, differentiation, proliferation, survival and apoptosis in all eukaryotes.
Importantly, PEA-15 is not an upstream regulator and does not alter the ability of MEK1/2 to activate ERK1/2 but can directly block ERK1/2 interaction with downstream mediators (
Reverse phase protein microarray technology of signaling pathways has previously demonstrated that PBMC from patients with C33Y TRAPS show subtle upregulation of NF-kB, p38, MEK/ERK and JNK MAP kinase pathways, Phosphinositide 3 kinase, STAT3, JAK2/c-Src, GSK-3beta and transcription factors including ATF, Elk and Jun.
Transfection of cultured cells with a dominant negative MEK, which is the ERK activating kinase, results in decreased effects of both insulin and TZDs on PPAR
MEK and ERK protein expression in HepG2 cells.
In our previous report, we demonstrated that PIO treatment in PCK rats inhibited renal Raf/MEK/ERK and AKT/mTOR/S6 activity and reduced proliferation of diseased renal cells [
Abbreviations: ROS, reactive oxygen species; TRAIL, tumor necrosis
factor related apoptosis-inducing ligand; DR5, death receptor
5 NFAT, nuclear factor of activated T cells; MEK, MAP
kinase; ERK, extracellular-signal regulated kinase.
Four main cascades have been identified to date, of which the Ras-Raf-MEK1/MEK2-ERK1/ERK2 cascade (ERK cascade) is the
most prominent one in human cancers [
In adipogenic
differentiation systems originating from (mesenchymal) stem cells, synergistic
cooperations between the MEK-ERK cascade and PPAR
Ras-Raf-MEK1/2-ERK1/2 cascade.
The Ras/Raf/MEK/ERK signaling cascade appears to be indispensable for cell proliferation in a variety of different cell types [
LPC stimulates the cellular production of MCP-1 at the transcription level through a mechanism that involves MEK/ERK, tyrosine kinase, and (to a lesser extent) protein kinase C (PKC) [
One possible explanation of the apparent discrepancy in these observations with respect to the role of MAPK signalling in testis development is the focus in other studies on the MEK-ERK pathway of MAPK signalling, sometimes called the classical MAPK cascade 
Alternatively, Slik may regulate Raf- and MEK-dependent survival and proliferation independently of ERK.
The Raf serine/threonine kinase is a key component of the evolutionarily conserved signal transduction module that also includes the Ras GTPase, the mitogen and extracellular signaling-regulated kinase kinase (MEK), and the extracellular signaling-regulated kinase (ERK) [
The RAS/MAPK pathway consists of a core module of three kinases (RAF, MEK, and ERK/MAPK) that transmit signals downstream of the small GTPase RAS.
PAK1 may induce MEK1/2 or ERK1/2 independent of RAF, as well as increase PI3K/AKT signalling by scaffolding PDK1 to increase phosphorylation of AKT.
Overexpression of the ERK pathway was found to be independent of MEK1/2
The MEK D-site contains conserved lysine residues predicted to mediate protein-protein interaction with ERK.
Tissue-targeted overexpression of alleles encoding MEK D-site polymorphisms resulted in reduced ERK phosphorylation in the midgut of 
MEK-ERK signaling in 
Efficient propagation of MEK-ERK signaling requires a stable docking interaction between the upstream activating kinase and its downstream target.
The N-terminal ERK docking site or D-site of MEK interfaces with the common docking or CD domain of ERK [
The MEK-ERK signaling module plays a central role in the regulation of malaria parasite development in 
Mutations at positions 3 and 6 in the D-site were introduced to disrupt MEK-ERK interaction and corresponding phosphorylation of ERK.
Levels of phosphorylated ERK (pERK) in Sua5B cells for each treatment were normalized to total ERK levels for protein loading and then normalized to pERK levels in the control cells transfected with wtMEK plasmid construct for 
Based on functional interactions of MEK and ERK in mammalian cells [
Because of the critical involvement of MEK-ERK signaling in a number of chronic diseases and cancer, there has been significant interest in therapeutic approaches to disrupt the docking interaction of MEK and ERK, including the use of small molecule inhibitors [
Our engineered mutations in the MEK D-site did not appear to exert a dominant negative effect, but induced an incomplete albeit functional block of ERK phosphorylation, much like the use of small molecule MEK inhibitors.
In particular, the MEK inhibitor PD98059 can interfere with ERK-dependent negative feedback regulation.
In addition to canonical signaling through Ras-Raf-MEK, networked signaling pathways can provide alternative targets for manipulation of ERK phosphorylation.
For example, treatment of human breast cancer T47D cells with the MEK inhibitor U0126 in combination with the phosphoinositide 3-kinase/Akt inhibitor wortmannin synergistically suppressed EGF-induced ERK activation relative to treatment with U0126 alone [
The ERK1/2 signaling pathways were blocked pharmacologically by addition of the MEK inhibitor, PD98059.
Changes in ERK1/2 and MEK in response to PLX4032.
We ruled out ERK activation by MEKK1 (
To verify the hypothesis of ETS-1 functional shift, in connection with P-T38 constitutive activation, we treated the primary Me1007 and the metastatic A375M melanoma cell lines with the phorbol ester PMA, which induces ETS-1 phosphorylation by stimulating ERK1/2 through the RAF/MEK signaling pathway (

('LMO2', 'RUNX1', 'increases')
As examples, SIN-MLV integrations faithfully reproduced the MLV integration patterns in the LMO2, EVI2A/B, RUNX1, RUNX2, ZNF217-BCAS1, CD34, ELF1 and NFE2 loci, which were targeted at the same overall frequency and at the same hot spots within each locus (
Distribution of MLV (red) and SIN-MLV (green) integration clusters (horizontal solid bars) and integrations (vertical marks) in the LMO2, RUNX1, EVI2A/B, and ZNF217-BCAS1 loci as displayed by the UCSC Genome Browser.

('TAK', 'MKK3/6', 'adds_modification')
The involvement of the pathway consisting of TRAF6/TAK1/MKK3/6/p38 MAPK in myogenic differentiation further suggests that the potential extracellular stimuli that trigger myoblast differentiation in vivo may belong to the family of pro-inflammatory ligands that utilize IL-1R/TLR.

('FOXO4', 'RUNX2', 'increases')
Our data strongly suggest that FOXO4 suppresses metastatic invasiveness by preventing RUNX2 from activating a group of pro-metastatic genes including 
HEK293T cells were co-transfected with Myc-FOXO4 plus HA-RUNX2, HA-RUNX2 alone or empty vector alone.
The FOXO4/RUNX2 antagonism we identified continues to function downstream of PI3K/AKT signaling.

('RAF1', 'BRAF', 'binds')
We also note a number of interesting genes (number of samples in parentheses) that were amplified and overexpressed: AKT1 (2), ATAD2 (7), AURKA (2), BRAF (3), DERL1 (6), DNMTRB (3), ESR2 (1), FASN (3), TNFRSF12A (2), PSENEN (4), HIF1A (2), IGF1R (1), NEK2A (6), MCL1 (1), PPFIA1 (1), RAF1 (2), PRL (1), RXRA (1), SRD5A2 (1), SUMO2 (1), TYMS (2), UBA1 (1), VEGFA (1), WNT3A (2) and WNT9A (2).
The RAF (ARAF, BRAF and RAF1) and MEK (MEK1/MAP2K1 and MEK2/MAP2K2) family of proteins are critical downstream mediators of the RAS and other oncogenic signaling pathways 
(B) BRAF1.
(B) BRAF1.
(B) BRAF1.
In tumor of case 14 there appears to be subtle increase in the activator phosphorylation sites S621 on RAF1 and S729 on BRAF, yet strong decrease in the inhibitor phosphorylation site S259 on RAF1, suggesting RAF1 and BRAF are more active in the tumor tissue of case 14.
In future studies we plan to determine whether RAF1 and BRAF phosphorylation status serve as predictive markers to Sorafenib therapy in patients with advanced HCC.
 The Raf family includes three members: ARAF, RAF1, and BRAF.
We therefore assessed BRAF and RAF1 enzymatic activity.
Similar studies with RAF1 showed non-detectable activity in YULAC-BRAF
Another major mechanism for RAF1 activation is homodimerization or heterodimerization with wild-type or enzymatically impaired mutant BRAF (
Altogether, although we have not uncovered the mechanism by which PLX4032 activated RAF1 in BRAF

('RELA', 'IRF1', 'increases')
There were 27 TRs identified after Cd exposure and 17 following Cr exposure, with eight in common for both metals (RELA, MYC, MYCN, BRCA1, IRF1, IRF7, TRIM24, and STAT3; 

('EGR2', 'SRF', 'increases')
It is possible that a reduction in EGR1 and EGR2 expression in the SRF siRNA-transfected cells was a result of decreased parasite growth.

('CREB1', 'JUN', 'increases')
We identified 113 transcription regulators including CREB1, JUN, SP1, STAT1 and STAT3.
Further insight in the mechanisms that connect transcriptional deregulation in cancer and metabolic abnormalities could be found if we bring to attention a set of genes, consisting in PRKAA2, PRKAB2, CREB1, MAP3K1, DUSP4, TLR3, JUN, UBE2V1, TLR2 and MEF2C.

('PITX2', 'RUNX1', 'increases')
For this reason freshly isolated PSC were analyzed by RT-PCR and the expression of the stem/progenitor cell markers breast cancer resistance protein 1 (BCRP1), bone morphogenetic protein-binding endothelial regulator (BMPER), CD133, c-kit, CXC chemokine receptor 4 (CXCR4), growth/differentiation factor 3 (GDF3), nestin, notch1, paired-like homeodomain transcription factor 2c (PITX2c), runt-related transcription factor 1 (RUNX1), stem cell growth factor (SCGF), slain1 and SRY-box 9 (SOX9) was found (

('STAT5A', 'NRAS', 'increases')
Among these genes, we showed that protein levels for STAT5A, ITGA3 and NRAS were modulated by miR-223.

('PAX3', 'FOXD3', 'increases')
Multiple signalling pathways converge on the MITF-M specific promoter that harbours binding sites for PAX3, SOX10, CREB, FOXD3, LEF-1 and BRN2 among other transcription factors (

('FOXA2', 'RUNX2', 'increases')
One hundred ng cDNA was used per reaction to detect ALDH1A2, ABCA5, ABCG2, POU5F1, SOX2, NANOG, WNT1, WNT5B, NEUROD1, ETS1, PPARG, RUNX2, FOXA2, 18 s using TaqMan Gene Expression Assays (Applied Biosystems, USA).

('MYC', 'MAX', 'increases')
c-MYC (hereafter referred to as MYC) is a transcription factor that heterodimerizes with its partner MAX in order to control the expression of a large program of genes that promote proliferation, cell death, cell growth, and cellular differentiation 
Re-expression of the NF1-GRD decreased c-MYC and increased MAD1 amounts suggesting that neurofibromin influences TRAIL sensitivity at least in part by modulating the MYC/MAX/MAD network.
MAD1 competes with c-MYC for binding the obligatory transcriptional co-activator MAX thereby regulating c-MYC activity.
Taken together the data suggests that loss of NF1 contributes to TRAIL sensitivity of MPNST cells by modulating the MYC/MAX/MAD network.
Taken together the data suggest that neurofibromin influences TRAIL sensitivity at least in part by modulating the MYC/MAX/MAD network and that this network may be an important downstream target of deregulated RAS signaling in NF1 associated tumors.
Our data indicated that the G1/S checkpoint regulation pathway is one of the significantly down-regulated canonical pathways, as 46 of the 61 genes in the pathway, (ABL1, ATM, ATR, BTRC, CCND1, CCND2, CCND3, CCNE1, CCNE2, CDC25A, CDK2, CDK4, CDK6, CDKN1A, CDKN1B, CDKN2B, E2F1, E2F2, E2F3, E2F4, E2F6, GSK3B, HDAC1, HDAC2, HDAC3, HDAC4, HDAC5, HDAC6, HDAC7, HDAC9, HDAC10, HDAC11, MAX, MYC, PA2G4, RB1, RBL1, RBL2, SIN3A, SKP2, SMAD3, SUV39H1, TFDP1, TGFB2, TGFB3, TP53) were deregulated by butyrate treatment.
For example, MNT (a Mad family protein) has been found to bind DNA targets that are not shared by either MYC or MAX 
The classical switch model of the MYC/MAX/MXD network, in which competition between MYC-MAX and MXD-MAX heterodimers for shared DNA binding sites controls proliferation or differentiation, needs to be expanded to accommodate these emerging challenges.
Among the down-regulated transcripts, binding sequences for five transcription factors (PBX1, Fos, RELA, GABPA, MYC-MAX, and Nobox) were enriched (
We propose that MAX is involved in neuroblastoma progression, possibly increasing cell differentiation by means of regulating the availability of MYC:MAX heterodimers.
Given that the MYC/MAX/MAD network may regulate up to 15% of the human genome [
This result suggests that higher MAX levels are associated to improved patient prognosis in patients with high risk, MYCN non-amplified metastatic neuroblastoma.
To address whether MAX expression could affect neuroblastoma by activating a differentiation pathway, we have analyzed a dataset of MYCN non-amplified neuroblastoma cells SH-SY5Y subjected to a differentiation protocol.
This data makes us believe that MAX is one the late effectors SH-SY5Y differentiation, suggesting that its expression is implicated in favorable outcomes for MYCN non-amplified neuroblastoma patients by means of enhancing cell differentiation and/or impairing proliferation.
The MYC/MAX/MAD network is a key axis in the cell decision-making for differentiation and proliferation, and it is altered in several types of cancer [
It is known that the MAX:MYC heterodimer induces cell proliferation by interacting with the TRRAP complex and histone acetyltransferases to transcriptionally activate cell cycle activators such as cyclins, and possibly repressing cell cycle inhibitors [
Cells with lower MAX concentration preferentially form pro-proliferative MYC:MAX heterodimers, leading to increased proliferation and de-differentiation (A).
With higher MAX levels, there is no more free MYC available and more MAD:MAX heterodimers and MAX homodimers are formed, shifting balance towards differentiation (B).
We have found evidences that MAX expression plays a role in neuroblastoma biology that has not been previously described, possibly as an additional regulator of the availability of MYC:MAX heterodimers and the balance of proliferation/differentiation.
K326R-MYC retains interaction with MAX.
Cells were harvested and immunoprecipitated for MAX and immunoblotted for MYC.
Figure shows Gene Set Enrichment Analysis enrichment plot of MYCMAX_01 gene set from Transcription Factor Targets collection (version 3.1) of data obtained after 3 hours or 24 hours of stimulation as indicated.
Bottom shows location of the genes in MYCMAX_01 set in the ranked list of differentially expressed genes: highest in unstimulated samples left (red zone) to highest in stimulated samples right (blue zone)).
Non-canonical HIF-2, by interacting with MYC:MAX heterodimers, bind the 
MYC dimerizes with MAX to bind its target sequence (E-box) and regulate gene expression.
The structurally unrelated small molecule 10074-G5 was identified simultaneously as 10058-F4 as another substance that inhibits the c-MYC/MAX interaction.
We have previously shown that this compound interferes with the MYCN/MAX interaction leading to cell cycle arrest, apoptosis, and neuronal differentiation in 
The bHLHZip domains of the MYC proteins are intrinsically disordered with little secondary structure without binding to MAX 
In our previous study we observed a reduction in MYCN/MAX interaction after treatment with 10058-F4 
A) Proximity ligation assay (PLA) for MYCN/MAX interaction after treatment of SMS-KCN69n cells with the different small molecules at the indicated concentrations for 6 hours.
Green signals represent the proximity of the MYCN and MAX proteins, while the red signal shows the total MYCN signal in the cell.
10058-F4, #474 and #764 were also able to decrease the interaction of MYCN and MAX as analyzed in a proximity ligation assay, whereas 7RH did not.
Taken together, these experiments suggest that the full biological effects of MYC inhibiting compounds are most apparent not only when the binding between MYCN and MAX is inhibited but when the levels of MYCN protein are reduced as well.
The 10074-G5 compound which is structurally unrelated to 10058-F4 has previously been reported to modulate c-MYC activity by preventing the c-MYC/MAX interaction.
TNF: tumor necrosis factor; TNFRSF1A (B): tumor necrosis factor receptor superfamily, member 1A (B); IGF1R: insulin-like growth factor 1 receptor; IGF2: insulin-like growth factor 2; BCL2L1: BCL2 like 1; BCL2: B-cell CLL/lymphoma 2; MCL1: myeloid cell leukemia sequence 1; FAS: Fas (TNF receptor superfamily, member 6); FASLG: Fas ligand (TNF superfamily, member 6); TNFSF10: tumor necrosis factor (ligand) superfamily; member 10; DR4_5: death receptor 4 and 5; BAX: BCL2-associated X protein; BAK1: BCL2-antagonist/killer 1; PMAIP1: phorbol-12-myristate-13-acetate-induced protein 1; BBC3: BCL2 binding component 3; EIF4E: eukaryotic translation initiation factor 4E; MAX: MYC associated factor X; PCNA: proliferating cell nuclear antigen; KDR: kinase insert domain receptor; GM-CSF: granulocyte-macrophage colony-stimulating factor; TIMP: TIMP metallopeptidase inhibitor; CD36: CD36 molecule; THBS1: thrombospondin 1; MMP: matrix metallopeptidase 3.
MYC family members heterodimerize with MAX at DNA target sequences known as E-boxes, recruiting histone acetyltransferases (HAT) and activating gene expression 
Similar observations have been made for MAX and MYC.
MAX, a MYC-family bHLH protein, not only forms homodimers, but also forms heterodimers, preferentially with MYC 
Our model was applied to analyze the evolution of binding sites based on the ChIP-seq data for six transcription factors (GATA1, SOX2, CTCF, MYC, MAX, ETS1) along the lineage toward human after human-mouse common ancestor.
Binding motifs were determined using human ChIP-seq data for GATA1, SOX2, MYC, CTCF, ETS1, and MAX.
Analogous cell types were used across species (GATA1: Erythroblasts, SOX2: Embryonic stem cells, MYC, MAX, ETS1, CTCF: B-lymphocytes).
Note that here the two MAX binding sites are also MYC binding sites since MAX and MYC have very similar motif.
A potential TFBS turnover is observed between two predicted MAX/MYC binding sites (1700 bp apart).
MAX mRNA level was not found to be affected by MYC induction in P493 cells (not shown).

('ELK1', 'LEF1', 'increases')
We identified six Hub TFs, GFI1, NR3C1, SOX17, STAT4, ZNF354C, and TCF8 from 318 SMAD4-dependent target genes in A2780 cells, while four Hub TFs, LEF1 (TCF), ELK1, COUPTF (NR2F5), and E2F, were identified in IOSE cells by our previous study using a similar approach (CART model) 

('EPH', 'EPHR', 'binds')
In December 2008, the Euro-Peristat network produced the first European Perinatal Health Report (EPHR) with data from 25 participating EU member states and Norway 
Primary antibodies: DLL4 and NOTCH3 (Santa Cruz Biotechnology, Santa Cruz, CA USA), NOTCH1 ICD and EPHRINB2 (Millipore, Bedford, MA, USA), TUBULIN (Abcam, Cambridge, UK).
At least PODOCALYXIN and NEPHRIN are highly sialylated and their sialylation is believed to be crucial to form and maintain the unique cytoarchitecture of podocytes (Kerjaschki et al. 
The DIAB2.NEPHRO.GENE study was a French multi-center case-control study (15 diabetes and 5 nephrology centers from throughout France between 2001 and 2004) designed to assess the genetic determinants of diabetic nephropathy in type 2 diabetes.

('PAX2', 'EN1', 'increases')
The TaqMan Gene Expression Assay ID/Gene Symbol used were: Hs00165941_m1/TH; Hs00158750_m1/LMX1B; Hs00374504_m1/PITX3; Hs00154977_m1/EN1; Hs01105042_m1/DDC; Hs01057416_m1/PAX2; Hs00355914_m1/ALDH2; Hs00428691_m1/NR4A2 (Nurr1); Hs03003631_g1/Eukaryotic 18 S rRNA.

('FOXA1', 'GATA6', 'increases')
In our study, the regulation interaction network showed several interconnected transcription factors of which the Forkhead family members (FOXP2, FOXA1, FOXA2), NKX2-1, and GATA6 are known to be involved in lung development 

('E2F1', 'FOXO3', 'increases')
The complete list of genes analyzed using the Human p53 Signaling Pathway RT2 Profiler PCR Array (SABiosciences, Valencia, CA) includes: APAF1, ATM, ATR BAI1, BAX, BCL2, BCL2A1, BID, BIRC5, BRCA1, BRCA2, BTG2, CASP2, CASP9, CCNB2, CCNE2, CCNG2, CCNH, CDK1, CDC25A, CDC25C, CDK4, CDKN1A, CDKN2A, CHEK1, CHEK2, CRADD, DNMT1, E2F1, E2F3, EGR1, EI24, ESR1, FADD, FASLG, FOXO3, GADD45A, GML, HDAC1, HK2, IFNB1, IGF1R, IL6, JUN, KRAS, PIDD, MCL1, MDM2, MDM4, MLH1
The complete list of genes analyzed using the Human p53 Signaling Pathway RT2 Profiler PCR Array (SABiosciences, Valencia, CA) includes: APAF1, ATM, ATR BAI1, BAX, BCL2, BCL2A1, BID, BIRC5, BRCA1, BRCA2, BTG2, CASP2, CASP9, CCNB2, CCNE2, CCNG2, CCNH, CDK1, CDC25A, CDC25C, CDK4, CDKN1A, CDKN2A, CHEK1, CHEK2, CRADD, DNMT1, E2F1, E2F3, EGR1, EI24, ESR1, FADD, FASLG, FOXO3, GADD45A, GML, HDAC1, HK2, IFNB1, IGF1R, IL6, JUN, KRAS, PIDD, MCL1, MDM2, MDM4, MLH1

